
lithicacity.com	
HomeLand of BethlehemThe Other WorldOf LightKingdoms of SunlightA Garden and River - Land of LightMore
notesfromsalem
	 	

	 	




Notes from Salem

by

Lucifer



















	Now the whole of all the scriptures written that are not to be added to the Bible, are given to Nathan Unsworth, being the businessman who is given ownership of all the scriptures that he is given The Diary of Lucifer and Notes from Salem and this book as well, that they are his entirely, him being an artist and businessman entrusted with these things, that he did not pay for them but was given them freely, than this is a man who is polish in ethnicity, being entirely polish, who is given all the scriptures of the Emperor of Salem, who is the angel, and all the scriptures of the angel. Now the businessman's name is Nathan Brian Barrie Unsworth, born in Edmonton, Alberta, student of Humber College, citizen of Canada, son of an Unsworth and Barrie, student of Cayuga Secondary School, resident of Hannah, Selkirk, Haldimand-Norfolk, Calgary, Toronto, and Hamilton all in Ontario except for Calgary and Hannah, Alberta. Now the prior is the order of his residences, that he was a child in Hannah, and moved to Ontario at approximately the age of five. His email address is unsworthnathan@gmail.com. He does not support or condone nor condemn any of the writings in The Diary of Lucifer, Notes from Salem, or this book called The Other World.


Now everything in Notes from Salem, unlike the rest of The Diary of Lucifer, uses the abrogation that is progressive where later things in Notes from Salem abrogate previous things. Notes from Salem is therefore a journey, part of which deals with the topic of the neo Nazis, called the priests of the Nazis. Of course the priests, the neo Nazis, are not really slaves of white people, and such is a given thing that goes without saying, as is the expression, and the later abrogation as well as others that come later, are removing this label from the journey of Notes from Salem, and yet the journey is still the book, Notes from Salem, where various things are to be discovered in a progressive fashion by the reader, since Notes from Salem is a religious text written like an essay, and also as a journey that is a companion to the greater amount of The Diary of Lucifer. 


Introduction: What must be known from The Diary of Lucifer to read this essay? But that the essay can be read alone, prior to reading the diary, which is much longer, is preferable, and much can be offered in an introduction to the essay so that the essay can be understood without having read any of The Diary of Lucifer that this essay is a companion to. Now Adonijeh is the police, in essence, and the spirit of the police, and he is a Jew. Now Solomon is the people, in terms of who is given to be king, and he is also a group of people, or rather, there are a group of people who make up the people who would be part of his house. Now the king of Salem is more righteous than Abraham, or Avram, is Abraham, as a result, pays taxes to him voluntarily, as an honour to him. Now Lucifer is the angel of Pergamos or Pergamum, that is found in the Bible, and he is also the angel with his foot on the Earth and water, with light radiated about him who offers a small book. Now Lucifer is not the the devil, but is a baby angel, or young angel, who has the name Lucifer, and he is described in The Diary of Lucifer to some extent. Now the angel is come in the way Elijah, a prophet, or an angel might come, to be on Earth in mortal form, and carry out his mission that he is sent for. Now Elijah came to die to last time he was on Earth, and yet the angel knows of no such mission for him in terms of dying while he is on Earth during the mission he comes for. Now the angel is a satan, being a type of ancient serpant, and he does not crawl on his belly the way another satan might. Now the devil, called satan, is not the only satan that has existed, and the angel is not the devil, the old satan, but is given the seat, or throne, that was his, before he rebelled against the Lord. Now Pergamum or Pergamon is a Greek city, and it is a city that no longer exists, except in Mala. Now Mala is the spiritual and Ria is the physical, and Mala influences Ria, and actions are Mala that influences Ria. Now Prince Rellium, RCMP, Cias, CIA, Cessus, CSIS, The Giant Lady, NSA, are listed here for those who have not read The Diary of Lucifer. Now Prince Rellium is a prince of Salem, as is Prince Felliom or Fellion, Felliun, Fellium, who is a Prince of Salem in America.




In The Diary of Lucifer to which this book is the shorter companion, one of the main concepts is given that Islam, Christianity, being a Jew, if not Judeasm, and Salem people, make up what I call The Allied World that is the west, with Islam being the west, middle-east. Essentially all these religions are for different callings of people, with Islam being because of the obedience of angels, and the other religions being what they are, that all the Earth, except for the polytheists, is essentially covered in the Lord's kingdoms, with some areas still following different traditions and religions. This is written about further in the text, Notes From Salem, whereas we must first cover other ground before entering into the realm of religion, the revelation of the twelve tribes of Israel, the twelve sons of Jacob, found in Salem, or Canada, and the various other religious concepts that make Notes From Salem a companion to The Diary of Lucifer which is considerably longer, and contains long and short proverbs spread out over three volumes, at present. First, we deal with other concepts such as the hidden order, or second order that exists in democracy separate from what is official.







The hidden order is found in many nations, and is the hidden and unofficial order that operates within a nation, often comprised of corruption, treachery, terrorism (domestic or foreign) and a great concern for all types of politics, politics of some type usually being the motivating factor, whether social or otherwise, that fuels the actions of the hidden order that is the second force that is hidden that seeks to influence society as much as any government could, if not more. Now the hidden order can be found with a quick temper and much anger towards the politics of others, so that most of the population is often unaware of the cold war that is ongoing between those who are offenders to the hidden order and those who are unwilling to tolerate the way the country might go if corrupt action is not taken. Attempting to persuade any person part of the hidden order seems like a laughable thing for naive children to the order, as foolishness among shepherds, false shepherds, anti-heros, persecuted brave people, and the almost infinite list of people, including wolves good and bad, who are engaged in the ongoing cold war that the average citizen is not included in, for despite their best efforts, they are often not considered a threat, or nobody against them wishes to draw them into the war for fear they might be causing themselves more problems in the long term. Of course there are no strict rules to the messy, highly dangerous and sometimes lethal cold war that continues between false-police, corrupt officials, righteous killers and criminals, where self-righteous police officers sometimes cross the line into terrorism with a clear conscience and all manner of cowardice, for what police officer is not expected to operate with cowardice when they are separate from other officers and engaged in the cold war that the other officers barely know about? But cowardice is expected, for what does anyone think this is? Now it is dangerous, sometimes dirty, often dirty for some, and saints have gone forth to be slayn by cowards, and they cannot die, and as for the other side, let them burn in hell.

	Do not brave soldiers wonder what is going on, and they know more than most people, and yet silence is demanded of all those who are involved in the cold war, for the rule of the cold war is that they will haul you in as a crazy person to teach you a lesson for blabbing about the ongoing fight. John, good job. Stacy, no problem. Jessica, keep up the homework! As for name x, he knows its not over and that we'll kill him if he keeps it up. Now if the cold war people all know what the score is, as is the expression, and they know it is a cowardly game, that is not a game at all, and that it is a brave game for those on the right side, and a game where allegiances can change quickly, only to turn to treachery, where ideas are sponsored and others stomped on as threats, can anyone really rely on your neighbourly intelligence agency anymore? But there are intelligence agents who are with the terrorists, are there not? Computer hackers get hauled in so that people in the area can rummage through their computer before they get home, the lazy, dirty way of accessing someone's computer without permission. Some play good for police one week, and commit a crime the next, that is a crime for good, but the righteous police, would they even know why it was committed?

	Nobody really is coming to save you when you are part of the cold war, not even those in intelligence agencies, and hopefully along the way your enemies will hit a road block where you will have to be released, so long as you don't give them what they want more, which is a good excuse to shoot you so that it looks good. What idiot would try to escape the police? If they're dirty, it's all they really wanted and their gun is ready. Co-operate, wait for the road block where some non-dirty person steps in and you go home, and again learn your lesson, that you'll never learn. Tricks, games, rediculous but horrible stuff, and don't even open your mouth about it, because that's the idea, to cause hassle for you and move their people in where they can. Knowing when to ignore it and when to act is part of understanding that this is an ugly thing, and it keeps going.

	The only thing that matters most is: who are the civilians, and who are the enemy? Both sides capitalize on police who do not know what is happening to play civilian and obtain the privileges of citizens. The police who do not know dampen everything and keep the war from spilling out into regular war with rifles and and machine guns, keeping both sides operating in the shadows. The detectives transformed into princes are those with the ability to know how to not be labelled crazy when they are not in the dark anymore, and they walk openly over the land, admitting that the cold war is happening and pouring out drinks onto the table cloth in front of the polite patrons while nobody can do anything about it, for they are prince-status, fighting domestic terrorism openly while admitting that some of their own people are terrorists, and some of the higher ups, and some of the judges, and yet without the railing of a crazy person, they cannot be cast out due to the cavalier way they play the game that is not a game. Extrinsically motivated sympathizer Nimrods are not civilians, but they often get labelled wrongly with civilian status, because they seem to be such good actors, although it is because they are sympathizers and extrinsically motivated that their acts seem so much like the babblings of incredibly, astonishingly stupid people who meddle. If they do not need to actually join a domestic terrorist organization to take the initiative, there is perhaps the only evidence of their actual stupidity, for that is the real meddling they do, and for the enemy, and isn't it true they have been meddling for the enemy many times, and consistently, ever since they couldn't do nothing like a civilian? But civilians do something, and not nothing, only it is the something of civilians, taking action for what is right and not for anything in the cold war happenings, but for the upholding of democracy and morality. These extrinsically motivated enemies in the cold war do not have to have knowledge of anything to be such a problem that is ongoing. Sometimes they are the unholy vigiliantes for a right direction the country should be going, and they can be more cruel in their actions than any person in a terrorist gang. Supposedly they are appauled, outraged, and if they do to far, what can be done, for they have gone too far past the bounds of the cold war as a meddling sympathizer, and what protection do they really have, when they consider that everybody knows what the score is? Bold are the sympathizers who do not know how the world works, and who believe that society supports them as civilians when they have exited the realm of civilians long ago. What does it matter if a person is extrinsically motivated to carry out Ideological injustice or Religious injustice? What does it matter if INCEL's believe that their 2 year old id problems are political issues and that they are freedom fighters? Even if 2 year old can handle it, and know that these problems are their problems, and these people cannot, they are still fighting as soldiers of some of the lowest realms of hell, outside of the struggles of Jews and philistines, and existing in the struggle between Heaven and Babylon and Hell. As for the Neo-Nazis, are they even Nazis? In reality they are, and this will be covered later in the essay.

	The unbalanced goals of Nazis with concerns to nationalism seem to demonstrate the difference between a conservative with regards to maintaining white culture, and a conservative with regards to immigration, and a group that wishes a stronger type of racial singularity and a more total isolation from the cultures and ideas of other people groups. Segregation is supported by ideas that no racial ethnicity desires for the true mixing of ethnicity and that attempts to seriously integrate with other groups is hated by all. If the ideology is to make sense in this way, and there is much more, than the enigmas of discord decisions and actions, that are done in nefarious fashion, seem to baffle many white people who seem to understand some things, but not others. If anything it is police, domestic terrorism, where the police are acting on behalf of their pride sentiments and general sentiments against the masses practising free speech, that can be the most ruthless and active terrorist gangs that operate within North America. Offending 'the righteous' is to be compared in some cases, to blaspheming a religion, and some police are offended easily enough to view a rebuke made with free speech as a type of unpardonable blasphemy against what is pure, cannot sin, and beyond Earthly reproach, so that the sin must be retaliated against that the slight of this nature be properly avenged against any person evil enough to use free speech in such a wrong fashion.

	If any person ever wrote a song entitled 'Fuck the Police' as one person did, it would have likely been viewed by some police as something worse than a death threat against every police officer on Earth, and a grave blasphemy that should be retaliated against, even with a reason, so that something did not become accepted as an acceptable norm that would have to be delt with in the future, a concern about a hypothetical future that is often considering a great exaggeration of what is likely and reasonable to expect, although free speech is right regardless and many would argue that the opposite, too much silence on the topic, is in fact the norm that has been established by bullying on behalf of the police. If there can be a true segregation between the religious cult of the police, that is offended by lawful actions and speech, and the police who are only interested in doing their job, it seems unlikely that neo-nazis having infiltrated the police force are usually to blame, since the police are capable of all the same prejudice and sentiments as well as a multitude of other sentiments that might provoke them to retaliate against a law-abiding citizen, or non-law-abiding, as there are many cases when a person's status as criminal does not change the level of evil of the police taking action against them. What are the police offended by now, and why have they chosen to retaliate against a citizen? The answer can be as many as a person might be able to explain in two life-times. This police terrorism is often more self-centred for the police and does not always address social grievances that other citizens might relate to. Of course when the police are the real government that controls a nation, the second order, and the main holders of real power that does not change after the results of an election, they are the actual authority figures that are being fought by the rebels who desire change, and not the government in general, when some attempt to change the true message of what is taking place.

	The way is victory, of course, and not the continuation of the fight, which means abolishing the antiquated procedures in our legal system for modern practises that are current with our modern technology, especially considering the advanced con-artistry and manipulation of our procedures by corporations who use the wrong types of assessments when there is a problem to aid in the obscurement of the problem so that they can claim a problem has been addressed.

	We are not using our full brains anymore in society due to the crippled nature of our procedures and system, and when it becomes possible to completely cover a large crime that has involved many people, it is apparent that our procedures are not adequate any longer to fight the ability of corrupt officials to orchestrate crimes against people who have practised free speech or engaged in legal activism. If the elimination of crime does not solve the problem, it is only because corrupt practises in other places, and economic injustice, has forced many to turn to crime in order to survive, and the concept of herding certain individuals towards crime so that they can be made an enemy of society, another type of enemy of the state, is a concept that seemed to be connected with ideology and religion where small pockets of organized individuals heard people towards committing crimes, and towards situations where their survival depends on becoming an enemy of society in order to survive or to save others. Here we have the domestic terrorist aspect of the government systems. The lone wolves and small groups who orchestrate what they can with a malicious avarice against some individuals who have angered an ideology or religion, so that we have the disenfranchised who turn to crime, and the targeted who turn to crime, and all are then labelled enemies of society, of the police, and are able to be thrown in prison. In fact there is police terrorism, and it can contain all the elements of ideological terrorists without the official affiliation with a gang, and the same terrorists can be found in smaller groups in government areas, who carry out small acts that culminate in losses for individuals who are considered the offenders. In areas where this takes place, are we not talking about almost total losses of government control of some areas, where terrorists have indeed hi-jacked the larger parts of some cities and have become so skilled in con-artistry that their efforts are hard to withstand for an unsuspecting citizen who is still attempting to gather their life. How many of these people have been black and truly disenfranchised in this fashion, along with the white people and the brown people who have also been targeted by these types of actions. Even soldiers have likely been targeted by such attacks in the military, suddenly finding themselves in barbaric circumstances off the battle-field, and what for? Is the military having some alternative rule, a second order that they did not know about? Are black people truly jealous, or is there the secret actions that have hindered their people group? I would vote for the later as the cause of much of the poverty that has sometimes hit black communities and resulted in crime rates that are the consequence of having to survive. If black people do not have real grievances beyond the self's will to grow and to change, the concept being that such desire to grow and change is being manifest outwardly, in the wrong way, upon society, than a person would have to be unknowledgeable to believe such, for there are undoubtably those with bias and the clandestine work of Ideological individuals who take matters into their own hands to make things more difficult for some citizens, even based on religion sometimes, is a topic which is not discussed in a direct and open way in society in public forums. When considering the untold body of news that is not discussed often or is watered down to an extent that it has lost all its meaning in the news, the idea becomes ridiculous for many that people are only jealous when they express grievances about disenfranchisement and the general generation of abject resistance that is against them due to some matter of bias. Every person has their enemies on this Earth, even people who would normally incur less envy, and the idea that some people have more enemies than others due to the hidden bias that exists against them is not a difficult concept to understand. In fact, if any person is claiming that no such resistance and bias can exist for someone, it is often a sign that they are a person who has resistance and bias against someone. So what of the freedom fighters and enemies of society, the computer hackers getting hauled in only so someone can rifle through their laptop by mounting their file system in another operating system while they are away from their computer, or the untouchables who get detained by hospitals by angry, revenge seeking people who cannot get the police to arrest someone, or the people who get detained for other reasons, or get targeted with fraud when they are being activists for a good cause? The list of arrests by police and attacks against activists and artists can be staggering, considering these things are not reported by the media and when they are reported, they are often reported wrong. The police terrorists fight back and so does society that resists these activists, because they know if they cease their efforts, even if they are discussed, the other side will have an easy time trampling over their evil. Is it sometimes terrorism, sometimes just a crime to target artists and activists? In this nebulous realm it does not seem to matter because the people attacking artists and activists do not often go to prison for their attacks. Some people are angry, mad, and they are willing to carry out extreme actions to demoralize and take revenge upon those who have different views than them. Calling truth tellers crazy, covering up crimes against activists, is only part of any week targeting people who resist the evil that you and your group are doing. The ones getting painted as crazy are sometimes the much more lucky ones, since some are dealing with planted evidence and prison sentences and prison situations where someone has the ability to carry out a murder against an activist or artist without it appearing as if their work was the motive for the murder. If the other side is going to win, they usually feel that they have to fight, and fight hard against those who are going against their message and their cause, and using illegal tactics, such as arrests of any type, is only part of their ongoing attack. Not all activists are willing to let things go, and those activists with friends and the attitude to do so, can sometimes retaliate in ways that are unexpected for those who more comfortably target artists and activists, and if this is a war, it is more like a cold war.

	Hi-jacking a mental hospital for the purpose of domestic terrorism against artists and activists is not an unlikely scenario, and the amount of artists who have been admitted involuntarily to send a message must be a staggering number. If they can't get the support to throw somebody in prison, than declaring an artist crazy is another step in their mission to intimidate and disrupt. Let's talk about the stigma of being a artist who keeps resisting domestic terrorism and horrible acts, and you will understand that those hauled into a hospital are the lucky ones in comparison to the largest act of cowardice, planting evidence and hauling a person off to prison where they can more easily be murdered for their views. How many times has a loyal soldier in the military been attacked with cowardice in his military unit because he did the right thing and others wanted to carry out treacherous evil, so that the soldier suddenly found themselves being targeted and ousted in a cowardly way? How many times have fresh employees been bullied away when it became apparent early that they would not participate in the scum-bag behaviour of their colleagues? These operational pockets of ideologists who are against artists, activists, good people in general who don't go along, are often having cover from a higher up place in the chain of authority where they often will not make their moves and carry out their actions until they are assured they have their proper people in place at different locations, especially higher up, since anything they do will likely be scrutinized. Possible future threats are sometimes given an implied message and those who shut down evil are viewed as if terrorists against the terrorist cause. The cold war can get gritty at times, and in the mountains of fraud that take place people can spend a few days in prison while waiting for their initial hearing before getting sent home, or they can be detained in a hospital, or bankrupted in some fashion, while fighting for what is only right, and maintaining the integrity of a good person. In this cold war game it does not make sense for any person to trust the police, who will stab a brave man in the back, and look the other way while an attack takes place against a group of artists. If there are good cops, they'll learn about it themselves, most likely, and it can only be said—not, I told you so—but it's about time to those people who never really belonged with the scum-bags, not that it matters anyway, since in the chains of fraud, the police can't know who is really guilty and who is not in this game. That being said, why would anyway suspect that the cops who carry out the arrest are not part of the scum-bag scheme, since they're the ones who choose to make the arrest?

	Running makes less sense a lot of the time, since the police would probably prefer a chance to shoot a person or add greater charges when they might have nothing, in fact, that will hold up in court. Of course running might make sense if you can make it out of the country, and having friends 'pals' in other countries provides more safety for a renegade computer hacker or activist, or even artist, who needs to escape when the nation goes to chaos and the corrupt police and higher up covers for people are driving a person to prison, and possibly death. The anti-hero of this immortality never die, and in the realm of cold war tactics and the endurance of freedom fighters, some have paid the ultimate price for their refusal to join with the evil to do their will, resisting as part of the resistance in order to gain the treasures of immortality for others and for oneself as immortal beings who will not stoop to being dead while living even if they are poisoned, and made as if dead, they are alive, and even if they are killed in body, their spirit lives on.

	The war against the unrighteous, the unjust, continues on, as living spirits who excel the darkness, the flashes of lighting that cannot be put out, and the charge of light across the corrupt land. Some lie, cheat, break into computer systems, write newspapers, take pictures, report abuse and evil, etc. For the crime of resisting evil they are persecuted as the enemy soldiers who fight back against the dark of death and evil that spreads over the land, beating back the encroaching Babylon of wickedness and injustice, raging with light into the dark places to save the afflicted, to pull the righteous out of dark places and set their feet among the saints of the holy light. Those who use the art of computer hacking for disgusting sabotage against Zion are the Babylonian monsters who pervert the craft for evil, the anti-hackers who are ignorant in spirit, unintelligent against their own intelligence, having not grasped the great concept of the nebulous ideal of freedom that computer hacking represents, not just for oneself, but for all. Some of the lowest places in hell are reserved for these who corrupt the freedom, exchanging the freedom for the chains of injustice, putting on the chains themselves, wanting to be imprisoned by Babylon.

	Let the computer hackers help the true Christians, the Muslims, the Jews, the Aboriginal Religious, etc. Together we might be able to shun the sickness of puritanicalism and evil that infiltrates every good ideology, the disease that corrupts and destroys. If they can turn us against each other, masquerading as friends, they will, and they will continue to attempt to divide and conquer, for they go to war with the ideals of hope and good, with the ideals of Zion, of freedom and intelligence.

	The police are Adonijeh and at least they might also be against Babylon, but when they are united, Babylon and Adonijeh, they are never so dangerous. Let David and the activists of Zion clear the disgusting corruption and wickedness of Babylon together, for are there not true believers in democracy in the military, when we admit that the military are not the police, except for groups like Al'Queda and ISIL, far right wing groups that believe in puritanical values and discord, groups that want the West to be against the middle-east, for segregation and discord is one of their biggest values. How would they have a problem with neo-nazis if they are committed to the same value of segregation, where they have desired for the middle-east and the West to keep their distance from each other, for even if the West is sick with the sons of hell, or if it is not, they have desired that friends should not occur. Those who fight the sons of hell, being of the West, are those who are attacked by them, and is the middle-east not also targeted by such sons of hell when brave soldiers are sent to do their dirty work when there is no threat? If the Iraq war under the Bush Administration was not just for economic reasons, than is it possible that some of these wars are like hate crimes for morel, including torturing Muslims, whether guilty or not, where reasons are not needed and only the appeal to passion and morel without reason is required to rationalize the murder of innocents? Right-wing extremists are also Right-wing-religious extremists, religious terrorists like Al'Queda and ISIL doing the same type of work in the middle-east that neo-nazis and INCEL do against their own people in the West.

	The world is plagued by the sons of hell and Babylon, and sometimes the chaotic ways of Adonijeh, the police of cities and rural areas. Those of David, the soldiers, are different groups each, and yet they are separated from the people, different from others. The paradigms that condemn the innocent are only that and nothing more, and claiming that any innocent group is philistines is only part of the continued war that is motivated by the idea of segregation, or hate, as they call it. In the city in which I write this, it is possible that the Canadian government has lost most of the city, the government part, to treason, which would likely even include the police. The amount of fraud and theft that takes place is enormous, and not just by those who steel copper wire and other things for drugs, but also by business-people who have made the city difficult for many. Having lost the city to corruptions, whether domestic terrorism, or otherwise, seems to make no difference when the crimes are frequent, as is the fraud, and the checks and balances of a democracy have been replaced with corruption and naive people, likely, who are told that by doing something wrong, they are in fact doing a good thing, a way of manipulating people to participate. The city down the mountain seems to be a state of chaos and functionality and the amount of homeless seems to outnumber those not homeless in places.

	Perhaps almost all of the city has been lost from the government, and for what reason, even I cannot say, but during a time when the federal government and the province have become less popular, it is still likely that if the treason is for a good cause, those exploiting the state of treason are not doing a good thing. Adonijeh does not have to exist in his natural host, the police force, and neither does Babylon have to exist, or the loop-holes in our legal system that have been created a long time ago to give the country the ability to carry out undemocratic action against people who are considered a threat to something, likely the unnatural second order, or hidden order, that exists in many democracies, which has been given provisions and the ability to be nurtured in our democracy. What is understood is that Adonijeh exists with the concept of stealing the kingdom from its rightful heirs, the people, and that those who wish to hi-jack democracy for this cause are rightfully pursued, especially when some of the people are wrongfully driven out.

	It is not a threat to the country, it is a threat to them, and when they speak of fears and threats, they are speaking about their own treason more than anything else. How can any citizen be a threat to national security? But if they are stockpiling guns and explosives, of course there are agencies that deal with such, but how can any practising free speech be an actual threat to national security in democracy? The idea is not to establish order, but diminish power that order might be able to be accomplished, and there are people who are capable of fighting the real threats and supporting the citizens with concern for their well-being, with care, as those who are the good and rightful shepards of our nation, aiding the citizen and defending them from all and any injustice no matter how small, which is the shepard whose voice can be better trusted.

	It would seem that with the governments the way they are, almost any group that is considered a threat at this time, seems to in some ways be better than our own government that has been trained to attack its own people and view people who are loyal to the nation as the biggest threats to the nation. The old game of bullying people with one government hand and then when they are upset, throwing the handcuffs on with another government hand, is getting tiresome and grievous to a nation that needs good citizens, not more attack from its own government. When citizens ask for help they should be helped and not shunned as traitors to the nation for not knowing that their government is no longer pleased with them. When a person considers a nation that could be Salem, and a place where there could be many different religions and beliefs, or that Esau is still fighting to break free or that the various cults that form are able to gain numbers, or that ignorance is wanted by many, even by those who are dogmatic for ignorance, and fight blindly to abolish anything outside of an ideology that they do not understand, then a person might consider the violence that can take place, and global upheavel, where wars take place for unknown reasons and refugees begin to occur in greater numbers.

	Nuance, even segregation, can sometimes be what is wanted for peace, and sometimes it is something else. Some capitalize early on chaos and gain numbers only to discover that later they must curtail their efforts to allow for another ideology to inact what it must for the good of a nation. In the realm of illegal ideological gangs there are no more checks and balances, or often sense, than a person might find from the second order of a corrupt government, and given the apathy that seems to be a resentful apathy, it might be better understood that many things are implied and a person must know the reasons for things and the corruption that exists. When people take for granted that there is a second order that they weild and exploit, there are still the people who desire for democracy, and to stray from justice is never good for a nation's benifit and accomplishment, and yet it occurs.

	But the actors who move in and out of the shadows are being unusually crafty. Another mass shooting occurs, and what has really transpired and driven a person to go on a shooting spree in a specific location, and can it really be said to be what they say it is, even if they only call the person a 'monster' as they used to, which was indeed more safe than some of the things they call it now. In the efforts to sow discord between people and the government, even specific people, as part of an ongoing war between some government actors and the government, the government does always seem to show awareness of this type of occurrence and report stories however they want, even police shootings that are a result of a high ranking police ideology about the country and who protects it rather than allowing democracy and the people to exercise their freedoms. A homicide has taken place, and was the person actually a serial killer who was prolific, who was killed, that the police were refusing to arrest, being 'their' serial killer, or a person they approved for some unknown ideological reason not supported by any terrorist gang? A soldier goes AWOL and is brought in by a unit of military soldiers, and do we really know the real story as to why this soldier, who might not have really be insane, abandoned the military and went on the run, or did something else? Insanity, or the label, can seem to cover for much explanation that would have prior been required but is now not needed when answering questions to reporters or any type of inquiry. Why did it happen? Insanity. Nothing more needs to said anything, and if the soldier was in fact a hero of some type that the people would have supported, they need not be considered anymore after the explanation has come out from those who might have been corrupt. Was the military doing something against its own people and was this the reason for the soldier's rebellion against his own military, or was something horrible really occurring before another person pulled a trigger on a handgun a number of times, so that we will now never know, because they only need tell us, they were insane, and that is what some insane people do.

	9/11 seemed to make us lose our common sense when it comes to questioning news reports and even distrusting all that occurs in the world, after many became united and possibly over-supportive and trusting of governments from fear of another attack like 9/11. The slow shift away from such distrust can be dangerous for all people, and seems to give bad actors in places a free license and open opportunity to carry out plans that would have prior been harder to execute safely. Even foreign groups can exploit such trust in the government and trust in institutions where people stop supporting their people and start turning on each other in their hearts, with an accusatory, persecuting spirit that can eventually tear down the whole country in which we all reside. If sociopaths already exploit opportunities, than there are only more who might seem like sociopaths when the slow shift has happened unnoticed and the hearts of the people are turned against each other in a persecutory fashion. Our neighbour is then to blame for all evil in the world, any neighbour, whoever they might be. What needs to happen? The defusing of power can help us take a step back, so that we can see clearly enough to re-establish greater peace. The police are people made for escalation and meeting threats and not for leading the country when it comes to such decisions as the right direction for the country, and where actual good intent is not found in government towards the people, with the desire for peace, perhaps every person is being targeted and the system is poisoned at some place in the chain, or at least failing. There is never really a time for settling angst and grievances, and it is certainly not when a leader's heart holds a grudge for some reason, against the people, for exploiting such is stabbing one's self in the back. But when the nation is escalating, than where is the most powerful contained thing that is joining in on the escalation, and can the power be defused, or that is to say, the fire that would devour the people? The police are meant to be an almost constant fire of such a type, as their role is to escalate with force, as part of the system, although where some other part of the system is being a fire, that should be cool, than it seems that the power might benefit from being defused to some extent that the situation might be better understood. Where is the real source of the fire, and what peace might be had from times of consideration, when there are not rifles being fired and peace might actually win the situation entire?

	Where lynchings occur by small groups, and homicides begin to increase as those ignorant became more militarized to carry out cowardly acts that are against those who have not participated in any cold war, and the amount of refugees increases as a country becomes unable to remedy problems caused by collections within the second order, the second type of government, then for some life continues on, and for others they are inducted into the other world, the dark land of cloaks and daggers where death looms to devour, and lies seem to come from many places. It is a world of various types of criminals, police officers with varying loyalty, zealous ideologists, wise people, and meddling fools who attack the innocent, and the list of things found goes on. Consider that some who are not emotionally developed are better masking this lack of development when they become an adult who is better established in their career, offering then the veneer of emotional development due to development in professionalism in terms of behaviour, but not in terms of real emotional development, and there is then an added danger lurking in the other world of shadows, which is those who act out personal ideologies and impulses when presented with what they perceive to be an opportunity to join in on wrong doing, when their bravery might be increased to do so. Or consider that these are always capable of acting out grievances and pety impulses while maintaining the veneer of adult maturity and accountability, that is not actually present. Lack of integrity adds to the factor of evil meddling in the other world and it can be present and culminate until it erupts into greater tragedy and even violence. Add to that other people with a different type of developmental issue, seemingly, which are the impulsive pedophiles who can become involved in the realm of terrorism and criminals, and more danger is added from their meddling. As for the nation, when it is all id and politics or ideology, in every arena and avenue of the processes that are part of the nation's systems, then perhaps it truly is a representation of the population entire of a nation, and the country entire is not worth any effort for it is too worthless morally to attempt to remedy, for it will not listen to reason, but has been, in its opinion, too long persecuted by reason, that it is engaged in a war with a wrath and vengeance that is deep and personal, for it has been persecuted by reason and concepts of restraint for too long, and the people persecuted by reason are set on reaping total and utter vengeance and would now rather die than give one more step of ground to reason and restraint, willing to die even in a suicidal attack. What they have been forced for so long to be restrained in, does not matter. When a nation is such there might be little that can really be accomplished.




What is INCEL, and the lowest son of Orgoth, the mountain in hell? As written in The Diary of Lucifer the mountains that are in every different realm where there are people are described, and much attention is given to Orgoth, the mountain in hell, since incursion of hell have been more frequent upon the Earth, perhaps due to what is considered the realm of the last days, or perhaps for some other reason. The three sons of hell of the mountain shelves are described in The Diary of Lucifer which is a book of wisdom offered for interest and guidance if it is desired, although the book does not offer itself as an addition to any religion, and is not a religion itself, but only a book of wisdom offered if it is wanted. In the book Esau, the elder brother of Jacob, is described as being part of the INCEL and lowest son of hell categorization although it was never intended that any should assume that Esau makes up the entirety of this category, since he seems to have joined this category, hopefully in a temporary fashion, and likely as a result of his servitude to Judaism and its influence upon most of the planet, described as Jacob, when he would rather follow another way of thinking and have his own people who are not under the influence of Judaism or Jacob. As a person who willingly is with Jacob and The New Testiment, I will let my allegiance be known that I believe it to be the morality that is the true morality, the right and wrong that we are all accepting, at least until Esau's departure and forming of a new people and school of thought, which he does not seem to have fully completed. If Esau is attempting to throw off the yoke of his servitude to Jacob, and can find no satisfaction in the righteousness of The Old Testiment or New Testiment, than it is also to be mentioned that there is in fact no organization for those who are merely sociopaths, driven in truth, by no ideology or politics, by only by impulse, and it has likely been the presence of Esau which has given sociopaths safe harbour with a terrorist organization like INCEL, a portion returning to Jacob, a portion Esau, and a portion sociopaths, impulsive serial killers, sicophants who desire to desecrate beauty and innocence, ect, who make up the lowest realm of hell prior to the lake of fire. If a third are Esau, a third actually part of Jacob, then only a third are truly in the catagory of the lowest son of hell, and it is not actually a terrorist gang, but a safe harbour of mutual support, more like a club for impulsive monsters, rather than anything that could ever have an ideology or political motive. Essentially there can never been an organization for sociopaths, and no terrorist gang, that is motivated by religion or ideology, can truly find members from sociopaths who do not actually care about the motive and cause of the terrorist organization, but only relish a chance to unburden themselves of persecuting restraint that they suffer with, so that they may do the only things that really give them pleasure, which is giving sociopaths a chance to finally be themselves since they are constantly persecuted by morality and its restraints. No organization is really a place for them, and yet they roam looking for a place where they can be themselves and do what they are made to do, which is to do horrible evil.

	This is truly the lowest son of hell, being a club for those with evil impulses who cannot care for religion or any ideology, a supportive club that might offer some protection. The fact that they lie about their motive and pretend to have a religion or ideology in order to bully might not be surprising.

	While the NSA spies, and the intelligence agencies carry out manipulations and actions and while the middle-levels of governments carry out corrupt acts on behalf of ideologies and religion as shapers of the world, throwing people into prison with planted evidence and the strategies of Ideologists and politicians to frame people for crimes or draw people into crimes when the police will not protect them or terrorist sting operations to get criminal charges against people or the general slander carried out by ideologists operating behind the scenes of news organizations and in the public where trials by media take place and bias people participate based on ideology and politics. What is holding a democracy together? Essentially there is nothing holding any of it, a nation, together in a democracy, and the level of anarchy that occurs where some do their jobs and others exploit the system of government makes any nation a hazard when you are playing the game of activist, hacker, anti-hero, etc. One of the problems in government is cookie-jar feigned insentience, where a person knows they are not allowed to take a cookie from the jar until their parents give them one, but they participate in actions or take actions that are not permitted by democracy or law. Sometimes a higher up supervisor of some sort, an elder sibling, says it is alright to take a cookie and the person still knows that their elder sibling has no authority to grant them permission to take a cookie, and that only their parents, the law and democracy, essentially the nation, can grant them permission to take a cookie when they get home. Hence, I call it cookie-jar lying, because it is the type of dishonesty associated most strongly with the cookie-jar in a person's childhood. We all know the person is not so stupid that they do not know they are not allowed to take a cookie, just as a child is not that stupid, but still the child will lie and say they did not know, thought it was alright this time, that their elder sibling gave them permission, etc.

	Sometimes when a person, man or woman, has a big penis that they do not hide from the public, as the truth goes, it bothers people in government, law enforcement, and people generally responsible for national security. It is not illegal, in the context of this part, for a person to have a big penis and to walk around with it revealed to the public, and if a person is also permitted to have a gun, than by having a big penis that is revealed to the public when they walk about, and also having a gun, they bother people responsible for national security and attention is exhibited by harassments that instigate conflict that are mostly due to some being bothered internally by a person's big penis and possibly gun. If a conflict is instigated because of harassment due to the big penis and legal gun so that another agency is called in and forced to shoot the person with the big penis, the entire incident is viewed, at least by myself, as murder and even-premeditated murder, since due to zero lying logic, a person knows full well that they are harassing a person and starting a fight in which another person will be forced to shoot a person if they defend themselves. Just because this procedural option does not exist in other places, does not mean it is not fully understood by sentience for those responsible for investigating. Pushing a person into traffic, is what I call it, where the vehicle hits them and kills them, and the person who pushed them says they are blameless and their hands are clean of blood. Indeed, I see it as cowardly first-degree murder and believe the person who has honestly pushed another into traffic is deserving to be killed after an investigation and trial deems them guilty of first-degree murder. Of course the introduction of any new concept brings about the doubling of the concept, where a person pushes another into traffic using the pushing into traffic concept when it is considered murder, although there is no attempted pushing into traffic murder charge. If some have been murdered in the first degree because they had a big penis and a gun, although they were not breaking the law, it has been a disgusting and wicked time for the world in many ways.

	Of course this introduces something not included in The Diary of Lucifer which is the concept of human characteristic for both men and women, where male characteristics, penis, can also be found with women, although many men do not find it attractive for a woman to have a penis, although they are not offended by her existence, only many are not interested in women who have penis, or a big penis, and would more likely find it acceptable if such a woman was with a woman, in a same sex relationship, which has been possible and has occurred many times in the past. The sign of this is offered in the population of people in physical form. Now if any person is a sign for something, let it not be said, but allow the Lord to do His will, but make right the Earth that the sign will be well. Now if you will do right by the sign, than it is obedience to the Lord, and if you will do right by the sign and then right by the Earth, it is good.

	Now for what I call The Earth Sustainability Wave Hypothesis the Earth has a upper and lower bound for a wave that is within the Sustainability zone where a breach of the upper or lower thresh-hold enters the realm, for climate, society, environment or any other thing that is within the realm of humans and what they effect, of certain tragedy for the planet as areas outside the sustainable zone are deemed the catastrophe zone for Earth. In terms of climate, the season of advancing in industry has possibly lead to the upper ceiling or thresh-hold deeming that the reversal, and the season of bringing back the environment is now deemed necessary. The shift from focusing on constant industrial progress which involves removing the environment, must then be curtailed for the shift to focusing more on the environment and its progress, or return as we enter into the next season brought about by approaching the upper ceiling thresh-hold for the sustainability wave. If we have truly reached this upper ceiling, then in order to avoid the catastrophe zone for the Earth, according to the hypothesis, we need to shift the focus intentionally from the mostly blind building of industry to the highly conscious curtailing of industry for the purpose of supporting the environment and its return.

	What has been left out of The Diary of Lucifer because it is a particular thing of the day, is the portion of Esau that is partnered with the INCEL organization that is perhaps the majority, even all of the organization that is not the more puritanical portion, being the portion that is like a prophet but is considered a terrorist zealot because of terrorist actions taken, although the summary and truth of them is that they are fed up, indignant, upset about the hurt and lack of consideration in society, the materialism, disregard for spirituality where every person is a spiritual being, even atheists, lazy, or rather, unwilling to go further with a society when they cannot go further due to the corruptions and hurt that others are caused in a place where there should be righteousness and love. Often upset about the ways people are hurt by lack of consideration and goodness that is of people who are able, truly, to think. Indeed, not actually lazy, not actually unable to work harder to find romance, but unwilling to participate in what is not wholly clean and too tainted with corruptions of good and too much wrong, so that they revolt and shun the whole thing when they reach a certain place, and it is considered laziness for them, when in fact they are not lazy, but are not prophet supposed to be lazy? For they live in caves for the purpose of the Lord. Now is it really Esau? But indeed it is not Esau, but might be the grandson of Esau, or one of the sons in Jacob's line that were not noted in the Old Testament, that they are in fact a gentle and compassionate son, concerned deeply with spirituality and appalled by the lack of proper spiritual considerations in the modern world after the ancient days ended and we entered into a modern world where every person is still spiritual but considerations are no longer there. This is actually their angst but society has attacked them with so many lies, the angel has doubted even they can fully perceive what their own problem is, but they probably are closer to understanding it than those who have laid much accusation against them. Now a prophet does not take action, but gives all to God, that if He takes action, it is meant to be, and if He does not take action, it is not meant to be, and it is only because of their terrorist actions that they are not fully prophets, or inhabiting the place of prophets. Instead they have been considered terrorists and have been fought by soldiers and intelligence agencies. In ancient times, and ancient times after Christ, there were many cultures practising the understanding of people, and not the self-disabled descent of animals, as if people cannot understand things of people without having to make an argument, as if starting from a place of animal nihilism. People are people. We know what is right and what is wrong for people, and we advance from there. We do not practise a descent and disable ourselves and refuse to progress from the place of people, which is the thing of Babel. This is heavily part of INCEL's grievance, and the lack of considerations due to not reasoning as people, or merely accepting the things we all understand as people, essentially pretending to be stupid, has likely disturbed and troubled the INCEL so much that he has resorted to acts of violence and terrorism because of his being disturbed and his deep concern. Which son of Jacob's line, or Esau's line is this, and if he does not continue with violence, will he then be a prophet, or as a prophet for the people?

	People of the Earth are all spiritual people, even atheists, and what is displayed on television is not always an accurate survey or statistical study representative of the people. Atheists are against the evil lynchings, but what their future will be, I do not know, although they are not with any of the sons of Orgoth, although some recent disruptions have taken place in which a group of atheists has seemed to want discord between Islam and the West, something that can be understandable given the unique ways many atheists have been able to view the planet, with eyes seeing what others cannot, and although others might hold a grudge against them, I believe it is understandable for some groups to have made errors given what history they had to view and the information and analysis they were presented with. If atheists do not feel comfortable with Islam, perhaps it is understandable, and given that Muslims are because of the obedience of the angels, and different than other people groups, being the most considerate of angels of all the people groups, perhaps it is unlikely to expect that atheists will readily accept them as something other than what they view as the thing to be avoided on Earth, and atheists, being against many types of evil, seperated from the people, and yet one of the people, seeing what others are often unable to see, even if all are spiritual and care for feelings, in a way of wording it, or caring for spiritual things, even if those things do not extend to a belief in any deity or act of creation. They are often found closer to Adonijeh's brother, who is not apathetic, and is for reason as atheists are for reason when it comes to avoiding violence and violence in terms of unjust lynchings. Often seen as being intentionally offensive, they are in fact most often a people who can be trusted to have a clear perspective when lynchings and unjust violence begins, although they can of course be wrong, but should their presence still not be respected by those whose missions and roles are to carry out violence? Perhaps the rebellious atheists would not even desire such, as the idea of being included in a collusion, and not continuing to be outside the people, might be considered a tainting of their judgment, but it is for them to decide.

	As for the practise of offering a hypothesis, this book intends to offer different hypothesis' for those of Babel to prove or disprove, since little by little things are proven in Babel, small additions being made and Martha's younger sister sometimes baking the turkey to offer giant leaps of advancement to Babel where those who have made major contributions are often having names vanishing into obscurity among those not within Babel, unless they have won the Nobel Prize or made such an advancement that has become popular knowledge. There have been exceedingly intelligent and great scientists whose names are barely known to the masses and only maybe one or two of their achievements are generally known to students who are studying a subject, when they in fact made a great multitude of advancements and were as if a force of nature in their ability to make advancements. I will here offer my hypothesis I called The Universe Hypothesis which deals with any particle, especially light, that operates as both a wave and a particle. Essentially the theory is this: The Universe has its operating principles that have not yet been discovered, but will likely be discovered as elements of equations in applied mathematics. Second, the bonding of light, by observation, to something in the particle dimension, causes a wave to alter to particle form, and when released from the observation, or bond, the particle returns to wave form. This is called Universe or Universe Operating Space Chemistry and is a sub-category of Inter-demension Universe Chemistry where particles are ejected from our demension and an exchange is made with another demension where the same particle is returned in another location to our Universe. This is called Quantum teleportation and is actually another aspect of Universe Operating Space Chemistry, in the catagory of Inter-demension Universe Chemistry. As for the operating rules of physics for a Universe, or Space-Time, they are likely to be found with the core, or key equations that might be discovered in applied mathematics by trial and error, or by some greater understanding of the mathematics that allows for understanding the Universe in terms of math. If the Universe is based on a heirchy of logic, truth, than mathematics are required to discover the key laws of physics, or key laws of Universe Math that the Universe runs by. With this general theory that includes two items that have been unresolved by science, another possibility is presented, which is eliminating all particles around something that might keep it bonded to our Universe demension, that the object might break free of our Universe, be ejected into another dimension, so that the object might be returned (or a copy returned) in another location in our Universe. [Why no government agency will hire me, I do not know, but I suspect that they are apathetic to the advancement of our species and losing our competition with other countries on Earth.]

	The different houses of Babylon and the different houses of the people and the different tribes all seem to display different characteristics, and the house of Adonijeh's brother, as much of these things are described in The Diary of Lucifer represents, generally, the people, and not those who are of the different houses of Babylon. Essentially the house of Adonijeh's brother represents those of the people who are of that house, which is only common sense to assume, although in terms of kingship, it is the people in a democracy that has been anointed king, therefore in terms of a kingship, it is the all the people who are represented by Adonijeh's brother. Those who are the people are often Adonijeh's younger brother in many places and the grievances that some of them have when working with Adonijeh are not always addressed, although it has been considered and understood that Adonijeh can be a froward leader in many ways, something I have considered as being for consideration with concerns to democracy and the need for avoiding high-stress environments where high-stress is not required. If Adonijeh is still the elder brother, than greater consideration might still be made to ensure that the people are able to enjoy their work environment and do their jobs to their best capacity. As for neo-nazis, they do not have a spiritual cause of any kind, and if their goal is actually to destroy any country as part of their plan, rather than support white people there, than perhaps the governments of nations should give such information to the people. If their goal is not expressed, it is difficult to understand them, and if they are a menace in any way is probably unknown by the public. If they wish to sow discord between white people, one way of thinking against another, than the result can only be divide and conquer, and if not by them, than by some other group in the world. Essentially, sowing discord between white people would most likely be viewed as an anti-white supremacy action, but whether it is ever carried out by neo-nazis as double propaganda, is unknown. In ways, Jepeth has become an isolated type of tribe, and countries and regions have become isolated tribes, although in many regions, such as in the pluralistic and cosmopolitan North America, there is essentially the people, and those who are not one of the people much as it would have been during the days of Noah and afterwards before separations occurred. The different languages that have emerged do not seem to effect a culture so badly if they are absorbing concepts from almost every culture, since it seems to be more likely that if any problems can occur in this area, it is not the fault of language which provides access, but what is not yet discovered and understood, or what from an already available source is not understood. Essentially we have the Universal culture, which drifts into all differing cultures, which is the realm of humans and what is within the realm of humans. People are in fact finite and not able to be a fictional creation, much in the way slicing off their arms or leg would result in their quick death.

	This is even true for common sense when it comes to things like sting operations, where people are aware that police can manipulate the outcome of the sting operation once provided with some explanation that is facilitated by the defence attorney. Still, people trust that the police must know better about someone, and the result is an over-reliance upon a belief in the goodness of the police that might not always be there, and many times is actually not. To be naive to the concept that many police can actually be very bad would seem to be criteria that should keep any person off of a jury since the police are sometimes involved in committing crimes themselves and being paid money to do so, and sometimes politics, even city politics, plays a large factor in determining motive for the police to target a person with a string operation that can easily be manipulated to obtain a guilty verdict in court. The police are aware that everything they do, everything they say, is for the purpose of obtaining a guilty verdict, and an unaware citizen, who feels that their life is in danger if they do not play along, or that they will not be able to report the crime or help others if they do not play along does not have any advantage during a sting operation where the police are attempting to manipulate the evidence to obtain a guilty verdict.

	The police can be extremely political, and ideological in their motives for tampering with the process that decides if people should be in prison or not, and the types of attitudes that place the police as the main decision makers for a nation, rather than the people, can go directly to the top of the ladder and above and beyond, and come down the same way, and if the term police terrorism is too harsh for them, too bad, since that is exactly what it is, terrorism, political or ideological on behalf of the police and sometimes motivated by money provided to commit tampering against a person. With the concept of civilians being on the look-out, it would also imply that all civilians can stop the police from targeting a person and sending innocent people to prison. The system relies upon evidence and bias is not wanted for the operation of the system, so that when evidence is manipulated and even planted, there can be no trial, just as when a trial is discovered to be unfair it slips out of the hands of the court system as the trial cannot continue and by the procedure, the case should be dismissed in favour of the defendant. Those who have a problem with a person can prepare many things prior to an arrest and charges being laid, even character defamation that might be used at a later time. The court system is not designed to send guilty people to prison, it is designed to function as part of a system and it is designed to focus on evidence and fairness of the procedure, otherwise a case is dismissed. When the case in not dismissed when the trial is unfair, which can happen often, it is likely that an innocent person is in the process of being sent to prison and that those witnessing the event either have power to attempt to stop it or do not. There are civilians who work around the judges and police who might have more integrity than those who are participating and carrying out the wrongful imprisonment of an innocent person in terms of the crime. Police, like some others, are expert con artists when it comes to manipulating the system to a great and unfair advantage when they are attempting to do something, and it is not only a problem for one ethnic group, or visible shade of skin, but a problem for every ethnicity, every shade, where attempts by some to portray a problem as being only a problem for one skin colour can become distressing, and can hinder efforts to remedy the system better.

	After hundreds of years of policing in North America, there is likely nothing, not even a polygraph test, that cannot be sabotaged or manipulated by the police or others, since con-artistry of the type that places innocent people in prison has been progressively developing with the aid of experienced individuals to make the system almost completely useless and unreliable, in practise, when con-artists, police or not, have tampered with the system.	

	Computer hackers, who are hacktivists, can indeed be spoofed by other groups, which is where I have produced the term anti-hacker for those who are hackers who are against everything hackers are claimed to stand for. If a group is attacking a group claiming to be a hacking group, but the attack does not seem to make sense, then certainly it might be assumed it is a false-flag attack unless clearly demonstrated to be otherwise. Those using false-flag attacks are really only using some of the standard concepts of war like divide and conquer and other tactics. Groups that wish mostly for segregation more than anything else, often employ a type of name-based false-flag when they attack by affiliating themselves with more than just themselves but something that can be affiliated with them when they carry out some type of attack. If borders are ever wanted like a fence around a person's house, than there is no shame is discussing such things openly and terrorism is not required. Those who wish to integrate with each other are always welcomed to do so in most areas where cosmopolitan climates are expected. The concept of neutral areas, cosmopolitan areas, private areas or communities, are still concepts that encourage peace since with the existence of these areas there is no need to eradicate anything. I call this the ACPC society which I offer as a hypothesis for peace when it is required or wanted greatly by all. The ACPC society hypothesis entails different zones for different groups and cosmopolitan areas where all groups are together and can live side by side if they desire, most likely the choice being city downtown areas for the cosmopolitan areas and different suburbs that are restricted based on ethnicity, not including matters of romantic relationships, and married, where the purpose of the ACPC society is to offer a semi-emergency measure to establish peace when peace is consistently being threatened by attempts to eradicate and alter society with drastic measures due to grievances that are felt to be large enough that drastic measures are being taken on a larger scale. Essentially, the ACPC semi-emergency measure offers zones for the purpose of peace so that drastic measures are not claimed to be required any longer. There is in fact nothing evil, except by a pseudo-religion, about reasonable segregation when there is peace lacking in a society, and discussing such things openly is not something that any person has to be ashamed of, as reasonable segregations are a standard device used to establish peace. In North America, presently, any segregation itself is believed to be evil due to its large misuse in prior periods in history. Segregation in various forms is used by peace makers to attempt to establish peace when there has been ongoing conflict and is not considered taboo to speak about. The fact that many people of darker shade favour concepts of segregation themselves is, in my opinion, a sign that the situation is approaching the opinion where in the context of the discussion, all people are established and desire, in a mature and adult fashion, the concepts that help to maintain peace and offer some loose structure to a society where all people are established and respect matters of decency and the right to live in peace without other people groups encroaching into their semi-differing cultures. This is a sign that no people group is dependant on another, but that all people groups in a society are established and desiring to prosper.

	A considerate society that is not impious, that respects decency and real politeness that is not merely passive aggressive and hostile, might at times require The Diary of Lucifer to identify those rare individuals from every ethnicity who are brutal and impious towards the gentle and noble, and are not respecting decency in anything, who are not to be regarded by our society when we consider that all are one of the people, or that the vast majority can be, and that base people are resulting in discord that can be disregarded, for those who attack are also attacking their own. Situations where people are being passive aggressive and impious are to be considered just as impious and disrespectful as any other situation. Of course the diary should not required much in a society where people are good to one another and respectful, unless it is only wanted for wisdom. Whether a person identifies as a citizen of Salem, The Lost Tribes, The Enoch, The Elsnon, Muslim, merely Christian, or only one of the people, The Diary of Lucifer would not seem to be required as much when people in society respect decency to an acceptable fashion.

	The next item that can be discussed is the sheer concept of resistance to society, whether it be resistance to the second order or resistance to the government that is official, and the factors that generate dissatisfaction with the lack of change and proper managing of problems that hinder the people from realizing their dreams and potential, often focused on economics in a system of scarcity, known as capitalism, where core necessities must be addressed, in my hierarchy of needs for a peaceful nation. If Maslow had a hierarchy of needs, than I also have a hierarchy of needs that I offer as a hypothesis where the needs must be meet in order for a nation to be at peace and function appropriately. Food and Shelter being the core need of Maslow's hierarchy, would suggest that the people would need to be able to afford food and shelter first and foremost, although I would add being able to afford higher education, to the degree almost that higher education would be free, should also be added to the core realm of food and shelter, since given the practicalities of our society at present, a degree is often required to have a good paying job that can provide for a family in our system of capitalism. If this core need is not being fully met, than it is unlikely that the people will not turn to extremes such as terrorist gangs, even, in their frustration with society and what must change in order for them to be able to live peaceful and prosperous lives in their nation. Given that the political parties consistently fail to address priority needs of the people, the frustration can lead to crime to gain more wealth and support and even participation with extreme groups in a nation.

	Capitalism requires as basic necessities, affordable higher education in practical terms, affordable food and shelter, and affordable transportation if it is required. If there are more things, than they may be added by intelligence and objectivity. If communism is a sign that capitalism has temporary failed so that a nation must practise rationing among its citizens, then it does not seem reasonable that a nation practising communism would be attempting to spread communism to other countries for which rationing is not necessary. It also does not seem right, in my opinion, that a nation that is not performing as well by reasonable terms, would be attempting to spread its ways to other nations that performing better in the areas that are being questioned by another nation that is attempting to spread its worse performing ways in that same area. For instance, if many Muslims have a great respect for decency than it does not seem reasonable, in my opinion, to be attempting to spread alternative ways when there is less respect of decency in those ways, especially when another culture values its own practises. This might be seen as a form of arrogance, where self-praise has become externalized to the degree of a firm conviction that one's own ways should be spread to other people so that they might be better off, even when another culture values its own ways and views other places as performing worse in those areas. Hi-jacking television shows to show propaganda, where non-representative individuals are voicing their opinions and beliefs about something, does little to educate the public, unless the only intention is to help support an already established arrogance that one's own ways are better, even for other people. Why this would even be necessary, and is not seen as a pety and childish thing to do, as if a person was perceiving an argument against their own ways that was never there, is beyond me even still. If another culture does things differently and they are not criticizing your culture, than it seems unlikely there would be actual cause for contention.

	In The Diary of Lucifer I identified Muslims as being because of the obedience of the angels, almost to say, it is type of reward for the angels, except there does not seem a way I can find to adequately express the concept of Muslims being because of the obedience of the angels, but if a person is willing to compromise, to say it is like a reward for the angels and their obedience, than I would hope that no Muslims are offended by my lack of ability to express the concept correctly, as the limitations of our planet's languages might indeed require languages of angels to express some concepts correctly.

	Segregations wanted by Muslims to preserve and protect their unique cultures, are not, in my opinion, something anyone needs to be ashamed of expressing openly in reasonable discussion. Also, attempts to remove acceptable things from discussion and then to attempt to guide the people with the orchestration of great actions based on concepts that can be openly discussed, such as desires for segregation in terms of protecting culture and identity, seem to me to be more in keeping with aspects of the spirit of Adonijeh that is mentioned in The Diary of Lucifer in that the people, being king in democracy, and anointed king and supported as being king by the military that obeys God in all, or seems to go further in obedience to God than any other thing, is not a group being respected in the annoying way Adonijeh has acting like the people do not easily understand something, although the situation can become far worse when terrorist groups that are not Adonijeh, use violence, even mass violence, to sow discord and encourage segregation when adults are easily able to advocate for these things openly and in a reasonable fashion without any unnecessary manipulation in the form of mass violence.

	That being said, if I may be presumptuous, recent incursion by the West in their involvement in unnecessary wars in the Middle-East when they extend beyond dismantling terrorist operations and bases and are not for a reason even as rational as war for economic reasons where another nation is threatening to severely injure another nation's economy with economic decisions that in the context of history between the two countries, could be classified as a betrayal. These unnecessary wars are often viewed, not in political terms, but in religious terms, and cosmic terms, and the addition of efforts to westernize (or Christianize) people as part of military invasions can only strengthen support for the belief that the military incursions are actually cosmic threats, or religious threats against people in The Middle-East. If a more recent generation is exploiting the blessing of advancements given to past generations to carry out low barbarity that is the opposite of a display of exceptionalism, or good, it is my belief that the West might be risking losing our identity and with it, any real favour we might have had, including much of our righteousness, that would likely lead to a quicker than expected decay and fall. Of course pushing Palestine to a smaller strip of land would be the same effect as backing a bear into a corner, and the likely-hood of violence when this situation is left to remain as such seems to display a trust in some other source of governance to remedy the situation. One might as well attack a bear or rattle a hornet's nest if they would push a people group back to a smaller strip of land and then expect them to be peaceful neighbours after a short amount of time. Why would violence not be expected in such a situation and why would peace ever happen, magically, when such a situation is left to remain? If peace is to happen, than it is my opinion that a change must occur, independent and unaffiliated with The United States, who due to their many military endeavours, are considered unacceptable in the region, another country that believes that peace can happen magically, and expects more of people than can be demanded or expected, so much so, they are sometimes blaming other groups with guilt when they have pushed a people too far so that the inevitable can only occur. Now cannot soldiers still clean up the mess that others made, to defend their nation? Indeed they can, but the learning of strategy in what is done saves many lives and might it procure favour of the Lord? But I believe in God.

	Now does any wish to attempt to gain the Lord as an alley in our endeavours both in peace and war? But because I believe in God and see the wisdom in this, I may be asking all to understand what a portion can understand. Now why will you be brutal in cruelty to lay guilt where others have pushed them beyond the limits by injustice? But is the blood of these truly on their own heads, or is the blood not on the heads as guilt because of the many injustices that were committed against them? But I am for gaining the Lord, if He will be merciful, as an ally in endeavours of peace and war, that He is the Lord and the all knowing and all wise general, the King who resides over all the Universe, judging right and wrong, with the power to bless and the power to punish. Now who will be victorious by arrogance and self-praise, if the Lord has claimed they have been unjust?

	Now He is able to strategize when a people have committed injustice, and so to the one's who council and consider, who are as shepherds over the people, is it not reasonable to have the Lord's favour? Now by our ancestors we have profited, and once established and rewarded, are we not to do well with what we have been given, that we still cower from the fuller knowledge of the Lord, and the wisdom of obedience to Him? Now is it not foolish to do so, for though we provide for the atheists, and they give back and give much of value, yet do we not still go forward with what is only prudent? Now if only from fear, than is it not prudent to be considering the Lord? Now I speak to leaders and not to those for whom it would be blasphemy when they have tasks to perform. Now are not some of you considering the advantage of considering the Lord even if you do not have prophets that you know of and you do not have priests for the further circumcision of the nation, but you are having the kingdom of Heaven within you, that you are for obedience in what choices you have been given, that you are functioning among the people, as one of the people. Now if the tribes of Jacob are produced at a later time, as a later child, among Salem, that the 12 tribes are also citizens of Salem, than I have offered that it is good that no enemy to the region be near by area to Israel if it is ever to be possible, for many encroachments have already been made and if the later coming are not made allies by being enemies of Israel and they are not accepted as only an arrogant support of the West, that Israel is claimed to be part of the West, but if they are to be establishing Israel as an accepted neighbour, then Salem is able to be what it is meant to be on Earth, that by the addition of another entity it might be well for all.

	Now to remove the losing of face from the immigrant, to that none may be able to have weight in their reproach towards them, there is The Special Joining Provision Hypothesis that might state that immigrants will pay a small extra tax that will probably go to financing education for post-secondary school for the entire nation, so that the immigrants might be fully joined to the people, unable to be justly rebuked in much. For by the financing of post-secondary education with a small extra tax upon the immigrants, they are well joined to the nation. Now the abuse of such a concept would be considered an exaggeration that exceeds the definition of the concept and is categorized as something else, since exceeding a definition is in fact stating a non-comparable concept that would have a separate word and definition and which properties would be different. Now when an immigrant is one of the people, let them be brave to support another who is one of the people, for those who are one of the people will prevail, that it is prudent, for if the wicked lay and wait, if they strategize against a person who is one of the people, than the immigrant, if they are one of the people, may be brave to know that the wicked are not one of the people, and the one they would defend, to do right for, with bravery, is another person who should and will prevail with them, that the people will prevail against the wicked. Now if the immigrant is one of the people, loyal, abiding well with the law that they are not meeting the definition of a criminal, then why should they have respect of the wicked who were born in the nation when the wicked are preying upon another born in the nation who is one of the people? But the rebuke of the wicked is void air, as nothing. So the immigrant is defending right and freedoms, because they are one of the people, and those born in the nation, who are one of the people, also are defending rights and freedoms. Now it is so for those of all shades, who are one of the people, that they do not stoop to foolishness because of base people who are wicked, that they do not have respect of wickedness. Now if fair slaves of the fair are for troubling the one worthy to be a slave owner of slaves their own shade, for they are only slave owners of slaves their own shade, each shade, whether fair or darker, than if they are for troubling the one worthy to be a slave owner who is of another shade, than are the same slaves not also for troubling those worthy to be slave owners of their own shade? But why will any let slaves divide the people, for slaves are hating because of the yoke, but you do not give the same weight, as is common sense, to a slave when they are troubling slave owners as you would give to the words of a slave owner, for you know of the bias of slaves, that it is not bias, but only common sense to be considering the words of the slave owner who is not for being impious and brutal, but is a person for nobility in their behaviour. Now let is be understood, The slave owner is a person with mercy and yet a slave is brutal and will not relent to spare life. Now if there is a mechanism required to actually enslave those who are slaves, then of course it is understood that it would be corrupted by slaves, because those not one of the people will undoubtedly attempt to enslave one of the people, because they are slaves or enemy who are still dwelling among the people, even people below ur, for those below ur are not one of the people, and all their attempts to be above water require that the people must suffer and even die. Now a person below ur is not one of the people, and those who have been victims of crime are one of the people. Now be reasoning like people both men and women, and do not disable yourselves in your reasoning, for a nation is a spiritual thing, and enemies with credentials, are having what is a lie, being enemies by mala, and mala informs Ria, therefore if they have credentials, yet they are enemies in Ria as well, for be reasoning that mala informs Ria in all matters that you not disable yourselves. Now if any is a foolish spectacle to be enemies stating what is irrelevant in a situation, then by the right recompense they are bullied with a bludgeon rightly, for these are a foolish spectacle, a loose tongue, a weeping spirit of abandoning their diginity, a falling thing, crumbling at the feet of them towards whom they are not able to be at peace with, to be at peace with their existence. Now it is written for the people, for if any mentions what is irrelevant, yet they are falling and crumbling beneath, at the feet of another. Now Mala is discussed in the The Diary of Lucifer as being the spiritual, and Ria is the physical. Now Mala is the spiritual truth and Ria is the physical that is not truth if it does not match Mala. For Mala informs Ria and actions are Mala that effects Mala and might then inform Ria, if it is so.

	Now the wicked defend children against the Lord, and yet the children are with The Lord and only the wicked are not one of the people.

	Now a prostitute of selfishness, their children are one of the people and yet they are not. Now the people understand matters of fairness and right and wrong, but the prostitute of selfishness is nihilistic on behalf of their own things, and yet it would be as if a shame for her children, and yet her children are not touched by it, for it does not fall on their heads when they are being just and refusing to participate in what she does, for they do not wish for dishonour or the war of the woman who defends them in ways they do not need, to go to war when there is not good cause, that it is not defence at all, but discord and selfish evil against others. Now if false Jews of the devil form a cult that is nihilistic that they say, weakness is guilt, then they are even as the Jews of the devil, false Jews, who emerged upon the Earth to attack the two tribes remaining that are having the philistines as the enemy. Now the anointing, it is to the people with regards to Adonijeh, that the people are king. Now if those of David say, yet we do nothing because it is the will of the people, that we give the throne to the people, and yet it is the case that it is not the will of the people, and yet it is the meeting place that has betrayed, then it is true that communications are not much possible between the people and David. Now David is king and the meeting place is not always a woman, for sometimes a friend of the people is there, sometimes one like a brother, sometimes a mighty councillour to the people, one like another leader to the people, and any thing the meeting place might be. Now is it not forbidden for David to respect Adonijeh? But the heir has said to Adonijeh, it is forbidden for the king to respect you, for the Lord gives right and wrong. Now to Cessus, yet Adonijeh is still your elder brother, you are anointed king and you know what is acceptable. Now is a person from David not leader over you? Now to Joab, yet he is the elder of the heir, I have believed he is knowing what the prophet knew, and yet none could possibly be a fool if they did not understand Tamar, for Absolom was decieved by the matter that he murdered his brother, and to the brother who lay with her, she was a celebit and his sister, and indeed only the prophet seemed to understand and yet who could be called a fool for not understanding it? Now has the prophet given it still to the heir for some reason?

	Now the neo-nazis are occupying the realm of the highest son of Orgoth, who is described in The Diary of Lucifer as being one of the sons on the mountain Orgoth which is in hell, who occupies the highest shelf of that mountain, being called the third shelf. Now as for the shelf below the line of reason, this is called the first shelf and it is Orgoth's servant, who is accessible to all the sons of Orgoth, for Orgoth's servant is id and corruption, and jelousy as a reason. Now a zeolous tribe that was unknown to the people has dwelled in this place and it is brought out of hell to dwell on land, for it is zeolous against sin and is even for serving God, that he is a gentle and compassionate tribe that is zeolous against an area of sin, for much decency he cares about. Now those who remain on the first shelf after the tribe is brought out of hell, some of these are above the line of reason and most of these are below the line of reason, being unreasonable people, and wicked, and horribly corrupted with their injustices, cruel, abusive, and even like Sodomites and Gomorites. Reason is not found in their minds, but instead there is chaos and injustice. Slaves can come from that place, and they are as wicked slaves, who lack all reason. Now if any of them is not fulfilling their good to God, and it is the reason they are on the shelves of Orgoth, than they do not know there is a place for them on land, that the place has not been made known to them. Now the zeolous tribe, does he not support the heir of David, especially the sign? Now he does not take command from the sign or the heir, because he is servant of God. Now if Orgoth's sons recruit, and yet is it not only temporary, that they gather when there is a place for them on land? Now what is not being fullfilled that some dwell on Orgoth when they have a place on land, for Orgoth casts nets and yet they do not keep.

	Now if any is set on being a celebit, than what house does he prefer?

	Now as for those who are as tax collectors, who are hated because of their credentials, who are not welcome in society because of what they represent, these are not one of the people, and yet the angel is not one of the people, for he is not welcome either, spiritually, in society, and yet he is not as a tax collector, but Mohammad's people are considerate of angels. Now the souls of the people, they will not tolerate much those like tax collectors, and as for the angel, yet he is not one of the people. Now what has the angel heard? Yet he has heard stumbling blocks like weapons and many enemy prostitutes and their unjust foolishness. Now it is as if a war zone, as people call it, in many ways, and those with the devil are able to be deceived to fulfill their duties. Now the neo-nazis call themselves white supremacy, and yet they are not for this, but they will call themselves almost anything to gain trust, for their cause is the Nazis and to even eradicate some nations. Now they have gained trust of some of the fair shade by calling themselves what they are not, and they are in fact enemies of many nations, and they seek the Nazi agenda. Now even though all the people are Jews, yet they are against the nation entire, and they are against what they are not considering to be part of the Nazi agenda. Now religions are not part of their agenda, and yet would they not sooner take revenge against those nations which defeated the Nazis? Now these are not as country boys, and cities have wanted country boys and have instead been deceived to turn towards neo-nazis for what their own people could offer them. Now have not neo-nazis known that country boys are more capable than them and that these are their enemy? For country boys are capable, and yet the Nazi is often less capable than them, disrespectful, not interested in respecting the country and not interested even in white supremacy, they are concerned with Nazi ideology and the Nazi agenda, being the false-Jews of hell that emerged and spread upon the Earth at an earlier time, and emerge again in ways to be enemies of nations. There is no choice between one future and one past, as the Nazis might suggest to gain trust. Rather, white people are what they are, and things will be what they are, only what is certain is that the Nazi will not help any matter, and every attempt to sow discord is also an attack on white people, most often. Of course, white people must be discussed more when considering the Nazi, as white people are the primary audience to the Nazis attempt to gain support, and presenting themselves as white people's pit bull is not an accurate portrayal of what they are. They stir up trouble for white people wherever they can in the nations they are in, and then do not aid them when they might want help. They are in fact enemy invaders into any white-majority nation, and their main attempts are to further Nazi ideology and even attack a country that is a problem, not aiding white people, especially when those white people value democracy and freedom, and ideologies that can never be compatible with a Nazi regime. If we fought Nazis before, during the second world war, they were not all eliminated and we may have to fight them many times in the future before they are no longer appearing on our planet. Of course this does not change anything for white people, or even alter society, and eradicating Nazis does not even help to aid black people in their quest to better establish more of their people. Fear mongering about anarchy, and war against white people, seem to be wrong when considering the further existence of the police and the large population of white people on the planet. When black people, who are one of the people, are the main group that is contending with those black people who are sowing discord by being unreasonably contentious with white people, what more is there to say anymore, but that the people are established, the white slaves of white people are separated and the black slaves of black people are separated, and the people are the people, respecting each other's slightly different cultures and yet all identifying with morality and loyalty to morality, which is really the real loyalty to the nation. Then the war is mostly against slaves, who hate those who are worthy to be slave owners, whose brutal and impious ways and large lack of respect and even wickedness identify these as being unable to be part of society and given as slaves that must be separated from society. Now The Well Society Hypothesis is a hypothesis I offer for judging the extreme factors of society and its problems. The hypothesis asks regularly, which groups, with nuance and no broad generalizations that would include people who are not in that category, for the hypothesis calls for categorization, are the groups that are passing the limits and entering into extremes, especially when their behaviour is involving others? For instance, criminal gangs would be in this extreme, as might some people in the corporate world, and others who might be identified as exceeding functional societal norms so that society can be well. By identifying the groups passing into the extremes, a analyst might be able to determine what factors are contributing to greater instability for a nation, or area. Which group is instigating another group to be extreme, if there is any such factor? This is part of the hypothesis. Are any criminal gangs temporarily engaging in terrorism which might have to be addressed by the military? Are any homicides, actually the work of terrorist splinters that are operating in the country?

	Of course, those being persecuted must sometimes turn to crime for aid, and who can consider it crime in that case, only countries accepting refugees are interested in whether or not a person is involved in crime.

	An addition to The Diary of Lucifer is that the strong hand represents the media, and it is a very strong hand indeed, that alters stories as it wishes and chooses which stories to cover and how to cover them. The strong hand is strong, able to wield information as it wishes. Who controls the strong hand depends upon the situation, and hopefully there is a commitment to integrity that is held accountable by watchdogs, in any way, that might ensure that the media is operating with integrity as it reports information. When genocide occurs, it is often done in layers, first the initial group and then other groups until the genocide is complete. If the media is able to report when groups are only being targeted for homelessness, or bankruptcy as part of a group's effort, in a way that would be considered terrorism, then it is more likely, in my opinion, that the media is able to function properly. The exploitation of a crises to eliminate groups from being able to work and obtain their goals is a likely act of a terrorist organization that I call The Non-Deadly Elimination Attack which might be employed by terrorists, and probably has been many times to some degree. Shaping a society by identifying possible threats early, before a student might even graduate from College, is another item worth considering. The expansion of CSIS, in Canada, and the continuation of diligent investigation and analyses would likely be a great benefit to Canada, although if something should turn bad, I cannot foresee it. That being stated, the ability of terrorists to exploit The Emergency Act in Canada for their purposes when there is a crises, should be very obvious to those who understand how terrorism works. Much terrorism is in fact, non-lethal and unreported by the media, and it is often only when a terrorist organization wants to send a message, that they carry out attacks that will be broadcast in the media. The police obscuring and covering for terrorism in a nation, is a real problem that has likely been ongoing for hundreds of years. While the police do have a job to do, the reality is that there are too many police officers to keep a eye on them, and the ability that they have to pick and choose which people to charge, and to keep things from reports, makes it inadvisable to rely on the police even a little when investigating and keeping a watch on terrorism in a nation. Simply, the police lie, and can lie to other agencies and it does not seem good in any situation for another agency to rely upon the police. Police officers can serve as a special collection agency and so can others, even those considered pety thieves, and as for computer hackers being a problem, it is in fact the anti-hackers who are the real problem in society in addition to the computer crackers who are attempting to profit. Attempts to sabotage things that are good, can be the acts of foreign terrorists or domestic terrorists, and even sabotaging people at the individual level can be the work of those loyal to terrorist causes. As for the more common criminal harassment campaigns to drive people out of a building or area, they can be carried out by those not affiliated with a terrorist gang or those who are affiliated to some degree, even if only in a less official fashion.

	As for the false Jews, who are often appealing to concepts of animal nihilism, being Jews from hell, it can be understood that according to survival of the fittest, if any would believe in animal nihilism and not comprehend the societal norms for the functioning of human societies rather that what makes sense for less intelligent and not advancing animal colonies, than it is easily known that these are not the fittest and are quite reasonably at the bottom in terms of their ability to properly comprehend things that sentience lends without effort. Of course, no person must fit in with a fool's invented ideology to be considered unbiased, especially when it comes to the obvious foolishness of appealing to the animals and the way their societies function when we are speaking about human beings, who are sentient and part of advanced and technologically progressing societies. If Adonijeh is a Jew who is not a citizen of a country like Canada, he hi-jacks and leads the entire police force and makes the whole of it Adonijeh with a small percentage of the police officer population. Essentially he does not regard the life of the citizens of the country, and easily regards all citizens as criminals. Supporting trechory against our nation would be commited by him on impulse, for his heart leads him, and he is a person lead by his heart, and his heart will devour the citizens whether criminals or not, and will cover for attacks against the people, whether from terrorism or other factors. These types of Jews are called type 2 Jews, even anti-Jews, and they are found among all people groups, enemies of the people, whose hearts lead them to devour the people and what is good. Are they traitors? But they need nothing more than their hearts to make them traitors. Jelous to the degree of homicidal, some of them are impulsively driven to kill those who please God, for their jelousy is very homicidal, and their impulse is too strong for them to control. Now there are killers of many good people who please among the anti-Jews, and these are often concealed, excellent actors when questioned, experienced in knowing what to say, and how to behave, and yet they are extremely dangerous and can be lethal, for they are homicidal when driven to kill those who please God, preying even on sons and daughters with no regard for them as family, with no regard for any person who they are driven to kill with an uncontrollable impulse. The will of the devil they will do, and these types of anti-Jews, emerging from non-Jews and Jews alike, are very dangerous and a plague to all people. Now anti-Jews are not real citizens, although they are not sociopaths and are able to play the part of citizens to a convincing degree. Now some of these are Adonijeh, and others, other things, and yet Jezebel has repented, and the angel is believing she should have a new name. Now it seems to the angel that it is because of the Christ that she repented. Now the anti-Jews are not Jews but are low things and foolish, and they are homicidal. Now if any instigates and sends out police, are not the police likely chosen, and domestic terrorists, or even foreign terrorists, that they are chosen specifically for the task, that it is not the citizen's police who come but those who are loyal to another cause, that you know that these may be looking for opportunity to slay a person, and yet if they are not given a chance, then how can it be? But leave witness and let it be known that you have done so for do not experienced people know how to instigate? But many murders have been carried out in this way. Now those who slayed them were not police of the citizens, but traitors and imposters who had infiltrated the police for a cause and a loyalty to another group. Now these, did not David cut off their hands and hang them upside down over a pool? But those who kill in such a way away from the acceptable realm of war for a war, these are those who even if they have killed a very horrible criminal, they must also die because of the wickedness of what they did.

	Now the gentle, these are not the anti-Jews who are not Jews, but if they judge, and yet they are with wisdom and are gentle, these are not those who I have written about. Now what have I considered for the house of David? But it is written in The Diary of Lucifer about David being the only adult who was found on Earth when the angel visited, and this does not consider Mohammad's people in any way, for they are as if a separate house in the area that the angel did not visit. Now it is not my place, I considered, to be parenting David's children, but I come to offer some advice, for the house was filled up with many unruly children and those who were hired help were also as children, no better than the children, and they were not hired to care for the children. Now if David was the only adult in the house, then there were no other real adults, in earnest, to help him take care of the children, and I considered diversification by the addition of many adults, and not a single adult, was probably the best idea to provide safety for the children in the event that some of the adults might be unworthy to take care of the children. Now David is able to be given these things, and the angel did not visit to tend to the children or to parent the children and was not concerned with the contentions between the children as some of the childish, hired help was concerned about in their childish meddling in what was not their concern or business. Now David is the parent, and his children are free, as are all children, to be different people, and explore and pursue their own interests. Now each child is different and is interested in different things. Now there is nothing wrong with being a rebel, and it is not even what is considered rebellious, for it is not rebellious towards God to be a rebel. Now false Shepard have angered me a little, and I only offer advice and do not wish for any to think I am like a messiah or leader to them. The Christ came to be their messiah, and the Lord is their teacher. Now has not David, in his wisdom said, let my children be their own people? Now has he not said, yet I will stand back and let the one I have chosen to be my heir be king? But David is still king. Now from what I understand, but I do not know, it has pleased David that his chosen heir be king. Now the sign of Solomon has appeared on Earth, and indeed the people are a little odd in this time in history, and yet they are still the people who are David's heir. Now those who are David's heir, they are the people, and not military level, but civilian level, and yet some might still be in the military, for is there not much disorder upon the Earth? Now the problem is not with our own people, but with those who are not one of the people, and when they do not respect citizens, then it is known, or suspected, for the people know what type of lack of regard and enemy behaviour is of one who is not one of the people. Now be using the full wisdom of people, that some are enemies and yet it is their heart that has the cause, and they are just as much enemies as those who join a terrorist gang, just as much committed to being enemies and attacking the people, and just as much coordinating with other enemies and forming gangs, because of their hearts, as those who do so in other ways. Now let not your understanding and wisdom be disabled by the foolishness of what was not understood. But there is the cosmic war with some between the devil and those who please God, and the cosmic war in the hearts of some, that is like Adonijeh who declares himself king and the cosmic wars are just as real, and sometimes more so, and even more deadly, in physical fashion, than those wars that they speak of in a disabled tongue, between nations on a physical map. Now they call this disabled tongue, the Gentiles, in the Bible, and yet who is a Gentile anymore? But the disabled tongue of Gentiles is with the remnant of Benjamin and Joseph and with the Jews who have emerged all over the Earth, that they have more than two thirds of the Earth. Now one man died in Israel, and most of the Earth is taken for the Lord. Now there is no such thing as a terrorist atheist, and there cannot be. But if any is a terrorist, do not believe they can possibly be an atheist, for it cannot be. Now if they say, I am an atheist, and yet they have a cosmic and religious thing in their heart and mind. Now an atheist, they are one of the people, when they are one of the people, and it common for an atheist to be one of the people, and yet they are also separate from the people, separated in a fashion that it must be this way for they are not as the other people. Now are they not in some ways to be considered a thing agreeing in some ways with David's heir, who he chose to be king? But let things be what they happen to be, that the reality always be understood. Now atheists are not citizens of Babylon, and they are not anything. They are not building Babylon, or helping to build it or supporting it, for they are atheists. Now if any says they are an atheist and yet they are supporting Babylon, yet Babylon is a religious thing, a thing of the devil, and it is not atheism, for an atheist is not a citizen of the devil's, and Babylon, also, is a religious thing and a thing of religion, that if any is Babylonian they are a member of a religion in their hearts and mind, although Babylonians are following many cults and spirits, injured by Babylon and cults of wealth, that are for poverty, and all the deceptions used to injure, and their nihilism, their great compromising of morality, their lies, and their nihilistic and worthless ways that injure themselves, their wicked doings, and their false purities, and their religion for acceptance and even for business. Their cruelties are many, unspeakable, and they are many below ur, many who are impious and disgusting because of their sense of lacking worth and their sense of inferiority, liking even the false purity of being below ur that they are pure in their own eyes. Now for the pure, is not Babylon an abomination?

	But as for the neo-nazis, they are no longer neo-nazis anymore, or for that matter white supremacy, for they have abandoned white supremacy and all they do at this time is sow problems for white people. At present they have changed their gangs to anti-religious, and mostly anti-Christian pursuits where not just disabled people like war veterans and disabled elderly people are attacked for exploring spirituality, but also child molestation and rape victims on disability are attacked often by neo-nazi gangs that specifically attack rape victims and child molestation victims under the claim that they are exploring spirituality in some wrong way. Of course neo-nazis are not Christian, and their shift from being white supremacy and neo-nazis to their mostly anti-religious pursuits indicates a great betrayal that has been mostly unreported, as not much news about neo-nazis gangs ever makes it into the newspaper or television media. Essentially, they are more like INCEL at this time, and have made a major transition into being pro-white pedophile and pro-white rapist. What does the swastika indicate at this time? Essentially it is now the unashamed mark of open pedophile defenders and defenders of rapists, who will attack victims under claims of wrong spirituality whether the claims are true or not. No longer are these gangs white supremacy, or even interested in supporting white people, or any type of nationalism, although the continued effort to ensure that society believes they are white supremacy is what often allows them to continue to operate. If past generations of neo-nazis believed something, the present versions of neo-nazis is something very different.




Proverbs for the people and sayings:




	if your problem is with me, do not try to sow discord.




	Some have worked very hard to be an excellent servant, and some to be another thing, and yet a bond servant causes confusion by their desire, and yet a servant they are, and the one who has not worked is given the inheritance of the kingdom. Now this is what God has chosen, and it does not seem fair or make sense to some why more work should not inherit the kingdom, and the one who had not worked will be given the prince-hood and the kingdom. The saying is this: Tessal. God is confusing but you have chosen to be a servant.




Now a letter must be included about what the neo-nazis have been doing and what they are. Now slaves, as we all know, are physically fit and strong physically and have no physical defects, for they are fit for the field and made for hard labour and all types of physical labour. Now the slave uprising that is called neo-nazis, has been impious, as slaves are often impious, which is only expected, and they have even been promoting their own attributes as slaves as being what actually matters, such as physical fitness. Now as we know, slaves do not like religion, and consider religion to be the enemy, as religion, of course, leads to slave owners obeying the Lord and enslaving those who the Lord has chosen to be slaves. Now the white slaves have taken a stance that those with physical problems and other such problems who are exploring religion, are somehow the enemy and they have been impious in these regards due to what what it represents. Of course, slaves have even been disrespectful, telling slave owners to get a job, as if slave owners should be working and not slaves who are white working for those worthy to be slave owners. Now there have even been slave uprisings against religion, because religion, of course, is the luxery of slave owners, and leads to slave owners doing what is right, and obeying the Lord with regards to slaves. Now atheists, on the other hand, are not slaves, which does not even have to be said, of course, and they are often a little softer on the slaves, for they are known for being gentle in these types of matters, and the Lord bless them, they are good people and not for the cruelty that must be carried out against slaves by slave wranglers, and the atheists are indeed our citizens, but of course, for all our good, and the good of the atheist even, we cannot disobey the Lord and listen to the atheist much. Now it is not a slave owners responsibility to be a slave wrangler or a servant tamer and neither of these pursuits are often considered fitting for a noble slave owner, for it is the belief that if there is a problem with a slave or servant than a slave wrangler or servant tamer should be called in some way to deal with the problem, although there is of course nothing wrong with those slave owners who consider it necessary to be unconventional at times and tame servants and even wrangle slaves if there is considered some type of emergency, although the practise of slave owners doing either is discouraged by us, as not honouring the Lord and being respectful of him in what actions we as slave owners take, for a citizen should not stain their hands with such actions, and yet a slave wrangles hands are clean and when slave owners defend slave owners, their servant taming is clean and their hands are clean. Now we know of course that neo-nazis are not white supremacy, but they are for furthering the goals of white slaves and this does not even have to be discussed anymore, for the white supremacy claims they have made, are utterly dispacable, given what they are, and what they do and the way in which they only sow problems for white slave owners, that they merely call, sowing discord, as if the actions were not a great abomination. Now these renegade white slaves, though the military is busy, and we understand, must be wrangled by the military which is competent to wrangle slaves, as is Prince Rellium, or RCMP, who is also capable of wrangling slaves and dealing with the white slave uprising that has been directed in many ways against white slave owners. Now as for the Jew, Adonijeh, I do not place must trust in him, for although he is a very good man, yet he is often disrespectful of our people at times, more often when our white slave owners have been treated with injustice and are in a bad predicament, almost disrespectful in an opportunistic fashion, and I have found this idea hurtful, that some of our white slave owners have been treated in a disrespectful fashion by the Jew, Adonijeh, for our own citizens are dismayed that any of them have been targeted by injustice and crimes and are in a bad predicament, which we as slave owners consider an occasion to help other slave owners, as fellow citizens, which is why I doubt Adonijeh, though a good man, is really have the attitude of a citizen and a white slave owner in Salem, or what others have called Canada. Now earlier I railed against neo-nazis, because I was attempting to aid the military that they could more easily attain permission to wrangle the white slaves who are involved in the uprising against white slave owners, and I do not apologize if I labelled the slaves as something slightly different than what they are, because it was still essentially true what I said. Slaves, of course, are brutal, rude, and though we educate them highly in some cases, they do not truly understand much of anything, and are not aware even of what they want and why they do things, for they are not possessing the awareness of a slave owner, or I should write, a person worthy to be a slave owner. Now it is still good for slaves to go to schools sometimes and obtain high marks, although it is known that they still are not capable of concepts like true wisdom and understanding and that much of what they learn is not ever applied correctly, for they do not use knowledge correctly, which is borrowing a little from a concept introduced by the Jews, with regards to fools, although slaves are worse than fools. Essentially they lack awareness and governing skills, even in terms of self-governance, which is why they often are excessively rude, upset about things that do not matter, failing to understand simple concepts, and utterly chaotic in much of what they pursue. But there is no use arguing with a slave, and indeed given their lack of awareness, it is a waste of time. Of course, some slaves are impious to the degree that eventually it might be determined that they need to either be separated from slave owners, or have their tongues cut out, the later being a practise I do not condone since I am not even comfortable with ideas of slave wrangling, but understand that is necessary, and the idea of dismembering a slave, in terms of anything, even their tongue, is far too brutal for me. Of course, what we know about slave uprising is slaves attack and begin to act like they are the masters regardless of objective truth, to be impious in their attacks. This behaviour is not much different than slaves at any time, even when there is not an uprising, since it is only expected that slaves are brutal and impious and given that we would put them in chains and treat them like beasts of burden, it is only expected that they would be the way they are.

	Now if any slaves have marked themselves with the marks of slaves, well, slaves are strange, and they lack much awareness. In fact the lack of awareness of slaves actually explains much of their behaviour, and what they do, although they are generally consistent and right in their attacks of slave owners in terms of reason, although they are of course, having no right to attack slave owners. Now white slaves are white people's slaves, and black slaves and black people's slaves, and brown slaves are brown people's slaves, and there is no more to it. Why any of these slave uprisings are claiming nationality is some cases does not make sense, but people have seen stranger things, and of course if another people's slaves are causing problems for us and them, then it is only neighbourly and reasonable that our slave wranglers who are military would go to other places to wrangle another people's slaves. Now as for slave uprisings, they can be in the form of illegal military tactics that are not legal for the battle-field, and all terrorist organizations are likely to use such illegal technologies and tactics, even turning areas in semi-torture camps as part of splinter tactics to disrupt an enemy country, desiring mass shooters, race wars between races, general discord and civil wars to emerge, acts of violence, mayhem, etc. The purpose of torture camps of this type are not likely meant to sow discord, but of course they could be used for that as well. Rather the purpose is to be like a splinter for a country, to cause violence and mass shootings and disrupt an enemy country as much as possible. The use of low volume devices, public harassment techniques, anything that would be illegal on the battle-field, can be used in such areas in North America by enemy splinter forces that are targeting citizens specifically and in masses. Essentially the military is required to deal with these situations, as they are military-like incursions against another nation, and there is the possibility of booby-traps, and armed enemy forces that have to be delt with by trained military people. As for low volume harassment, if it is prolific enough in an area, it can indeed turn an area into a type of torture camp, and it is unlikely that a citizen will be able to locate any of the sources of the public harassment that is in the area. The fact that hearing these things will be labelled delusions, makes it unsafe for citizens to properly deal with and talk about. Now committing extreme terrorism, by the definition of what constitute terrorism, is a sign that a person is a slave when that terrorism is really terrorism, and yet it is not actually the only definition of a slave, for slaves are brutal, impious, military-level bullies, and bullies with words that could only be found in Sodom, words of desecration, that a slave owner would not likely be capable of uttering. Now slaves are usually impious and servants can be impious and it is even expected. Now men have had problems with self-esteem, but there are many servants who are proud, having little humility and they are very hard-working, comparable to a woman in this way, and there are women who have chosen to be servants, and yet the male servant is not often lazy, but is able to work longer hours for a prolonged period and he has even be proud of this, and there is nothing wrong with his boasting that he is able to work and has more energy and is able to work consistently, and yet a man is often more lazy, more spiritual, placed with the burden of the things of God, as a man, having to cease his labours at times, and this, too, unbelievably, and in a disgusting fashion, has been persecuted as part of the servant uprising against slave owner, and many people have been attacked by the servant uprising that mostly targets men, but also targets women. Now this is not even Babylon, but has been the continued servant uprising. Are men lazy? Indeed, they are, and burdened by the things of God, and yet they are not what would have ever been called lazy, except by comparison to the hard working male servant.

	Now a slave says work and work harder to the person worthy to be a slave owner, because their soul fears the yoke of slavery. Now there is the servant uprising and the slave uprising and both of these uprisings are against those worthy to be slave owners, and against the Lord. Now tax collectors, in addition, and even enemy prostitutes, and servants, and different people who are not able to find a place in society have many times desired to build an alternative society, and yet they go directly to building Babylon and yet it cannot be permitted as Babylon is harmful, a dangerous thing against any nation. For it is something from hell on Earth. Now the Lord's kingdoms are in society as people are in society and it is not good that the slaves are not enslaved and yet if there is ever such a crime against a slave owner, there will be no mistake, for it is not possible to mistake a slave owner from a slave. But it will only be a retaliation against all slave owners, an act of war in this way to retaliate. Now if men are burdened with God, and yet soldiers are burdened in another way, then is it not acceptable? Now there are two type of soldiers who fight, and it is the soldiers of cities and the soldiers who are military and Prince Rellium is also having soldiers. Now the house of David is not the house of Mohammed and the King of Salem is having Prince Rellium and many other things in Salem, or Canada. Now Salem is able to have the house of David and there are many things of Salem in Salem, and there is even the ideology of the NDP, which seems in many ways a thing of Salem. Now the king of Salem, is he not much close to Abraham, or Avram, and what has the angel been? But he has been the sign of Solomon, the king of Salem, and other things, and he has been Lucifer, when it is so, and the king of Salem has said, Adonijeh is a very good man, but he is foreign, and does not know Salem as well as some, and yet he is soldiers of the cities, many of them. Now he has said, yet Adonijeh is not much of a citizen, and is it not so? Yet the king of Salem has not hated Adonijeh and has taken much aid from him, so that it is almost hard to measure how much aid he has taken. Now to David, there is no problem with him or his chosen heir to the throne being in Salem, and it does not interfere with the king of Salem. Now the king of Salem has said, yet though the people should be free, yet Babylon should not be built and should even be resisted, even though the people should be free, for Babylon is dangerous to any nation, for it is a disease that grows into a harmful and dangerous beast that attacks a nation that it is found in. Now there are almost no words for how evil it is and what it does. Now David's heir has complained that Adonijeh does not wipe out Babylon where it grows and yet what word does the king of Salem have from David or his heir, but he knows more about Adonijeh. Now angels do not blaspheme when they wear gold and silk, and Mohammad has been very considerate of angels. Now heaven uses technology in Ezekial, and why is it even having to be mentioned? But cannot heaven use technology? But indeed, it can use it. Now zion, being the hackers who are not evil, is there some greater purpose for them, that they seem to be, many of them, associated with houses of angels? But anti-hackers, are they not with hell? Now slaves are not really religious although many of them are found in houses of religion and slaves have called a son worthy to be a slave owner, a bastard, as if they are not a member of the people. Now an only child is as if not one of the people, and yet they are, and slaves have called many bastards and those below ur, when those who are the people are saying that one is not one of the people, there is usually one below ur among them.




Now as for those police departments that are mercenary departments with mercenary officers, these will take money, large bribes to the department and bribes to themselves, and there is no problem of guilt, for they are mercenary soldiers of cities, are they not? For they will carry out the duties of police officers and yet they are mercenaries, and they have money from other places, so that even those business people who are chosen from a terrorist gang to be business-people, who have the support of a terrorist gang in their business pursuits, by which they expand and attack other businesses in order to establish their network of businesses that are owned by a terrorist organization, buying up franchise places, even, in order to create an environment where they are better able to generate wealth for their terrorist organization with the help of a terrorist gang that can support their business efforts while they also target some of the citizens in negative ways. Of course national security issues and threats are not video games, and if the bank accounts of these business-people should be frozen and their assets seized, and themselves pressed with charges, it is only that national security is not the same realm as the realm in a democracy where people are able to pursue their goals with the freedom of citizens. This is a realm where the government is not dealing with citizens who are business people, and if they seem to sometimes behave in a tyrannical fashion, freezing bank accounts and using tactical teams to raid a person's house, it is because the domain of terrorism is not the same as the realm of citizens. Essentially this is more like a military realm, where warrants can be ignored, and there is more flexibility to protect the country from terrorists. Business people who own a large variety of businesses and have the aid of a terrorist gang in their pursuits so that other business people are threatened in illegal ways, and citizens are placed in danger, not only to generate wealth for a terrorist organization, but also to use businesses in a country to attempt to seize control of the country. Prince Rellium's people are made up of every ethnicity, and this can be an asset when dealing with a variety of threats from all different cultures and ethnicities. Essentially, Salem has enemies, and its citizens are its assets. The targeting of assets to a nation is not uncommon for terrorist organizations.

	A mercenary police department can then be viewed as a national security problem when they are taking money from people who might actually be members of terrorist organizations, even if it is not known to the police departments. Terrorist organizations gather intelligence from various places just as any intelligence agency would, and knowing where to find a corrupt police department would only be part of a terrorist organizations intelligence gathering. The need for the NSA, CIA, CSEC, and CSIS to be able to gather much intelligence becomes more apparent when it is realized that the quest to do so is not based on some authoritarian spirit that desires to be fulfilled, but is instead fuelled by an actual understanding of the many threats that can target citizens of a nation. Being able to protect citizens from terrorists and foreign countries that are exercising inappropriate influence in our nation is only a better option than allowing our citizens to be attacked while our country is torn to pieces by incursions into our nation. The addition of sociopaths does not help, although the assumption of sociopaths is not often the right concept to rely upon as a citizen who is dealing with an area of the country that might be seized in many ways by illegal influence. The furthering of slave goals by terrorist organizations that are part of slave uprisings against those worthy to be slave owners, is only part of the problem when a person might consider the addition of foreign influence that is targeting citizens, or assets, as part of their quests to orchestrate influence in a nation. This, too, is part of the cold war, and if a citizen ever has to flee their country of origin, it does not necessarily mean that the country does not want the citizen, only that as part of the cold war, the enemy forces were too strong, and the citizen had to flee because of enemy forces seizing much of an area and continuing to target a citizen who was identified as a threat to their goals in some way. If an asset is considered to be better off in another country, or if a foreign influence does not think their country to have them, it is possible they will target the asset. Going after a nation's best and brightest, or most capable, is essentially reasonable for an enemy to do when fighting a dirty cold war against another nation. Bankrupting, distracting, hindering, sabotaging, is essentially reasonable for an enemy group to carry out against an asset of a country they hate, and the naive belief that a group such as neo-nazis would actually not want to utterly destroy a country like Salem, or Canada, has allowed the slave uprising to trick many citizens into cooperating with them and giving their support. In other situations, if something occurs, or is occurring and a war veteran is the only war veteran in the area, or seems like the likely person to fit some type of profile, they might, inexplicably, be caught up temporarily in the cold war, possibly for the purpose of gaining access to their computer so that their hard drive can be attained. If the officers who show up are dirty, they are of course not the nation's police officers, but officers who might want an excuse to shoot somebody. The cold war is full of imposters in various areas who essentially have no interest in average citizens most of the time, but are still present, regardless of what people believe. Of course, Prince Rellium, or what some call the RCMP, has already admitted that terrorists are encouraged to join the police forces of a nation if they can, and other groups as well. Placing terrorists in every area of a nation where they can be placed is a way that terrorist organizations attempt to gather intelligence and exercise influence in a nation. Of course, liberals, and not capitalist liberals, or fake liberals capitalizing on other people's views, tend to consider any type of terrorist or foreign influence as being a conservative entity, or something right-wing, and not identified as something that is to be respected in another person's culture. Essentially, it is the evil that liberals are against with concerns to their own people, then to be found with another people, and clear attempts to exploit something that is not even there might be considered a very deliberate attempt to bully and even blaspheme righteous sentiments of liberals in a situation where it is only clear that they are dealing with a right-wing entity, or what liberals view as being right wing. Of course, this should be obvious, which is why deliberate attempts might be viewed as the actions of an overly deliberate actor who is engaged in some type of deliberate attempt with a goal. What do many terrorist organizations desire? Lack of unity among the people, not so much segregation, but racial discord that a nation might be more destabilized because of it, so that attempts to sow racial discord, even using oneself, by deliberate actors pursuing a goal, might more likely represent attempts to sow racial discord against an entire nation, a selfless act for an objective military-type purpose against a nation.

	As for the police, there is the mercenary, the dirty cop, the domestic and foreign terrorist, and many other types of none police that can be found within the cold war in which intelligence agencies are perhaps the only agencies who can hope to achieve protection for citizens. Helping good citizens who are being targeted by corruption and terrorism is something that a nation's intelligence agencies could play a larger role in, as it might ensure that more citizens are able to pursue their freedoms safely in their own nation.




ON SLAVE OWNERSHIP:




Now the female slave is not a woman, for she is insolent, brutal, and like a combat soldier in her relentless and stubborn attacks, like a brutal animal that fights to the death, being outside of the limits of humans in her combat-like stubborness and attitude in which she is not part of society, and not comparable to a man or a woman. For women are not able to withstand the types of assaults that are sometimes brought against her, and a man, unless he was a combat soldier, would not behave in such a way. Now is she a man or a woman? But when it comes to a female slave, it is hard to tell for anyone whether she is a man or a woman, for female slaves are almost just as much male as they are female, mannish, and yet still women, there is not much different with a female slave, for they are sexless, in a way, brutal and meant for hard labour in the field, and no person, man or woman, need feel guilty for placing a chain on her and placing her in the field, for she is both man and woman, and yet more a woman. Now the woman is...well, does any human really need to mention that a woman is a woman, and not a slave, for she is not treated even close to how the female slave is treated, for she is a woman, usually treated kindly, and yet rude slaves speak about private things concerning her, such as saying she is sensitive and so forth, which is offensive. Now men and women both are sensative, for they are not slaves, and it is those insensitive slaves who have sometimes been educated that are speaking with brutal mouths of the woman and what is not nice to be speaking of her, for speaking of such private things is not being considerate of her, just as speaking of men is not considerate. Now these are things of humans, and not of the barbaric, animal-like nihilism of slaves and their nihilistic ways of speaking that are reserved strictly for the animal-like topics of academia, which is the only place set aside, where it is considered acceptable to speak about such things, that, of course, and in books, which is the portable academia that travels. Now it is not polite to speak about such things as psychology and the private things of men and women, outside of the realm of academia, and in books, of course, as such things can be used in an impious fashion when outside of academia, and the fact that some brutal people have been disrespectful of people's sisters, and that some brutal slaves have been disrespectful of men who are not slaves, and are thus sensitive, using psychology and fake psychology, is of course a symptom of having our societies slaves roaming about free and out of chains and causing chaos in society.

	Now the proverb is, It is not good for a slave owner to dirty their hands with anything regarding servants or slaves. Now where a servant or slave is being impious, and both are likely to be at times, slaves more often, and it is even expected of servants, though not as often, and it only makes sense that such should be the case because of the unfairness that is perceived, then it is not considered good that a person worthy to be a slave owner should dirty their hands, is the expression, with servant taming, or slave wrangling, but a slave should not be delt with on their own, and neither should a servant. Now the police are not able to help as much as is needed, and the military is only giving aid when there is a matter of a slave uprising or perhaps, in a rare case, where slaves and servants are working together as part of a larger slave and servant uprising that has become increasingly horrible.

	Now again, as for female slaves, they are able to take very brutal servant taming and without even the slightest effect on them, for it is like attacking a mountain with a flimsy stick and they do not relent even at the most brutal servant taming that is not permissible to attack a person with, man or woman. Now a female slave will only keep attacking, without effect, almost as if servant taming is as nothing to them, for they are slaves, and only the physical whip will even effect them. For again, they are too brutal, too strong in this way, meant for the field and the chain, and the whip, so that servant taming is as nothing to them. Now a slave owner must call a slave wrangler to deal with this, and they should not attempt to deal with a slave on their own. Now if a female slave is bully a woman, then will you not help the woman? But it is not meddling when it is the case of a female slave attacking a woman. Now white slaves and black slaves both have female slaves among them, and the slaves attack the slave owners of other colours, races, as they call them.




FOR THE NONE-SLAVE OWNING SOCIETY:




Now regardless of whether are not slaves are being properly enslaved in a society, it is still the case, even though there are slave owners, or those worthy to be slaves, that Canada, or Salem, is in fact, and has always been, a Nazi country, and that we are still Nazis and that what is called neo-Nazis, is of course, anti-Nazi, as the dorky, unpopular, even psycho-kid, keep attempting to challenge the status quo, where he is not required, and is even attacking the popular kids, which is of course, anti-Nazism. Now the idea that we would need his help or protection, is increasingly rediculous and only serves to distract the popular, cool kids, from doing what needs to be done, and what they would be doing, if not for the distractions that the dorky, creepy, psycho-kid keeps offering to the popular kids as he tries to be popular. We are already Nazis, and have always been Nazis. We do not and have never required help bullying people when it is right, and dealing with what must be delt with. Attempts of the anti-Nazis, or neo-Nazis, to intervene in a perverse way, and attempt to do the tasks of the popular kids, is often distracting and only serves more to give credit to the words of bullies who have sometimes attempted to explain prior what a problem the dorky, unpopular kid uprising is, and that some people should not exist. Of course, some unpopular kids have even spoken blasphemy against the bully directly, which is still part of the unpopular kid uprising, or the “Revenge of the Nerds” that is an increasingly persistant problem in society, even to the extent where such 'nerds' begin to hang out with pedophiles and support pedophilia, as part of their creepy, disgusting, nerd proclivity. Of course, the bully has always needed the support of the popular kids, and usually has it, and the wicked words of those who speak against the hard work of bullies who volunteer themselves to protect the cool kids, usually and rightly is completely ignored, although when such wicked bully attackers become more aggressive, it is often required for the cool kids to support the bully, especially when the revenge of the nerds is becoming inappropriate and so wicked, that it is being carried out by adults against bullies in high-schools. Now the help of anti-Nazis is not required for the cool kids and our Nazi society and only serves to distract and create strange scenarios that waste time and distract. Essentially the anti-Nazis are dorky nerds, and sometimes attack the cool kids and they can be psychos towards the cool kids, even, and their help is not needed. The cool kids know that black people, like teenagers looking to find their way, have said, we're the cool ones as a race or ethnicity, and of course, the cool kids say, some of you are cool and some of you are not, and you know we have cool people too and that every ethnicity has cool people and nerdy people, just as not all asians are nerdy accountants, not all white people are nerdy accountants, so even though it's not a big deal, and you're not really trying to mess with anyone, you still know what the reality is, unless somebody is actually insane. Anti-Nazis are not required for this type of thing. If anyone is taking this type of teenage thing too far, or it's gone on for too, long, the cool kids can handle it. Now when anti-Nazis try to handle it, they're only speaking over the cool kids, and distracting them, and it serves to even more give credit and rationalization to how right the bully is when he said that some of these kids should not exist. Some of these psyho nerds have even said that the cool kids are not white, when they can't be another colour, and they're clearly not anything else. Really, it's just the revenge of the nerds, and an agency is required in government made up of the best, most trust-worthy bullies, who are against nerds and have proven their commitment to be against nerds, who are able to focus all their energy and attention strictly on the entire nerd uprising and revenge of the nerds that occurs in Salem, or Canada. Whether talking about servants, or any type type of nerd who is practising revenge of the nerds against cool people, the agency in government that protects our society against the national security problem of revenge of the nerds, must be formed, so that more nerds who are practising revenge of the the nerds, are not able to slip through the net of justice. Of course, this agency must be made up entirely of bullies, and no person who is not a proven bully who has been proven to use the right judgement, not being a creepy nerd, in bullying the right people, and defending the right people, would be a candidate for being part of the what should be the most powerful agency our country has. Of course, Slitheran house, is not made up of cool kids, and they too bully, but that is of course not the same thing, and a real bully will bully Slitheran people, and they are stronger and better. Now the agency should not have any Slitheran people and Slitheran people are what is called false-bullies in their bullying in that they bully out of place and out of justice. Now Lions will respect the antolope if antolope respect the Lions, and though we are people, and not animals, the metephore is not meant to imply that we should adhere to animal nihilism. Now antelope militarization is a national security issue, as it involves the self-radicilization of those who were bullied or identify with being bullied, with the belief in a cosmic war between those likely to be bullied and those who are likely to bully or be on the side of the bully, the cool people. Now the cool people do not believe in the cosmic war and believe each person is different until proven otherwise, whereas those who have antelope militarization in their heart are fully convinced, with stubborn and unchangeable conviction that resists all rebuke and reason, that there is indeed a cosmic war and that they are on the side of those likely to be bullied and that the war requires any type of revenge, and that such revenge is rational and justifiable, even wrath and anger, with a hidden, concealed, religious zeal that exists frequently in North American society, Salem and America, and is a major national security problem, as it results in abuse, great and small, death, cowardly assaults, targeted bankruptcy, mischief, and any type of cowardly and crime whether as great as murder and torture or as small as pety thefts, motivated by antelope militarization. If antelope militarization is not constantly being addressed and delt with by the police, the RCMP, the military, CSIS, and CSEC, is can very greatly destabilize a nation, cause mass homelessness, casualties in terms of life, physical disabilities, great financial losses for both individuals as the nation as a whole, and a greater amount of chaos and confusion within law enforcement agencies who are not sure what crimes and organizations they are actually pursuing in their efforts to address such attacks. It is a serious threat to the country, and cause great financial losses and set-backs for an entire nation as a whole, and can result in the loss of extremely intelligent assets who have been targeted because they are labelled as cool people, or popular, where nations might loss great inventions and technological advances as well as a nation's allies who would have shared in the advances and achievements of these assets. Attacks of these type are not organized in the traditional fashion, but organized at the psychic level, at times, by mutual understandings among those practising and believing in the ideologies of antelope militarization, and it can of course be understood that if any is so morally depraved as to carry out cowardly attacks on people based on this antelope militarization and their belief in attacking lions, they are in fact, as justice would state, and all laws, even morality, far more expendable and considered dangerous, than any citizen we have no matter what their intelligence or misfortunes might be. Without attempting to appear as a non-government individual giving orders to the government or directing the government, I would like to offer the suggestion, without any implication of a personal favouritism towards me, or undemocratic partnership, that the government take the national security threat of antelope militarization seriously, even elevating it to the primary security threat that is against our nation and its citizens, whether the threat is foreign or domestic, by including the category of antelope militarization ideology whether for an individual or a group, whether the group is cooperating in a psychic, for lack of a better term, or traditional fashion, that the category be added to the nation's list of terrorist threats so that a new government agency might be created to constantly police and save citizens who are being targeted or have been targeted by antelope militarization. In instances where crimes against a lion, or citizen, might be considered more extreme, and ongoing, I would like to suggest the creation of hidden torture facilities to be constructed somewhere in the nation to serve as a deterrent towards committing such crimes for those who have no respect of morality and can only be deterred from committing such crimes by the knowledge of torture facilities that are being actively used on worse offenders. Attempts to label these people something else can be delt with easily. If that is not what they are doing that is not what they are. These people are their own catatgory, and the fact that the transition for many of them from more concealed and highly dangerous actors who carry out mostly extremely cowardly acts, even maximizing cowardice in their actions without remorse or conscience, to actions that are in the category of cowardly serial killers and terrorists, attempting to even kill using all types of cowardly methods, should place these people as the highest priority for our nation's intelligence agencies to capture, as these often highly envious, or seemingly envious, individuals, are what might be considered infinitely dangerous in their utter lack of personal limits with regards to what they are capable of in their attacks on others. In fact there seems to be nothing, no evil, that these people are not capable of once given a sense of safety from being caught and imprisoned, as they are often entirely nihilistic and firmly convinced of the cosmic war against those they are envious of. Sometimes horrible domestic abusers, even, and horrible abusers of children, even child rapists and child molesters, and any other type of evil, they might identify women as being part of the group of popular people, especially if they have had any confrontation with such 'types' of women, as their conviction in the cosmic war cannot be changed. Thus, even attacks on women, by males in this category, who seem to believe that a woman, upon meeting them, is likely to be in the popular category, can be unrelenting and insatiable, and just as cowardly as such attacks are towards men who are believed to likely be popular. Attempts to downplay the extreme danger of these people towards a nation and its citizens has been a continued practise in television and other areas on behalf of those who usually do not identify with being popular, and also believe they are likely to be bullied. In fact, the people who do this, are not some dismissive problem, but an extreme problem that represents an extreme danger to citizens, and due to the prolific nature of these individuals and their insatiable motivation every one of them should be considered a high priority for intelligence agency to identify and deal with, and they should be taken very seriously by the public, regardless of naive efforts to downplay the danger of these individuals. By the time one of these individuals reaches old age, and acting often in concealed fashion, they have likely committed enough evil to qualify for two life sentences, at least, in prison. Indeed, children are not safe while these people are in society and neither is any other citizen, young or elderly. They even present a serious danger to combat soldiers, and some of our most elite soldiers, as their cowardly methods against soldiers often are a more difficult challenge for soldiers to fight. The likely-hood that their cowardly actions have killed many soldiers, even elite soldiers, can only be assumed as a certainty. Essentially, the number of crimes against another person, and the cowardice of them, is essentially what would deem a person as worthy of being sent to a torture facility, and given that the people who do this have no regard for morality and are usually highly prolific in the number of people they attack, it is only sensible that these people be placed in the same category as serial killers and terrorists, as they are usually highly prolific, and use many cowardly tactics to continue to attack a person in a way that does not regard the possibility of killing another person, and is motivated by insatiable wrath that is even present towards many other people often for pety reasons that do not really make sense. These highly dangerous people might even attack soldiers in cowardly ways, due to envy, and given that soldiers are usually considered cool, identified with popularity, there is likely no more contributing factors required to elicit the hidden and insatiable wrath of one of these militarized antelope who might be working around soldiers in some way, or even in the military in some cases. Many of these militarized antelope are highly accustomed to people coming to them and questioning them about what others have said about them in terms of their evil doings, and every militarized antelope is highly prepared for such a situation, and might play a variety of roles and characters in order to pursued others that they are not an evil person, but are in fact a peaceful person, even a person who is incredibly for peace, almost to the degree that such 'slander' might seem like persecution against a good person who is only forgiving, patient, concerned, unafraid of such accusations in their patience with others and their patience and concern for those who have 'slandered' them. If this religous-figure type patience and concern can actually be the case with some people, and sincerely, it is still highly rare and should not persuade anyone that the accusations might not be true. Those who have learned well, and are moral, but sometimes deceived by these people, are not fools, for they would not be moral if they were fools, but it is usually better that different types of people deal with such situations, and relying on a person's acting skills to judge them is something that is considered a bad idea for many who deal with serious matters. Salem, or Canada, is the Nazis and has been the Nazis proudly since long before Hitler and after Hitler. We do not need help from creepy and unpopular people, and we do not need to rely on the public opinions of slaves and servants and other abject types as if they make up the majority, when a servant or slave introduces an idea based on some problem they might have, possibly with being a Unich. For who is not weary of the opinions of unichs? Now our citizens are Jews and Nazis also, and we are Salem. As for the hi-jacking of Nazism by an unpopular, dorky, bad painter, known as Hitler, who did not like others, know how to be popular, how to be a Nazi, and hi-jacked Nazism, or the right power of the popular and cool, and made it into a dorky, creepy, weird, and again, very creepy and make-believe like vision of dorky nerds with strange beliefs who would seem to be the type of people who could not fit in with the cool people and handle their tasks of bullying and keeping the Savannah as it should be without the dorky aid of some weird religion that is not a religion. If you like Germany, don't rub Germany oil on your gentiles and wrap your naked body in the Nazi flag. These dorky, high-school, and elementary school rejects who could never fit in, want to help the cool people bully who they should and keep things as they should be. We can manage things ourselves. If something black people have been doing that was never a big deal has gone on for too long, we'll let them know, or if they've been saying something that wasn't a big deal and they've been saying it too long, we'll mention it. We can handle it. We don't need the dorky kid with some type of developmental problem, or weird nerd thing going on, to tell the lions how to be lions.

	We are the Nazis, and the anti-Nazis, that call themselves neo-nazis, could not be Nazis because they would have had to conform with us and be part of our society as Nazis. Essentially, they did not fit in, were too weird and unpopular in many ways, and instead of being part of the Nazis, they branched off from the Nazis and became anti-Nazis, that they called being neo-Nazis, weirdly, and in creepy fashion, using the name Nazi still to signify a different, and not new type of citizen, but a same age exactly, inferior citizen that could never fit in with the rest of us. We do not have to be told how to be lions. We already have our lions and we are able to handle it. The spoiled-brat slaves and regular slaves that make up this strange and inferior group of Nazis is embarrassing to our country and probably embarrassing to America. What is worse, they do not even seem to understand that they are a distraction to us, and an aid to foreign enemies, although they must continue to keep up their club, or group, for their own ability to fit in and have some organization, even if they are not a benefit to us. Since when have we ever lost our way? But the anti-Nazis have to be relevant, have to present themselves as being useful in some fashion. They are a distraction to our ability to govern, and do what we were already doing and will always be doing, as we were Nazis before Hitler, the nerd, Nazis during the war, and Nazis after and hopefully forever. As people who believe in the right authority of cool people, we are Nazis and always will be, hopefully. When an utter dork and nerd took control of Germany because of the Jews, he seemed to do everything wrong according to true, cool, popular, Nazi ideology. He was a dork and nerd, and the anti-Nazis are not even like him. They are even more dorky and nerdy. The promotion of slave qualities over slave owner qualities is easy to ignore for any people, and demonstrates the mouth of a clearly inferior person and a falling away from intellectualism and superiority. I almost would like to know where these clearly inferior people are, but then I do not. They are promoting inferiority, and slave traits, and creating problems for white citizens and doing what they must do was not as difficult before the anti-Nazis created many problems. They, too, are part of the revenge of the nerds against the cool people.




ON PAST GENERATIONS:




As for the conditions that might have existed for past generations, some of those things have changed and some of those things have worn out due to the change in climate, and some of the elderly are attempting to pass on their legacy by ideology that has no use for the present climate any longer based on emotional needs and impulses and not the needs of younger generations, and what would likely benefit them. Essentially, these people are sometimes jealous and selfish and incredibly full of themselves, and their strange problems and what bothers them, even makes them distressing and unacceptable, as they do not have a right to have a problem with others due to their jealousy, and their attempts to use others in a way that is clearly meant to make implications and disrespect others due to their jealousy and strange problems with others that they do not have a right to have, makes them anti-social and unacceptable for society as a citizen, since the problem is clearly their problem that they are unable to properly process on their own as a sane individual. Essentially, these types of mental illnesses are not like most mental illnesses and mean that a person should probably be removed from continuing to bother others due to their strange problems that they are unable to properly process on their own without involving others. This is not the same as anything that a person might attempt to change about society, but rather is a personal fashion of behaving in society in an unacceptable fashion due to great jealousy and impulse control problems. A common, anti-social trait that comes naturally to these people, is usually sowing discord and also attempting to bully people, or disrespect people with others. Thus is the proverb, if you have a problem with me, do not attempt to sow discord. Even, if you have a problem with me, do not try to use others. Now when sentience dictates that a person could not be jealous, as they did nothing to instigate the accusation of jealousy, thus making the accusation void and placed upon oneself, and when views are withdrawn and yielding, there was indeed likely good intentions in such views, and it was not selfishness that motivated them. Now if selfish motives do not yield when something better is found for others and yet motives entirely unselfish are yielding then it might be possible to eliminate what is no longer required and what still might be required, based on what is said to not be required. That thing said to not be required, because the holder will yield, is possibly still required, for it is with a pure motive that is entirely unselfish.

	Now if the polytheist will not from refusal, become part of a society that is not polytheism, that they are making themselves as if very obnoxious among the other people in their refusal to be citizens in almost every way, that they are incredibly disrespectful, offering military-like resistance to good, then you know that polytheists have been obnoxious in this way towards many. Now are not polytheists a strange thing in some ways, on the Earth, where polytheism is almost completely gone? Now India has many Muslims, and they are not as these. Now China, at present, is not as these. Now Muslims are not the reward of angels or their portion, but are because of the obediance of the angels, that there is not a word for it, only they are seperate, in ways, from the Jews and Christians, and of course angels do not adhere to Islam, and it is not blasphemy for them to wear gold or silk. Now it is implied that the religions for people are not for angels, and that the person who corrects an angel with religion commits blasphemy, and yet if any is kindly attempting to convert an angel, is it not also implied that this is not blasphemy? But I do not offer any commands of religion here, only that those who are not foolish dogs do not need to told anything about angels, only angels do not have to follow any religion that is for people, and yet do not some of them follow a religion that has the Lord? Now if any is sowing discord between any religion and people that the discord is meant to be sown between them and the angel, so that the angel will believe them evil, then it is a thing of war, that the one who does so is attacking the angel when they are attempting to sow discord in a way that attacks in a way that a person is attacked in some way. Now if Mohammad's people are seperate in some ways from the Jews and Christians, is it not because they are because of the obediance of the angels. Now if any angel had listened, would it not have been words of treachory from them if they had heard a new thing they did not know of and immediatly agreed? But it would be treachory. Now it should be understood that the Lord finds fault, error, and mistakes, even with the angels, and the angel would not even be able to offer wisdom if it was not understood. Now the angel also, as his own opinion, believes that is good if Mohammad's people are wanting some measure of preservation for their ways, by types of segregation that they choose to be careful to preserve themselves, although he does not have the opinion of anything hindering or altering activities and even dealings, or anything already done to be on Earth, as being those types of things that they might choose for preserve themselves, for he only understands the wisdom of preserving themselves because other cultures are spreading and condemning and some of them have people who are like those who are conquering in their alteration of another culture, and this conquering is not even part of any religion. Now those who spread the religion that is not any religion that has a name, but is the religion of the west, of North America and other places, these are those spreading a religion and if they do so as those conquering for their religion it is without any religion that they do so, and they spread a thing that is a mix of many things, that it is not respectful what they do, and yet they sometimes do so with firm conviction and even zeal. Now some attempt to spread these things every place they can, and they do so with conviction and even zeal, and it is something begun that is not respectful.

	Now as for those who are the good hackers, not the anti-hackers, is there indeed something that is hidden that is for them, that is put aside. For I would have believed that angels had been on Earth and that there are children left abandoned by these angels, and yet are they not also separate in some ways, and what is for them and will be revealed to them, I do not know, or if anything will that they do not find themselves. But if they have become children of angels, and not any children of myself, or any person who is on Earth when an angel is on Earth as a human, in the way of a person, but having become later children of angels, then I do not know what is for them. Now King David spoke of the children of angels, and if I had a daughter, I would be secretly happy if she was to marry him, although I am sure this is not what he meant. Now it is for them to decide whether they are children of angels or not, and yet I, too, greatly hate the 'machine world' that is outside the matrix, and call it Babylon. Now the brothers who introduced this, I like, but if they do not like me, than I respect this. Now as for those who are not really with the good hackers, I would not even like it if they said they were children or angels, and yet some of them claim that they are also good hackers, and yet they disparage the good hackers in ways and even try to say what being a good hacker really is, likely security people for corporations, I assume, but it is not for me to meddle in. Now was it really right what a soldier did in shooting civilians in combat from a helicopter? But if this is happening, is it not good that people know, so that murder might cease? Now if there are peaceful religious places being targeted with missiles and they are not actually military targets, is it not good that people are made aware, and is it not a sycophantic desecration to target peaceful people who are practising religion? But it is not my place to meddle, and it is for the good hackers to decide, each for themselves or in groups, whether they are really children of angels. Now if a military man is speaking of these like they are terrorist soldiers, is his mouth really being honest in any wrong he might speak? But the military and all people know what the difference is, and they err on purpose with their mouths, to not speak with judgment of the Lord, for all people know they are not the same thing as violent terrorists, that they force their mouths, and yet still the children of angels have defied you, and what can I say against you, unless you are to do wickedness against them, for you know what is acceptable in your judgment of them, that you not also force your hands out of the judgment of the Lord, for you know what is injustice and wrong concerning them. Now I respect the males who are these good hackers, respecting them as men, and I am loving the women of these, and of course it is known in what way. Now Adonijeh, you know they are cool, and yet if you do not know exactly what they are, please do not think they are an evil thing, and yet mostly I have not perceived with you any malice towards them, for when are you really against the Lord? But do not think because of the sign of Solomon that I am against you, or do not believe that I do not believe you are a very good man, but I am forced to wrestle you sometimes because it is the only way to move you, and was not Jacob wrestles with, and he was touched because the victory could not be had against him without it. Now you are a Jew, and the children of angels are not on the side of the devil, that you are able to understand it, and not all those around you are Solomon, for when they pretend they are so, indeed it is a wickedness that you are right to be angry about, for Solomon, too, is a Jew, and indeed he can understand, for the angel too has said, that he is your younger, and yet he must be able to be king in his domain, and you are often encroaching for reasons he cannot explain. Now I have declared The Diary of Lucifer first and foremost to the Elsnon, and are these not a little like Absolom in some ways. Now Absolom did not know what the prophet knew, and even David did not understand, for the situation was too rare, that he killed when he should not have. Now Tamar, your sister, is a celebit and beautiful. Now I have had to wrestle with you as well, and yet both Joab and you are considered villians among those who misunderstood, for where is there judgement of any in the stories of the old Testiment? Now did Jacob sin, that he was wrestled? Did Joseph do wrong that he was cast into Egypt? But if the Christ died, was it because of sin? Now John the Baptist and the Christ came to die. Now if you find fault with the Jews in Israel, but you are a son of David, and a prince because of it. Now I do not meddle.

	Now if I have wrestled with Adonijeh, is it not an honour to him that I have done this, for he is able to be a man and understand, that philistines not rejoice like perverse and wicked children, for if I wrestled with him, yet I would have killed those who are wicked and perverse who rejoice when they are not Jews. Now a criminal is not a Jew, and the criminal realm is beneath the realm of land, and yet for Solomon, it is indeed true that there are criminals who helped Jews, and helped many who were being persecuted by philistines and people of the Devil, who were being targeted by terrorism, and yet I do not support any criminal gang, for what portion will any of them have with those worthy to be slave owners unless they forsake the iniquity of criminal gangs? Now criminal gangs are even purposefully practising the brutality and wickedness of slaves at times and many of them are temporarily turning to terrorism for periods with support of foreign terrorists and foreign government, even to carry out murders for that reason. Now if this is true, than the military has a right to take action. Now these gangs have usually been better, at least, than the brutality and evil of Babylon and the things they begin to do, beginning as a gathering of supposed politeness and good manners, and professional things, and quickly becoming brutal, nihilistic, and unspeakably evil in their wicked doings that massacre and attack a nation. Now tax collectors and some unwelcome in society, have said, let us build Babylon, and although freedom is right, I offer my opinion, that Babylon should not be permitted to be built, for what is built is a horrible beast, and an unspeakably, wicked weapon against a nation. Now the INCEL have been abused by the poverty of Babylon forced against them, that they be poor as well in good things, and the INCEL, many of them, have sought out the culprit and blamed the wrong person some of the time, for it is not the male who you happen to envy, for are they really be indecent? But Babylon has struck you from the side and forced poverty from good things on you, and you have only seen the wrong person. Now for what reason have you been rejected and forced out of the society of good things? But I am not pleased with this evil that has come upon you. Now go be good brothers to the one not struck with poverty from good things, that you inherit your portion, and do not listen to the kings among you. Now if you have committed to doing things with your hands that are not good for you, than know that spiritual people are not as those of the world, who do not understand and are atheistic in their luke-warm ways, neither acceptable to the atheist or the spiritual, and yet who is not spiritual? But all are spiritual. But be a good brother and fullfill righteousness and do not fall into compromise and do not let Babylon bully you away from good things you might inherit, the wealth of the Lord. Now those of you who are for greater decency, especially concerning your own houses, yet the angel understands, although if the luke-warm do not, they are not acceptable as being luke-warm. Now if slaves are against you, yet they are against all those worthy to be slave owners, and against all citizens, and servants, too, can be impious.

	Now those who commit wickedness and yet are like a baby, a very small child, when they face even the consequences of it, that they become a baby quickly, not handling such to show themselves a man, or to be like brutal slaves, rather than women, or cowardly and wicked slaves, rather than women who do not fear God, than these are not one of the people as others are, for justice is for much less, and they are like babies who do not understood how they have committed a great multitude of wickedness, and yet if they are of age, they are not to be spared, for a baby of this sort is wicked and of little worth and as bad as a slave, and slaves portray some of the same qualities as these, only they are brutal and stubborn and are not bothered by anything unless it is wrangling. Now it is not the same as a person who is of great ability, who is as an elite soldier, and it is not the same as a person who is strong, and bullies too, when they are not 'slitherin house' as I can only call it, are often those who are also worthy to be slave owners, for they volunteer for the work, and there is sometimes much, of defending the Nazis, or the popular and cool people. Now for the Nazis to do well is benificial and good for the Jews, even if they themselves are not Nazis, for most Jews are considered acceptable to the Nazis. Now let 'slitherin house' be considered a thing with Babylon and with slaves. Now it is not good to be marking yourself in any way to claim allegiance with any house or thing, because the mark is from the Lord, if others might know it, and discussion of it is not right, neither great direction and intention, for this is disarray and the work of Babylon and the devil, but it is wisdom and is not all for support of the good? Now the Lord is able to support far more than what the angel has written in this essay and in The Diary of Lucifer.

	Now those who complain wrong are sometimes not fullfilling what a person must fillfull as a person to perform, that they give up what they must fullfill instead of handling it in the way it must be handled, or to complain in the way that is right to complain, that they handle it and do not give their problem up to another, where their complaint might be ignored. Now a slave owner should not dirty their hands with a servant or slave. Now a soldier, who will do much of anything for him that he is not to do himself? Now why will you, a people worthy, not animals, be asking any to do more than is right for them to do in some thing, for rewards are often for those and their kingdom, when they are right to be doing more, that they say, even selfishly, yet you should not dirty your hands, for the kingdom is theirs in such thing, and what kingdom is given with them performing. Now who says such more than any person? But a king says so more than any person, for there are many kings, and each says, yet you should not, and I will, and the king performs it. Now those having their portion as a high soldier say to the king, when it is not right, yet you should not, and I will, and these are high soldiers, having a great portion, as princes who come and go, who are close to a king. Now the term servant is now offensive, for it has been tarnished badley, and if David had a servant's heart, yet it cannot be said anymore, for it is not understood. Now it is an offense and the word cannot be used any longer, although servants are administrators, and they should be given light tasks only, what is right for a servant, for a wise servant is better and greater than a wicked fool who believed himself to be a king, for wickedness is found on their lips who believed themselves to be kings and queens, and they are like calamotous drunkards in their wickedness. Now Solomon, has he not said of those who are loyal to him, yet they are greater than me in most. Now the sign of Solomon has said it. Now for those INCEL who are for greater decency, especially concerning their own house, by which I meant, their house found in the Old Testiment, whether David, Joab, Adonijeh, ect, that these are having a heart to correct what is not right, to correct the foolishness they find, like clean and non-perverse meddlers, than are they not like priests within that house, who come and go? For the sign of Solomon has declared them a type of priest. Now some loyal to Solomon have said, yet Adonijeh must stay back, for the king, Solomon, must have his domain, and it is right, although Adonijeh is not hated and has his own domain. Now Adonijeh is very intelligent, being a very capable and smart person, a smart Jew among smart Jews, and sound wisdom is with him and understanding. Now by his intelligence, he is made even more mighty. Now those who believe in virginity, great purity, and much decency, are they not also without their house? For they are for purity, and are finding wickedness an abomination, and they are not haters of David, or Solomon. Now these are also not having their inheritance, that the building, or house for them, they are not with and it has not been built up yet. Now why are you believing in the religion Ioim that is the western religion that is not a religion by a pseudo-religion made up of concepts found in social politics of mostly America. For those who believe in Ioim, are not having much knowledge and understanding without other things, that they believe in political things and social things of social politics, and they say, it is evil, and yet they do not yet understand it, but it does not fit with Ioim, and yet nothing does. Now what do some of the pure do who seem intolerant in some way that none can understand? But do they not see things that are out of place, that should not be where they are, that are misunderstood, or that are enemies of some type that have not been identified, or that are rebels in a wicked way, or are slaves who are not enslaved, or are fools behaving foolishness, or are women being drawn to destruction, or wicked and ignorant rebuking with ignorance and confidence, or a person who is having the wrong parents in the rare cases when it is not right, or servants being insolent, or prostitutes who are enemies, or liars who cause hurt, or devils who are persecuting the holy, or all the things this intolerant person who is not like any of the other intolerant people, is perceiving more than others. Now Solomon will not covet what is not for his house, for it is like a heavy stone that causes injury, but where there is the one who is loyal to Solomon, this, too, the sign of Solomon, has called a type of priest. Now the sign of Solomon has considered, When the priests are having their right priest-hood, there will be less violence because of what was not placed on Earth. Now are not many of Joshua, the leader of Israel, believing in many things of Ioim because of their righteousness in the right circumstances, and they are not the same as the children of angels, for though the children of angels are usually, but not always, good computer hackers, and not the evil type, those of Joshua, who make up Joshua, are often activists, but not always, and where some say, there is nothing I can do, Joshua says, I will go out and do something about it. Now the angel has said, Joshua is wise, and indeed he is the activist, the one who does something, and though even the angel gives wisdom, yet Joshua will likely weigh and decide what he believes to be right. Now Joshua is not an activist for all causes.

	Now Japanese people are not Joshua, even if some have said there might be a similarity, and yet has it been said that Japan should not be touched, or attacked? But there was a nation that was given not to attack. Now to Joshua, the children of angels are not evil, and I believe you have already noticed it, and Mohammad's people, though not a reward for the angels, as if the angels possessed them, but a reward like the angels are pleased and not possessing them or having them as their people, for they are not any angel's people or possession, but because of the obedience of the angels, I offer that you not consider them enemies, and yet they are separate in ways from other people, and yet it is the discord sowers, the terrorists, who attack in their name and then hide, that their people might have discord with other nations and might incur the retaliations. Now you must defend and attack if you must do so, but I still offer my words in my consideration of them. Now a person feels as if rewarded by nature, and yet nature belongs to the Lord, and this is the thing that there is no word for in any language, it would seem, by which the angel is rewarded, or rather, pleased that there are Mohammad's people. Now it is a manner of reward even though they are not the possession of the angels but their existence is like a reward to them much like being rewarded with friends and rewarded with good people you meet. Now are not angels able to follow the religion or other good religions that have God? But angels do not have to follow any of the religions and they are servants of the Christ, some, and angels of the Lord. Now does not the devil deceive so that those meant to perform their evil will perform it? But they say, we are not servants of the devil, but we have read the scripture, and only do so to play a trick that would be added to the evil we do, and they do not perceive that they have only deceived themselves in this way, for they are what they do, that the devil has tricked his servants into performing their obedience to him. Now the angel has heard enemy prostitutes and stumbling blocks during a time and there has for a time been like fiery arrows and fighting in the streets outside, and it has been like a dark time in history. Now I have noticed that there are no slaves for the Jews among their own people, and yet if there are, then they will know it, for slaves are brutal, not able to be rebuked, and yet it is not meant with the wrong application of the words for slaves, for one must understand a hard skull, a stubborn and cruel manner, a brutal and wicked way that does not fear God, and this is not their mighty, for such is far from it, and it is not their strong. But they are able to think for themselves if they have any who are really their slaves or if such was never the case for them. Now there are some not religious, not respecting decency in their religion, and they are fitting the ways of slaves among Muslims, and they are attacking in their name and then hiding, that the people might be attacked, and yet they are not the slaves of the Muslims, because the Muslims are too much a holy people, a spiritual people, and because of their ways, it does not seem seemly that they would ever have slaves, or be those who possess slaves. Now they are not mine, and they are Mohammad's people.

	Now if any bullies to encourage, are they truly for something, for such does not aid, and only distracts. Now what insane person distracts when they do not understand? But the later is almost not worthy consideration, and so is it not a slave, mindless, that would be bothering if ever it was the case? Now if a slave is sowing discord, but slaves are understood, all of them, to be enemies of those who are the slave owners, and it would only seem natural that they would be sowing discord. Now if they attack to incur favour, than do they not only desire to incur the favour of other slaves? Now the hearts of slaves, if they do not know, is capable of reasonable strategy, for those they incur favour with they desire to kill the slave owners and they hate all those who are not slaves. Now if George W. Bush, the President of America, attempted to fight a spiritual battle by conquering with Ioim to replace a culture with Ioim even if not Christianity, than in some ways these sentiments are still in North America that laud Ioim as part of patriotism as a religion that is right to spread and even force in some ways on another culture. Now Ioim is not a real religion and if it is not being chosen on its own, then some of the spreading of it is conquering and for dessecrating and destroying the cultures of the planet. Now if Babylon is later added to Ioim, then all the planet might be covered in the kingdoms of the devil, and yet The Tower of Babel story has taught diversification for safety from total loss and destruction.




THE SIGN OF SOLOMON:




Now the priests, those who dwell in the palace for their work during the day, being those loyal to Solomon, those who are high soldiers, close to the throne, those who are mighty, an elite force that guards, who are loyal to Solomon, those who are for the just weight and balance, for gaining little by little, and not by great amounts, those for giving portions spread out among many, those for order to reduce stress and even altercation and abuse, those for diligence and research, and diligent research, those who are diplomatic and peaceable in their dealings, those who diligently gather intelligence that the land might be well, those who consider the people's safety in all things, even in matters where decency might be considered, those who carry out dangerous missions, those who wield strategy with integrity and real good, those who have integrity in accounting and paying what is owed, those who suggest acquiring something, those who diligently investigate the economy and seek ways for the people to be well, those who are priests, religious scholars, political councillors, being councillors understanding peace and respect of others, and those building and managing building, and all the other things to be found in the palace, these are spread out among the Earth.

	Now justice is necessary to save life, to ensure the prospering of good that Babylon not grow in the place of good, which is hell. Now the judgment of a bitter and proud slave promotes folly but a person of integrity is a well of life to the people. Now by justice upon the poor and around the poor, the city is cleansed. Now him diligent to do so is bringing up waters of life for the people, is like one who builds fountains of water that go throughout the city. Now those who exploit with crime and wickedness, diligently they are purged and the people are able to prosper. Now none is not worthy of giving justice to, and those who exploit temporary misfortunes are those not likely one of the people. Now by diligence the land is cleansed, by order and diligence it is cut from sickness and decease. Now by order and professionalism, tempers are cool, and there is less abuse. Now by diligence lives are saved in altercations. Now both criminals and non-criminals are citizens. Now none is given greater respect in their words for those who say, they are not as me, yet diligence must be done. Now the innocent must be set free and the matter investigated, for great evil is likely to have taken place. Now a bribe is not taken from the rich, but does it not come from one who is not one of the people? But desperation brings a slander forth from the mouth, and yet diligently it is looked into, with concealment it is investigated. Now a spoiled slave is homicidal, indeed they kill only to kill, for there is no other motive. Now those who spill out what is not meant to keep, are doing good for themselves, and yet curses are on the head of him who withholds corn. Now purchase wisdom and keep it, and do not carelessly spill it away from yourself. A level of laziness is wicked when it concerns the lives of others. Now the wicked who exalt themselves, and they are poor, it is having nothing to do with poverty, but it is their wickedness that is abomination. Now if any has an employee and boasts with arrogance, yet they are not the same as the wicked who is poor who exalts themselves. Now who is king, but David? Yet not all of David's are kings. Now in the domain of such, is there not also Joab? Now Joab is the elder of Adonijeh, that Adonijeh not condemn him, for it is the Lord, and yet Adonijeh has declared such criminals, and yet there is no right power to condemn him by the pursuit of Adonijeh, that the wicked not say, he is a villian, when they speak of Joab. Now when he is not Joab, but a murderer, using war-time propaganda against the righteous, then do the wicked who do so, not still fear Joab and even Adonijeh? Now the spirit of Adonijeh, let it be far from Joab, for it is death to some, and not good for others, but the spirit is with the sign of Adonijeh and the natural host, and Adonijeh, yet he is not evil. Now the spirit of Absolom, let it be with those who are the right people of Absolom, that the spirit is harmful to those who it is not for, and the judgement of Absolom towards his brother, let him understand what judgement is not good for him, for has not the prophet understood the complicated thing? But is Absolom really like Adonijeh, or like Joab? Now if any is a sicophant towards Absolom and they are sicophants truly, then traitors to the people say, it is none of our concern, and yet Absolom is a son of David, son to the King, as is Adonijeh. Now if any says, it is none of our concern, when they are the type able and the right person to defend, than is it not a sign of treachory to the people? Now do you not use right judgement? But Absolom is not as Adonijeh or Joab, and he is not even as David, but Absolom will know what is right for him, if he is Absolom. Now his immediate sister, she is Tamar, a celebit, and beautiful, and both are pretty. Now let not the word be used for foolishness and wickedness, the word of the Lord.




Now David is not a slave, and was not a slave, and was not a criminal, and attempts of criminals to have others identify themselves with him are in essence, blasphemy and an abomination. Now as for the philistines, they are not meant to signify what the New Testament calls Gentiles, but Gentiles are non-spiritual people and Romans represent, not actually Romans, and not non-Jews, but mental illness, being portrayed as mental illness in all places where they are portrayed, especially mental illness for Christians, but also for Jews. What does it mean to be a Roman in the New Testament? It means being mentally ill, sick, unwell in a specific fashion of mental illness that might not be common. There is probably no judgment against Romans in the New Testament, perhaps only a warning that such is not considered better. Now being a Roman is not the same as being a citizen of Salem, a Christian, a Muslim, a Feeler personality type, or any of the other good things a person can be. What seems clear is that Romans are not embarrassed by some things that would be embarrassing, have lack of regard for human life, believe in the just-world-hypothesis, and the other things that would make a person a Roman in the New Testament. Now that these things happened seems to demonstrate, from what was placed in the gospels, that the significant encounters with Romans that demonstrated these problems might have been chosen specifically to demonstrate the more prominent problems that Romans had. Attempts to label Romans as representing non-Jews or to label philistines as representing non-Jews, is not considerate of the many different people groups to be found in the Old and New Testament of the Bible. The fact that some are anti-social to the degree that they have rejected society and its ability to properly function, and have retaliated in incompetent and dangerous ways with pety crimes against individuals, seems to demonstrate that ignorance, even lack of intelligence, is often the motivating factor in pety crimes for religious reasons or ideological reasons, when those crimes are pety and carried out in a foolish and reckless fashion. As for the Jews enslaving any, a special burden, likely for two months out of a year, or perhaps greater or smaller, was likely placed upon a people group to send people in seasons to build the Temple and despite a crude ancient saying being used that cited the use of whips, it is unlikely they were treated with any cruelty, as these were people who had chosen to live in Israel who were likely not bound to live there, or slaves in any way, but were sending people in a voluntary fashion so that they might have the permission to dwell in Israel. We are not the Romans, and even if there is something spiritual that was identified among Jewish prophets, and lending types of differences, types of segregation that do not cause war or conflict by themselves, that exists between different people groups as a thing of the Universe, as the ancient prophets seemed to be attempting to identify these things that exist in the Universe, then we are still not a racist people, as it is hatred and unjust prejudice which identifies racism, and the respect of these existing things brings more peace and is more respectful than foolishly and in good-intention-ed fashion, making good intention-ed but distressing encroachments upon others that in fact are not respectful. Essentially wisdom is better then good intentions in many cases, and does not mean that hatred is greater because of it, which should be the case without having to be said. When a person has this respect, and this decency, and also righteous love in them, then this seems to be more what is wanted and required by all. Essentially, good-intention-ed people, wanting to continue efforts, sometimes move into bad directions without meaning to in ways that are distressing to others. We are the Nazis who were so before Hitler, during the war, and are after. We are country that defeated the weird dork who was trying to be cool like us and like cool people, the failed painter, and weird guy, who seemed to do everything wrong to try to be cool and added weirdness even to that.

	As for the spoiled-brat slaves who retaliate against us at times, even with after-the-fact treason, we are able to find capable slave wranglers if it is neccessary.

	Now are Muslims not compatible with North America? Indeed, in truth, they are not, but are because of the obediance of the angels, and a separated people because of it, for North America is the realm of Nazis and Jews and even Christians, and Muslims are separated in a way, in a different realm, than those other people who have the Lord. Now if they dwell among you, then you will at least understand it, and they can then understand it, so that there can be more chance of peace. They are not meant to assimilate and conform to North American ways that much, as other people would do so if they immigrated to North America. Now the children of angels are not always the good hackers, but they are sometimes other things, and yet they are most often found outside of certificates and degrees because of their parents that they have later become the children of and because of Heaven. Now I have blessed the Wokowski brothers, and if they do not like me, I respect it, for they seem to have considered things that angels might consider, and they have been like trust-worthy friends, so far, who are having great understanding, to the children of angels, as far as I have seen, but then I do not meddle, and it is not my place to meddle. Now they support defending gay people, which is the same sex desiring the same sex, and it is only seeming a thing that the children of angels would not attack, for they are children of angels, and to what measure they follow a religion, or the things of men and women, they will know for themselves. Now if they are taken to prison, as can happen to angels and prophets and all the Lord's people, then let the police give them special consideration and innocent offenders, who do not commit serious harm to others, who are as if innocent people who must be taken to prison, if it is so that they must be, that the police are giving them special protection and the criminals they are good to outside the area of prison in their actions, respect the Lord, that they are children of angels and not friends of the police even if the police are not for harming them. Now as for the children of angels, do not get caught.

	As for the elite soldiers who are David's, it is still uncertain whether or not David is an angel, and there is even some confusion at times whether or not those elite soldiers of his are angels. Now if anything has come from hell, than it is right to send it back, and if anything has come from hell, will it not be the only thing that would be of great concern in some matters, for if there is something among the soldiers that has come from hell, then you may be weary of it. Now what comes from hell, these things are not actually men or people but are things of the devil's, whether soldiers of the devil, beasts, splinters, giant spiders, terredactos, and all things that are already on the planet that the devil might do himself, for if even terrorists mimic the nations and their intelligence gathering and ways of war, the devil mimics the things of the Lord, for there is the prophet and the devil's thing that he sends forth to match, and the war at the level between heaven and hell is good against evil, where all good is for God's side and ground taken, and all evil is for the devil's side and ground taken, that this is a greater war, and is not Jews and Philistines, but it is Heaven against Babylon and the devil. Now terredactos, they are being reckless and it is known why, for they are not very smart and strange, and yet there are other large dragons, dinosaurs, and they are smart, but even a young angel is not able to wrestle them, and they cannot be wrestled even like a tiger, for those who would wrestle each other. For they have hard exteriors and yet are kind, and they have powerful tails, and spikes and are armoured, and they bruise and charge, and are difficult to wrestle or cuddle for some. Now the large raptor-like dragons respect men more than anything on Earth, and will kill them, and perhaps most of them are female. Now they are dangerous, and it is not right that they should be cured, for they cannot be cured. Now tyrannosaurus Rex is a thief against thieves and is majestic, and he is deadly and there are women who are so, for they have crowns of gold and treasures of gold and precious things. Now who hates them as much as some other things? But almost no dragon is really hated, unless it is the dragon that kidnaps children from villages and attempts to parent them, for the dragon is brutal, and cannot parent a human child or teenager, and it bruises and bullies and the child must be rescued quickly, and it is a serious thing, for it is as if it adopts other people's children, and yet it bullies and is brutal. Now it is hated and distressing. Now as for the children of angels, they have two sets of parents, and you have two sets of parents, being God and the parents on Earth, and the children of angels have the angels, God, and their parents on Earth. Now it might not have to be said, or it might, that no, an angel would not marry a child of angels unless it was not a child of angels within the domain of that angel, and yet I do not know all, and how all works, for what I do I know of other angels? But I have felt no rightness with any of the children of angels to consider that I would marry any one of them, to even know if there are any out of the domain of any angel, and so I have only been able to perceive that it must not be right for any angel to marry a child of angels, for it is perceived that all the children of angels are the reward of children to all the angels, and yet if any angel is having to be childless, then this angel will know. For if an angel is childless, than are any his children? Now are some of the angels of the Lord childless? But I do not know. Now wisdom on this level is hidden from me, or at least in this place, I cannot see, and have no sight. Now the luke-warm, who are men and women, are not as respectful, usually as the hot or cold, and yet there is still righteousness with them, and even strength.

	Now the military knows what a total disrespect problem is, and possibly a fruedean projection queen, although the second is the first as well. Now a small gang that goes rogue and carries out an attack on a person is usually motivated by religion or ideology, a child-hood issue (often envy) and supported by growing anger against something. Now are the children of angels to be told that they should not be concerned when the last of these can exist in the military away from the sight of others, where killings can take place, even of a person's own people, for religious reasons, or angry ideology, or where people can be arrested by slander within the military due to child-hood issues and strange envy against good civilians in a war zone? But abuse can take place during war, and much of it is downplayed by the report of fear, of panic, and other factors that might elicit more sympathy. Now the list of abuses goes on, and can become horrifying, and small groups can operate away from the eye of others, and anger can help others turn a blind eye to abuse and even torture by small groups. Now I cannot tell the children of angels that they should not consider the military any sort of group they should be concerned about. But if there is evil even at the top, and a certainty that also contains anger, and if they believe, with conviction, that they are the ones who know what is right about something, and yet would behave in this way, showing even more they do not know what is right, and are not the ones to make these decisions, than how can I tell any person that there is not things to report? But how each military is, depends on how well the soldiers understand the value of not committing abuse in this fashion, for better educated soldiers into global politics and even religion, and a resistance to discord sowing, are soldiers able to be better at functioning on their own. Now soldiers who are valued in this way, are less likely to commit abuse, in my opinion. But if some enter the military as already firm supporters of ideological terrorists or other types of terrorists, than what can be done? But the problem exists in police departments, in the military, in government agencies, in corporations, and in court-rooms, and every other place people are capable of doing evil, where they are required to have integrity and loyalty to their nation by showing in,tegrity. Now the children know things I do not know.

	Now if domestic terrorists have targeted many with harassment schemes and attempts to bankrupt or cause problems, because they believe that even good hackers are a problem for them, than I trust that government agencies will not be a burden and hindrance by delaying their efforts to protect our citizens.

	Now the remaining portion of the INCEL, are they not slaves and are they not causing too much evil? But the anti-Nazi neo-Nazis, are they not slaves? But they are also traitors. Now what are the slaves doing? But they do not handle their problems like humans, that the servant is administrator of matters, and not of slave owners, but the teenagers are liking him, and he is better to them, it would seem, and he handles the administration of houses, of domains, of all manner of fields and business, better at being presentable than many slave owners, and those religious people who are heavily burdened by the things of God, for the administrator is more diligent in the things of this world, of commerce, and business, of meetings, and gatherings, and the things of administration, and the slave owner is as if less presentable sometimes, and the religious person worthy to be a slave owner, even less presentable sometimes, for they are burdened by the things of the Lord even more. Now there is still, yet, a type of lazy man, who is wicked, and there is a wicked type who is like they are dreaming, and they are like dreaming in their cruelty and injustice, and brutal wickedness, as if dreaming while they are awake and their mouth brings forth injustice of chaos at times, as if babies who can not yet speak. Now these dreaming ones, are they not also like Sodomites, who are wicked and sycophantic, destroyers who were judged to be destroyed. Now some INCEL are these things, and they are as a violent gang of destroyers with no reason or cause, but their heart leads them, that they have no reason and they find excuse. Now why will you waste slaves with these, and kill them? But as for the anti-Nazis, who left the teenage realm, not being popular, and retaliated against the Nazis, are they not the slaves of the Nazis who have abandoned and then retaliated against the Nazis? Now why do they retaliate so? But their soul knows they are slaves and other slaves support them, and they have deceived some into giving them support when they are anti-Nazis and traitors. Now will they not say, but we will not commit anything that will be known to the public, for they will have reason against us? But they are the slaves of the Nazis, and we, the Nazis, must enslave them or there will likely be great problems.

	Now black people require protection from us at times, and much of the time, and as for the Old Testament, it is declared each, the world of it, separate for all people, a separate world of it for each people who are on Earth. Now then how does this make sense for the Jews, if the lost tribes are found in Salem and the tribes still there? But is it not also so in many places? But must they not be grafted to another people, that another people take Israel with them as part of what they have been grafted to? Now because they are having outcasts, what they spit out of their mouths are not traitors, for these have not betrayed David, and yet America supports those who remained, even to use them, exploit their existence, to wage injustice against other things and other peoples in a blasphemous way, for it is killing that is not condoned by a prophet, and they are claiming in ways that it is when they use those who remained to do this. Now those the Jews spit out from among their own, these have not betrayed David, and America has joined hands with killing, for they are not for the Christ in this way, that they partner with what is rejecting the Christ. Now there are outcasts spat out among them, and these are those passing the test when it is so, to have been devoted to truth and good to be rejected, that they are not traitors to David and are as Daniel revealed in Babylon, if it is so. Now the Pharisees, yet they were the slaves of the Jews, and they persecuted the Christ, and they are fools still living, being children of the devil, and not Jews, that without any consideration of it, they move to judge things that are holy and not for them, for they are the devil's, and his children. Now with ignorance and arrogance, they judge what is holy, judging David, and condemning him, and servants of the Jews have placed themselves, as if better than them who are Jews worthy to be slave owners. Now strong they have chosen over true strength, and violence instead of wisdom, and foolish complainers over words of peace and wisdom, that they have permitted more brutal things among them. Now is Palestine not the cause of this, for they disrupt and cause mayhem for the Jews and say they do nothing, because they were driven to a smaller area. Now were there not a people who voluntarily choosing to do so, sent people to build the Temple as part of David's son's burden upon them if they would stay in Israel? But Palestine is not as these, and they are not as a neighbouring nation that hates, but they are as a people who claim oppression when they should only mind their own business. Now because the war was not completed by Israel, they make themselves murderers and insatiable haters of Israel and Jews. Now are you not still on land that was not taken from you, but belonged to Israel prior? But they did not complete the task. Now rebellion like witch-craft, like things of Babylon, has been found in you.

	Now you are not like the others who are around you, for rebellion and wickedness not for war is found with you, that you are pure in what is like witch-craft, in strange things. Now all people groups have conquered in war and migrated at times, and taken land, and Israel was taken by you and by war it is taken back, and yet Israel has not completed what it started, and you have not been willing to show any reason in this thing, that another nation has taken land, and there was war, and they are not respected by you, as another nation, for the understanding and the respect is not found with you. Now there is even rebellion towards morality that is found with you because of your lack of respect for what has occurred and has been fair in that you are left with land, that the rebellion is great enough to be rebellion like witch-craft. Now where is the fear of God in it? But where is the understanding of war? Now you have slayn children and civilians, as terrorists, and you have fired rockets at civilians, and you say, it is insolent, those who have taken land, and yet such is rebellion against truth, for where is the insolence of war in this way, when you have been left to have peace and have been left with much land? But Israel possessed the land, and by war, Israel has taken some of it again, and left you to have peace with land they have not taken. Now you are considered more like a thing of Babylon to me, and you are not like the many nations that are in the area or on the Earth, for what nation is like you? Now indeed the some Jews have been insolent in a way, and yet not towards you, but towards morality, that they have rejected the truth, not preferring it, and have exalted a false-truth as if it was truth, that it is insolent, for arrogance is found with these because of the ignorance, or lie, that the arrogance is based on. But it is not wickedness and arrogance, as the homicidal, for they are showing reason, and still respect of other people, and respect of the truth, that they are respecting morality much. Now is it not known that the young are among them? But they are not asked by any to be the elders, or to be the leaders.

	Now there is another evil on the planet, and it is those who have a neurosis for cleanliness that is externalized, who are finding all people and all animals, for it will later be so, to not be perfect, for all have fallen short of the glory of God, that they are having the aggressive and hostile neurosis that is externalized, to send a flood by the hand of a select people to wipe out all life on the planet, except for the plants, that the Earth might be clean, for humanity is fallen short of perfection, and is deemed too evil, for any evil is too great an evil for them, that they have judged that all people should be cleansed from the Earth, and next it will be the animals, if it is not already. Now these are hostile, aggressive, lacking all mercy and tolerance towards people, that they are a great danger to others, and must be removed, for there can be no civilization of pleasures and luxuries and leisure because of these who place themselves as leaders and judges of justice against all people, to annihilate all luxury and all life, and all pleasure from the Earth. For these are dangerous, implacable, intolerant of people, and they are neurotic beyond neurotic, and their neurosis is externalized. Now the military, David, may have to deal with them, or some group in society must deal with them when they are harassing and continuing their great aggression, for they cause fear in others because of their hostility, and ruin society, that luxury and leisure cannot be enjoyed by a wealthy people where there is not really any poor, for even the poor are as wealthy people in those places. Now they come in the form of slave and servants and any thing that is on Earth, and they are the select people, but selected by who? For they are those hating humanity and finding humanity in great error, in great fault, that all people must be killed from the Earth. Now first they are against people, and they are saying, yet the animals cannot sin, and are blameless, that they do not need to be wiped out. Now, yet, later will the animals be considered blameless? But if they have indeed said, the animals cannot sin and are blameless, then the animals will be spared by them, that they do not find fault with the animals. Now the Lord has sent a Rainbow, as a sign, and who has commanded these to wipe out all life on the Earth? Now they are indeed insane, but not in the manner of any insane person, for they judge the insane unworthy of life as well. Now when a child comes of age, they are considered as guilty as any other, and even the virgin is guilty. Now a queen who is good is being a man, that she is still a woman, but she is having the virtues of a man, and knowing the correct ways to do things, honouring and respecting God in the right way, continuing in her womanhood and yet having more virtue and morality than any daughter, whether a daughter of Sarah or a daughter of Eve. Now a queen has saved and protected angels in her greatness, she has cast her crown before the Christ, and the greatness of John the Baptist is comparable to her, for she is even knowing this cruelty at times, that she is as him. Now integrity and justice have made her a pillar, and she is a beautiful statue, an allie of the Lord, a daughter to God. Now a man she has been, and incurring the hurts of a man who is the bigger person, with no comfort but from the Lord. Now a queen of such, she is virtuous, holy, and her wounds, they are as the wounds given to a prophet, or to John the Baptist. Now she swoops in and saves people of integrity, with a great ability, with might, she rescues good men, young and elderly. She says, but let it be so, if he desires another, that the Lord is strong with her, indeed she is like a temple next to the Lord, and she is tested with heavy tests, at times. The fear of God is strong with her, indeed she is not like other people.

	Now there is an enemy prostitute who hates the man and wife who are so spiritually before they meet, that she engages in attempting to hurt, for she is not the wife and not able. Now she would have been the wife of another, for truly she had never had love, but hatred, that she is lost, without knowing, and alienated in her heart towards others, that she is not one of the people, indeed she can not be married, for she has fallen before meeting any man, saying, I am only a concubine, and if one has made her fall, yet she will take revenge upon another for it. Now if one has caused her to fall that she is believing herself a concubine, yet she must first deal with what has occurred, and integrity must be achieved, that she is not hating the people, because she is not one of the people. Now what has cast her out from being one of the people before she meets any man? But she is a virgin or not, and more likely a virgin, and possibly with great hatred because of neglect from some, and not even her father or mother, that she is too angry in her soul to take love, to be at peace, for her soul's desire for revenge and hate, is greater than any love she would have towards her. Now she is neglected, insecure, tremendously jealous, hurt by her own jealousy when none has offended her, treacherous towards herself, and thus treacherous, her mind imagining treacherous, and herself unable to be stable in much and trusting in much, for she suffers jealousy and hurt by her jealous imaginings and says, I will take revenge for my hurt that I inflict myself with, and I have been neglected, for what I behold is too pure and good for me, that I must not have it, for my heart breaks to hold it, and indeed it is too good to have, that I must destroy myself, and destroy others, for by Heaven, the wrath of God will come upon them, and they will be struck down, and I will destroy myself with a great calamity that will take the lives of others, for what I was given to hold is too much for me and too good, that my heart seizures and seizes and stiffens and I am afflicted. Now she says, I will die, and I will bring the wrath of God against others, that they might be as if dead and servants and slaves, for I go out to set fires to cities, to kill and kill myself. Now, she says, bring death onto my head, that I might be desolate, and kill others who are not worthy, for the soul does it, it carries the person, and it is done. Now it is the death of one who was not the wife. Now she has touched a pure water and fled to a pit.

	Now a prostitute is stubborn when she is an enemy, and yet prostitutes of the a person's people are not for the harm of any citizen. Now she is perverse in her wickedness, believing in her own manipulation, that she is knowing of a good thing of men towards women, and saying, yet I will exploit the compassion that is not for me, that it is the hurt of women towards them, as if women have struck them, and yet it is the choice of men towards women, that men are guilty against God, that they, women, are not involved in God and men, and the Lord is not against men, as if He, too, was a fool. Now she is deceived, being an enemy, and being of great hate, and jealous of men and women and with great hate of men and women. Now she is a cowardly enemy, roaming about the people, in a nation where she does not belong, and she is worthy of torture as an enemy who is cowardly in this way. Now soldiers have been attacked by attempts of cowardice and wickedness, of combat that is not part of war, of attempts to slay with guile and of attempts to distract, and of attempts to denigrate and even label as animals. Now the enemy servant is a wicked coward, like a foolish and wicked weasel in his slanders against soldiers. Now does the enemy not know how to denigrate, how to sexually harass with words, how to throw mud on soldiers, how to label as animals? But many men have the understanding of how to do so, for it is an easy thing. Now it comes from the mouths of enemy servants, does it not? Yet who hates the heart that says, get off your high horse. For is he not a friend who rebukes you with jest? Now does it not come from a heart of good and wisdom?

	Now what people do is what they are, even if they themselves are deceived by themselves, being deceived.

	Now those who wish to destroy another nation, will they not support and defend everything that might be harmful to that nation? Now will they not even support an incompetent leader, if the leader will destroy the nation? Now will they not also introduce concepts that are wrong to the people? Now will they not support discord? Now there are many ways a foreign enemy that influences can destroy an entire nation without firing weapons, and they are able to place people in another nation. Now this is a cold war that can destroy a nation entirely, and it is a great national security threat. Now where there is something that is harmful, it is supported and defended, and when there is something that is good, even then, sometimes it is fought, for it is war, whether a cold war and a war with bullets and bombs. Now what nation is your nation's enemy? But have they desired to persecute religion in your country, that you must become a refugee? Now will they not support and defend the persecution of religion, and every mistake that is made by people in a nation? But they will fight an incompetent leader's opponents and those who pose a problem to that leader, even fighting the citizens who might be bad for something that is bad for the nation, fighting them specifically, even, as a citizen. For thus is a cold war, that those who are good for a nation, as a citizen, are deemed a problem for an enemy nation, if that enemy nation wants for bad things to prosper that the nation is destroyed.

	Now do they sow discord with your allies, even doing so towards your artists? Now who says it is all reasonable, for cold war is war.

	Now a reasonable type of segregation is usually required so that abuse does not happen, and all groups require protection from each other. Now if the segregation is not punitary in fashion, rediculous, then it is acceptable and a fashion of segregation is described prior, although more segregation, and different versions are possible. Now when the segregation is not ridiculous, is not being exercised in a degrading and foolish way, then it is likely to eliminate abuse and allow each group to become established and prosper. Now separating is often a way to lessen chances of abuse. Now this is order that lessens chances of abuse.

	Now if sociopaths cause a problem for any people, some of them are in fact large dragons, it would seem, in human form, and they are not citizens as others. Now if any prospers off lack of segregation, or benefits in some fashion, then it may be noted. Now black require protection from white people, and they are having problems because of white people, that they are seeming to be problems because of white people. As for Salem, it is part of North America, and it is not England, even if it has connections to England. Now those who say bastard, are sometimes the bastard, and Salem is having what it may. Now Salem, yet it is not even NDP, and yet such seems as if a thing of Salem, and yet it is not Salem. But Salem is a nation, and it is Nazi and Jews who are emerging and have emerged. Now those who are citizens do not adapt and compromise what they know to be morality and what they know to be wickedness and nothing more than that, despite attempts to call these things something else. Now all ethnicities are bringing forth citizens, and they have the Lord when they are having him, and they are made citizens, and they are Nazis by this thing and Jews by this thing and the Lord's children by this thing, for they are becoming sons and daughters of God. Now those who speak against it, speak against their own life, or lives, that it becomes clear they have come from hell and must be sent back. Now the Old Testiment world is separate for each ethnicity and it is true for all ethnicities if it is that they are Jews, that those who merge with them, to bully with anything are not included. Now why will you respect a wicked fool from another group, to exault them beyond those of them who are men, who are good? Now do not the rebellious against the Lord bring accusation when they are wicked? Now an atheist is never a terrorist unless they are some other thing that is religious, and the Jews of Salem, the Nazis, they are not giving disrespect by regarding the wicked to be those of another people. But they are the wicked. Now if any is a child of angels, then they are not children of all angels. Now I have felt that is wrong to be married to one of these, perhaps due to a military honour of not causing problems, that it is seeming wrong in some way, and it is not desired. Now I am childless, and none of these are my children, and if there is a deacon of the Earth, I do not know. Now this has been written between the sign passing between Saturn and Jupiter and its pass of Earth, and The Diary of Lucifer has been written between this time. Now I have a wheel of the book of Ezekial, and no horses, and Ijeshil, which is written about in The Diary of Lucifer and the angel has been in a city in Salem, among those who are not the remnant of the Jews, and he has been the sign of Solomon, and the king of Salem. Now the woman with Adonijeh has even gone to war against Solomon in a way, and what Adonijeh has done, I do not know, or if he has even known what she has done, and yet Solomon and Adonijeh, are they even enemies? But they are brothers and not enemies. Now in his youth the angel was Prince Rellium, the sign of him, and yet not in terms of the children of angels, for he was like one of the children of angels that the sign was not against them, but was for them, and like them, and against what they are against, that the sign did not go with this thing, but was as the children of angels in this thing to be against Prince Rellium, even, in this thing, for the sign was different, and because the sign was as a child of angels, it was not against criminals, for the children of angels are not against criminals, except those who do what is beyond the realm of a criminal in heinous things, for they are against what criminals they are against, and are supportive of good things, being children of angels. Now it is complicated. Now the angel has known it by wisdom, that there is one who is given opportunities and honour and blessed because their son is honourable, that those who see their son are have met them are giving opportunities and blessing to the father because of the son, and it is a spiritual thing that is with all people. Now as for the children of angels, but they have the angels in heaven, and none who comes to Earth is having them as children if it is not so, for it is a thing between heaven and those on Earth, and not a thing between Earth and Earth, for these children are adopted at whim, and when they are not adopted by an angel, they are not his, for they are orphan children, in the keeping of the orphanage of angels, and they are the children of the angels, and there are the devoted parents of them, who are their fathers and the angels who are too young yet, or for different things, than to be fathers, and it is not wrong, for they are not right for it, and it would not be right, that they are not meant for it, and are not capable, and yet do they not still like the children of angels? Now do they not, even the young angels, swoop in and temporarily adopt some of them, and is it wrong? But the children of angels have those who are their devoted fathers, by the spiritual right of it, and Lucifer is not one of the devoted fathers, for he is a young angel, and yet he has liked the idea of taking care of some of them temporarily. Now it is a thing of the angels, that is between heaven and the children of angels, who are like orphans in a way, and yet they have their Earthly parents still. Now indeed, they are perhaps the furthest, then, from being bastards. Now I write this last crude word, because of the evil on Earth and the cruel tongues of some, to ponder and come up with evil when they are against something. Now is there not fault found even with the angels, and their works, if they write anything down, and are there not angels older, and there is the Lord, who is all wise and all knowing. Now as for the angels who are on Earth, will the devil not attempt to mimic in combat and war, to match the war of heaven, and it even will cause confusion for some for him to produce many false things and present things the opposite of what they are. Now what expense will he spare when there is an angel on Earth? But it is a very serious threat to him, for it is like something that has many great weapons to cause a major loss for his war, that it is like a great emergency for him, and not being a fool, he will likely not spare much expense, for he is a great motivator of his servants, and able to turn their hearts and make their hearts strong for his will, that they are prepared to die, without really knowing why. Now let Prince Rellium, at least, never betray the angels and betray the Lord, to turn against the Lord, for he is a prince of Salem. Now let it be also so for Prince Fellion, the prince of Salem who is south of Prince Rellium, that though he pursues children of angels, yet let him not betray the Lord.

	Now let there not be segregation, when it is not agreed upon, and is a thing for evil, that the intention is only for evil, and for abuse and not to eliminate abuse that all should be established and prosper. For the children of angels are less simple than Lucifer in this way, that the angel has consulted the sign of Solomon within himself to find the solution in theory that is not always the same in practise, and yet it is sound wisdom if it is really for eliminating abuse.

	Now as for the INCEL, some are serial killers who have decided they are stronger together, and some have been in hot water before, as is the expression, being caught for something by the masses or a few, and one of these is returned by the angel to a greater thing for they were not the same as the other, and the other is sentenced to death, for their wrongs are many. Now as for those who are returned to a greater thing, the angel has identified priests that were in hot water because they were priests and it was not understood and so they were in hot water wrongly. Now some, still, are sociopaths, for INCEL is the prison, and the sociopaths upon growing older, were suffering the consequences of being sociopaths, that they joined a gang, and these are also the serial killers, although they are those who are proud, who did not like the consequences of their youth as sociopaths, for the divide became greater, even, than it was. Now what else is in the prison INCEL, I do not know, but some are to be brought out, for they did not belong there, and some were good men, who were for decency, and not for abuse, for they abused none, and some even resisted those who would commit abuse to others because of decency and good, and they were in prison wrongly. Now bring out those who are wrongly in prison, and as for those who belonged there, they have had their time, and the gallows are ready for them. Now the slaves among them, if they are not to be put in chains, than it is better they are sent to the gallows. Now find Joseph, for if he is Joseph, he will be able to discern, for Salem is also tolerating those things they call American, and in Salem they are not called American but are associated with a house from the Old Testament, that some are priests of Solomon's palace, and priests of the people, and wise men, and other good things. Now they are those for greater decency than the average citizen, that the heart does not comprehend and suspects something with suspicion, because there is in fact suspicion to be had, for they are not like the other citizens, but are often priests of some type, Levites, if you will, types of wise men who are given a special place and portion. Now some of these have been sent to types of prisons, of Mala, wrongly, and they should be brought out, and Joseph is able, and he was sent to prison.

	Now let Salem be more wise than Egypt. Now where there are those truly protecting because of decency, that they save people from abuse of some type, truly, than bring them out of prison and given them a greater thing than they had, for because of the chaos, priests have been placed in hot water, suspensions and other things, and Salem is actually wiser than Egypt, and can be. Now if the Prince Rellium does not always understand, yet it is harmless that he does not always, for he is loyal to the things of his position, and yet he is for peace with you, and you are able to be for peace with him, for the sign, at least, will yield to your council, being innocent. Now a priest need not be a zealot, if they are a priest, if horrible things are not occurring in the world, and yet slanders take place, and so hold the priest back and protect where there is slander or misunderstanding and confusion. Now as Prince Rellium, I did not understand, but yielded to the wisdom of others, now my heart was ready for war, but was easily cooled. Now some have been placed in prison, or fired as they call it, had credentials taken away, suspended, and so on, and if they have joined a prison gang in a way, which is INCEL, than it is still the case they should be brought out of prison if they are a priest. Now as for the sociopaths in prison, who did not like the even greater consequences when they became older, and because they were too proud for the consequences, for they may have been exceedingly proud, and they have escalated from what they already were, being in keeping with what they were, to become a serial killer based on child-hood issues, envy, and jealousy, that they do not mind their own business but go out to be serial killers, than these are for the gallows, for they should have died prior. Now as for the perverse abusers, the child molesters, the rapists, the child abusers of injustice, and not people of decency, the gallows are for these, for some are to be brought out of prison and out of the prison gang, that is INCEL, and some are for the gallows. Now Joseph is able.

	Now if any merely hates themselves, loathing themselves, that they become a serial killer and stalker, and doer of wickedness, than these too are in prison. Now the priests you have, and they are the priests in Salem that are made so by the Lord, and at times some of them have taken zealous action to kill, and yet hold a priest back when there is a misunderstanding and protect. Now if there are any priests in neo-Nazi gangs, then let them sort and figure and do what should be done, for the angel may have cause against the neo-Nazis, even though he is fair shaded, for they have been anti-Nazis, which is not the same as joining a prison gang for protection, for neo-Nazi gangs are not prison gangs for protection, but they are a group attacking as spoiled-brats, and the angel will not give them aid in figuring out what they must figure out, for the gangs are such that it does not lend excuse the way a prison gang for protection might have some excuse for some. Now the anti-Nazis are slaves.

	Now Ottawa is the meeting place, and the city of the meeting place, and the leader of the meeting place is not as powerful as a single king or queen in Salem, but they have influence if a king or queen chooses to follow it, for the kings and queens ignore influence at whim much. Now some things they are not able to ignore, and yet they are still able to ignore all.

	As for the priest-hood, if there are priests who are calling themselves neo-Nazis because of the chaos that was present before the revelation of the angel, for the revelation is wisdom given, and if the priests were zealous and because the kings did not write anything, and did not know, and the time was awaiting the angel to reveal, that the neo-Nazis were having mostly priests who are for greater decency, what some have called intolerance that is hard to understand, and they have not had any guidance except for the Lord, and what they believed to be right, and if it is the case that slaves who are fair have infiltrated their priest-hood to lead them astray and cause them to attack slave owners, being those worthy to be slave owners, and to attack Nazis, them being priests of the Nazis, that they were dorky and weird because they were priests, and they were actually holy and more zealous, that perhaps some should apologize, but the angel never bullied them or anyone, than still because of the slaves misleading them, there is a great problem that the angel is presented with, for there have been reports of slave things and slave actions reported about them, in the reports of some violence they have committed, and the angel has only heard from Prince Rellium. Now there is a great mess and discord because of what might have occurred and what might not have on many occasions, and Prince Rellium, not the sign, has pursued the neo-Nazis. Now if the priest-hood will be a priest-hood of Salem, then they must remain within the place of the priest-hood, not to attack slave owners and Nazis, and those Jews not of the remnant but the Jews of Salem who are all the tribes, who are of the priest-hoods own people. Now a priest-hood does not ever attack its own society, for such are priests, that they do not attack, but maintain and support their own society, caring greatly about their own people and what is decent and right more than others, having a greater ability to perceive in this way that is an ability of priests. Now it is slaves who are fair who attack their own people, and would forbid their own people of religion, or anything they desire to do, for priests support the freedom of those worthy to be slave owners, and are not genocidal in anything against their own people, for the priest-hood must say, yet all our people are free in all ways and in all things, that we support our people, and if they say such and maintain such, then it will be understood there are no slaves among them, for it is slaves who attack slave owners, for people are what they do. Now because there have been reports of slave things among them, such as the forbidding of religion, for it is slaves who fear slave owners being spiritual, because it leads to slavery for slaves, and because there are other slave things like the promotion of slave qualities, such as physical ability, which is a thing required for slaves, there is great discord and there cannot be support, and Prince Rellium has reported many things against the priest-hood that has taken to the causes of white slaves to support a slave uprising of white slaves against Nazis. Now let them make their house right, for if the priest-hood has been deceived, and there is treachery and foolish slaves deceiving within them, then until further notice, there is no peace, and they are all white slaves, and involved in a slave uprising against the Nazis.

	Now let no group be deceived by an enemy nation and its infiltration and influence, for this also, is something to be weary of.

	Now Japan is different, and is it not so, and yet the polytheists and sometimes even those of China, are not those having the Lord, or who have had the Lord, for they are not in The Allied Domain which is the middle-east (Muslims), Europe (Christians), Latin America (Christians), Africa (Varied – Christians), Australia (Christians), Japan (Exempt), United Kingdom (Christians – Atheists), North America (Combining all the Allies of The Allied Domain). Now it is only the polytheists, and much of India is Muslim, who are seeming to be as some of China, who with North Korea are essentially those who have the obnoxious attitude of disrespect, disregarding location and all matters of decency and location intentionally, for it is the weaker side's insolence towards what is greater. Now it is considered polytheists and China, and communism—which is rationing, for communism might be a temporary emergency measure when capitalism has failed temporarily—might also be to blame for increasing the obnoxious attitude of the Chinese in their failing to communism, where they exalt themselves in their poverty more than they exalted themselves in their wealth, for they are rationing, and it is not a natural thing, and it is not the promoting of something like greatness in Mala, such as the truth, but is failing to rationing, and none accused, or spoke rudeness, that they are more obnoxious in their total disrespect problem that some of them have developed. Now it is a small part of the Earth not having the Lord, and atheists are considered to be citizens and one of the people within the society of Nazis and Jews, that is Salem, and that is the places where the allied domain is combined, and it is good that it is so, for it is truth.

	Now at present, let Russia and China remove themselves from Salem, for they have made incursions, and indeed we have Nazis, for we are all Nazis in Salem, or Canada. Now Salem is not a political party, but it is a nation, that is Canada. Now Salem also has the indigenous people, and they are part of Salem and part of North America, and these are not what is considered polytheists. Now it is desired, as want only, that their culture be preserved, for how if it is ever dwindling, yet is there not much more for them to learn? Now the Jews of Salem, yet we are all Jews, are not Hebrew Jews, but New World Jews, or even Jews of Salem, being Salem's Jews. Now what is our flag, really? But it is the leaf, the star of David, and the swastika. Now we are shore to shore, with mountains, some, that are for recreation. Now we are plains of cowboys, and fields for farmers, and cities that are great, and we are engineering, and scientific achievement, and pursuits of art, and great advancements. We are for abundant wild-life, respecting nature, and progress of industry, and we are not American, but Canadian. Now our Temple is among the mountains and forests, our golden, small cities, nestled among the rocks, our provender of silver and gold, flowing in the streams.




OF AVRAM AND ENOCH:




Now the sons of David, have they not dwelt with a Trooden, or some variety of it that is perhaps more peace? But the sign of Solomon cannot seem to deny the man Trooden what he wants, for though the Trooden's lungs cannot easily support cigarettes, yet the sign of Solomon is willing to give him free things again and again, and the Trooden tricks him, and though he knows it is wrong, the sign of Solomon keeps being 'tricked' by the Trooden, to keep giving to it. Now it comes back frequently to receive free things, and the things it receives are sending it on the ambulance, when it does not need to go, and the Trooden has gone on the ambulance 50 times in 50 days, and seems to enjoy the ride and the return trip, and does it really need the ambulance? But those who care for the sick seem to be happy to keep taking the Trooden and returning it. Now the Trooden is a large dragon, and why will any bully it, for its morality is different, is it not? Now if it cannot take interest in religion and spirituality the same, or find the same pleasures in some things men do or women do, why will it be blamed? But what sick person would try to cure it, as if it is sick in some way? But it is a large dragon. Now the large dragons are crafty in a way, and would they not kill the wife, who is physically weaker, usually, but the Trooden seems safe enough, for it does not seem to be the more dangerous variety of Trooden, and perhaps Enoch will discover it, and those who are Enochs. Now when there are men-large-dragons and women-large-dragons, would some believe it is a sign of Babylon? But why is it not a sign of Enoch re-emerging on Earth? For of course the Trooden mentioned, is in a man's body, that it speaks and seems dissatisfied with some of the things that would be enough for men. Now the men of Canada, Nazis, are not likely having the inclination to bully a large dragon, and are there not large dragons in Salem? Now are they wicked in some way, or are they only large dragons, that their morality is different? But perhaps the angel, too, is a fool, for if the large dragon is not hurting any, than why should it be bullied?

	Now there are of course slaves, male or female, but is there a difference much with slaves? Now if a slave owes you money, do they perceive that they look bad for owing money? But are they not brutal and attempting to use it to be as violent as they can, to humiliate, to be sycophantic, to denigrate a slave owner, for a slave does not perceive that they look disgraceful, and they do not perceive that it is a thing against them and their social standing to owe money, that slave owners are embarrassed, and people are attempting to show respect when they can, but slaves are not embarassed and seem to have no understanding or perception of it, that they are happy to owe money, and would use it to bully and try to humiliate those they owe money to, to be brutal and attempt to even be violent in what ways they can, if they are not physically able or it is not possible to physically attack. Now slaves do not understand morality, and it should be understood, for they do that which should disgrace themselves, and they are proud in it, as if boasting of it, for they are brutal and lacking the understanding of morality that is among slave owners, for they are greatly divided from servants. Now this later thing is a thing I have attributed, not to Enoch's time, but to Avram's time.




Now Esua is described in the Old Testament as Jacob's older brother who was more hairy and Jacob was smooth, less hairy, and Jacob's mother said that Esua should not be leader of the tribe, so that Jacob went out and tricked Esua by offering him a meal as a trade for Esua's inheritance, and later Jacob disguised himself as Esua so that his father, Isaac, gave the blessing and inheritance to Jacob, and he gave Esua, or his people, as servant to Jacob, but said, at a later time, Esua would throw off the yoke of the servitude. Now there are many among the INCEL who have a different way of doing things, that they have different opinions on what is right, for even their morality does not seem to be the morality of Jacob, that most people seem to have, but they have the ways of Esua, that is different, that he may be able to establish his ways and discover it once he is able to separate and become his own people. Now Esua's opinion of what a man should be, or being man, even in terms of behaviour, is different than that of people who are Jacob, for most of the Earth seems to be Jacob in terms of ways and opinions, whereas those of Esua have a different opinion of what is being a man and what is right for a man, and Esua is also having a different opinion of many things. Now is not Esua believing in being more manly, in his opinion of what a man should be? Now things that are not liked by Jacob, or acceptable to him, are liked by Esua and acceptable to him. Now the angel is believing that Jacob should let Esua's people go, for it was written that Esua will throw off the yoke, and the angel is believing it is easier if Jacob is making an effort to allow Esua to leave, perhaps for his own area, geographically. Now there is not other morality but the morality of Jacob and people are able to perceive the Lord, who is God, that I do not write about different religions, but Jacob is not a religion, and right reading is necessary for religion and books, but with concerns to Esua, there is only Jacob as morality, that Jacob is father of Joseph, the morality of Joseph, that Joseph knew, and Abraham is morality, the father of righteousness, and father to many different people groups, and Abraham pays taxes, as spiritual gesture, towards the more righteous Salem that does not write rules to book, only seeks greater things in terms of spirituality and righteousness and what is good. Now has not a Salem person considered that a man should not marry a woman who is like the wife he has, that he not cause trouble for her? Yet it is not written down as a command, and Moses did not give it. Now has not a Salem person considered, yet it is acceptable in this case, for nothing is written down. Now Abraham gives honour to the king of Salem, to Salem, which is being better than him and more righteous. Now as for Esua, and his different ways and different morality, yet Esua is a Jew, and a son of Isaac, that he is within the realm of Jacob and Esua, that are two sons of Isaac, that the matter concerns those of the morality of Jacob, that Jacob is the only morality still, even if Esua is throwing off the yoke, and is given a different place, geographically, for you are knowing what is right and wrong, and all people are able to perceive the Lord who is God.




Now why or how have Japanese people joined the ranks of the angels, who dwell on the platform that shakes, on the Island, but I cannot say if they have been right in what is called Shinto, as to which of these are high ranking angels they have given regard to, or if any woman of heaven, of the type with wings, or any other, has been mother to this thing, in a way, for I do not know. Now if angels have destroyed from places far off, and yet have the Japanese known this, for indeed it is said, He makes his messengers winds and flames of fire, and these seem to have somehow joined the ranks of the angels, to be part of the angels and their ranks, that they have been so upon the platform that shakes. Now it is not known by me if angels have been among you, Japan, in the ancient past, or if there are some presently. Now as for Shinto, I cannot say if it is correct in all that has been regarded, or what types of angels, and their roles, you have regarded. Now though the Japanese are not angels themselves, yet they seem to have joined the ranks of the angels, being people, and a people capable of joining their ranks, I have been pleased by this thing.




Now you have many priests in society not affiliated with any group and not knowing they are priests, and yet still they are priests and the Lord has made them priests. Now if they are seeming less tolerant, yet you know what is acceptable, when to stand up for yourself or even attack, and when to have consideration, for they are priests.

	

Now as for foreign influence and Babylon, Babylon is foreign influence, and Babylon, for an insufficient summary, is an alternative society of tax collectors, enemy prostitutes, border-line sociopaths, people not one of the people, orchestraters of fraud and injustice, and general con-artists who exist often in government, and in many other places, who will, out of the strong impulse in their heart, betray the country fully, and its interests, to commit treachery at every level, so that it can be assured that if foreign influence and foreign enemies ever try to accomplish something, Babylon will aid them, and fight for them against a nation. Now the angel knows already that there is a threat from Babylon and foreign influence, or enemies, for he must be identified with Salem, and Babylon, being the devil's, is the enemy of the angel, and there are always small pockets of it among higher areas of government, so that without the majority they are carrying out their missions. Now the angel is not concerned, even about the priest-hood of neo-Nazis, who he believes have temporarily been deceived in some ways to be anti-Nazis, for the angel is not a priest of any type, but the angel, too, is a Nazi. Now foreign influence can carry out false-flag attacks, and Babylon will aid any enemy against a nation, for it does the will of the devil. Now if some criminal gangs, too, are aided and influenced by foreign influence that have entered Salem, and temporarily, at times, carry out terrorist missions in a more concealed fashion by making it appear as if a person was involved in crime, by starting altercations and then killing them, or attacking them, then the military, David, is required, and Canada is not America, for though America tolerates criminal gangs, it was never said that Canada would do so, for we are not able, like America, to indulge them. Now if any such things are giving power to Babylon, than is there not terrorism taking place, for since when do criminal gangs work with Babylon? But what compassionate person ever wanted anyone to hand their nation over to foreign powers and to Babylon? Now free speech must be protected and there is never a threat in free speech, but there is a threat in actions. Now who says, but they orchestrate for what I believe? But this is not reasonable when a person does not know.

	Now no foreign power has a right to complain that our people should have our priests and our spirituality, for Salem is having the non-Hebrew, or New World Jews, the Nazis, the priests of different houses who believe in decency and defend others against abuse, those who are Salem people, who are citizens and one of the people, and do we also have Pergamon? But the angel does not know. Now Babylon is found in governments, even in some corporations, con-artists, fraudsters, doers of wickedness against the good, traitors to a nation, horribly unrighteous and evil. Now to censor the people in free speech in realms that for the citizen to have free speech, it is already an act of treason, and it is an act for foreign enemies. Now has David said that Babylon is to be king? But the half-terradacto woman with Adonijeh, yet her time is to be over, for the government is the woman who has layn with David and yet he did not have sex with her, and will the one I call Uncle Joe, for his name is not as easy as some others, be then a noble and right leader of the meeting place, that he is a right governor and leader and set many things right? Now has not the spirit of David said to the angel, no, I have not given the kingdom to Babylon to inherit.

	Then Babylon is not to even be here, and it is treachery more than the treachory of a son of David, like Adonijeh, who has many times encroached upon his brother. But Babylon is offender to both Adonijeh and Solomon, and to Absolom, and to all of David's sons, to Prince Rellium and to Cessus, and to the preist-hood, and to all the priests, and to the criminals, even. Now then it is even a threat to allies, for if it is a threat to all, then it is a threat to all the allies that the nation has. Now it is a few, and yet it carries out great evil in the open, and it is not the people, but it is Babylon.

	Now it is probably foreign influence that has attempted to outlaw our priest-hood, and when the priest-hood is more free, there is less likely-hood of abuse in a nation. Now when there is a reasonable segregation then those of darker shades are protected and able to be established and prosper. Now what is in between the rich and the rich? But is it not the impious servants, the Babylonians, and even the slaves? But there are no poor in North America, and all are sons and daughters of the nation, and if there are princes, than it is so, but it is not so by money, for money is not offering anything in Salem, unless there is money added to Mala. Now between the rich sons and daughters and the other rich sons and daughters, there are the impious servants, the Babylonians, those who strive and are impious, those who compromise and are servants of the devil, and all those things that the sign of Solomon might mention, but it is not within The Diary of Lucifer unless there is only some, and it is not mentioned in this essay, the many things for the sign of Solomon to mention. Now the angel perceives these things, and yet they are another area that must be fulfilled. Now there are those who strive, who compromise, who are impious by inferiority, because of striving, those who praise and cling to what has little weight and worth and attempt to ingratiate themselves to much money like scavenger dogs mentioned in The Diary of Lucifer and it is not a thing of being one of the people, but it is a thing as if an alien who is an enemy. Now it is the requirement of every immigrant to be one of the people, and it is not required for any citizen to offer them special privileges and treatment. Now to mention it is a thing of the sign of Solomon. Now Solomon, much of his wisdom, they have called being 'a conservative' and others might still say 'a moderate liberal', and others 'a liberal' and yet it is truth. Now from the sign of Solomon, there is the belief in segregation to lessen abuse, if the segregation is reasonable, and the belief in types of priests in the police force, for there are some capable, and is it not good? But many priests can be zealous. Now there are loyal of the darker shade, worthy to be slave owners, mighty men, as well, who are like angels, who are of the darker shades. Now they are one of the people, and what will the priest-hood say? But the priest-hood believes in a type of order and segregation that there is no offence to any. Now it is not among soldiers or those working together for something. But how can an angel even fulfill it while he is on Earth? But the angel knows that there are good from all people. Now where there are good men, and yet they go to abuse another group, then is it not the servant who eggs them on? But I write about a situation where there is able to be segregation and peace, and not situations where there has been instigation. Now by peaceful leaders between peaceful leaders, the offend or is able to be punished when there is a provisional tribal anarchy of separation, that those who throw the head over the wall, know what a treachery it is to them, that a person does so to be within their walls. Now still, is it not servants of the devil who are practising injustice, and the wicked who go out to stir up trouble and do wickedness in an ungrateful way, out of ingratitude for peace? But those with gratitude are already possessing a thing of wisdom. Now if a servant goes out to be impious, does he not go out to cause trouble? But if a wicked person goes out saying, they threaten me, when they are not, than is any grateful? But if any causes trouble in wickedness, there is not gratitude for peace. But by segregation there is respect for all, when it is a reasonable segregation, that it lessens abuse and brings peace. Now there is a king taking it for granted, when it is already so, for how can a king practise segregation? But it is not possible for a king, and yet is he to be accused? Now let the priests be more, and given great wisdom, and all priests, for it is good that they should be having much ability of wisdom in what they do, for the polytheist is not having the Lord, and yet all others are, and the person of China is not an enemy, and yet when they are zealous for their government, then they are being obnoxious, and yet in another time they would not be, if not for the zeal for their government, that China is not in earnest a problem. Now if the polytheist is being obnoxious, then is it not because they are alone on the planet, with no other group comparable to them, and they are having no real companion in what they are, for all others are not like them.

	Now what does the liberal say? Yet there must be free speech and religion and the writing of religion, must be free for the people, that if any use liberals against free speech, they blaspheme a right thing in an exceedingly wicked way. Now Muslims say, yet let them not harass and defile with their perverse mouths, if any of their mouths be perverse, for some are even sycophantic. Now Babylon is against all, and all religions, that it practises only cults of the devil and forbids religion and truth, and it is like groups of enemy soldiers who are splinters and like small fortresses at the beginning that are able to lay some measure of siege. For they come in large dragons, and harass and cause trouble and lay siege to towns and cities. Now Daniel has slayn it, and how, who would know? But he has never been near to it, and it is not even a public thing. Now Joseph has risen much in a society not better than the society after Moses, for Egyptians placed priests in prisons, and there was chaos in a way, for innocent people were placed in prisons that they had to be returned. Now Salem is, and can be better than Egypt. Now free your priests if they are innocent, return them to their place, and even more, be better than Egypt, do not place them in prison, do not remove them when they are innocent, and better still, be not causing hurt and doing wrong when there is technicality to do so by only the morality that is given to people, men and women, who are Jews, if you would be a person of Salem, but it is not a thing of command, for you are free, people of Salem, for the Lord is your judge, because of your great innocence that you desire more advanced things and greater wisdom. Now for you, people of Salem, I will offer you nothing in terms of advice, for you are as the king of Salem, and do not think that you should be Jews.

	Now Prince Rellium was with the children of angels in what he liked, the sign of Prince Rellium.

	Now the priest-hood of Salem's Jews, or the New World Jews, they are keeping right freedom for the Salem people, for children of angels, for the eccentric, even those who are going into what is called cross-dressing, and yet if it is not so, are they not harassing the people and being foolish that they attack what cannot be attacked, for even the Jews could never be too strict in things. Now they are able to have the wisdom in The Diary of Lucifer although it is not declared to the priest-hood first and foremost, and they are understanding that Muslims are not compatible, but they are knowing why at this time, and so the priest-hood is given non-criminal status by me, if they are able to follow the giving of right freedoms towards their own people, and to allow liberty in things where they are not required, for who requires discord? But abuse comes with encroachments and chaos comes from it, and why is discord required or to be added?

	Now when Egypt is foolish, when it is as if spoiled and foolish and even wicked, than it is not liked among those who are men and women, and those one of the people, they are not Egyptians.

	Now priests are good, and others know their goodness, and they have a greater sense of decency, that they are called intolerant, by some, in this present time, and yet they are tolerant and good, especially towards their own people, for are they not greatly supportive of their own? But other people groups they are not truly evil towards, but are patient, and yet because of the zeolous actions Egypt and its chaos has labelled them as evil and terrorists, and it has portrayed them as ignorant people, as if gatherings of slaves, and yet even if they have taken mighty into their groups, they are not, unless deceived, I believe, in any way for adopting concepts and ignorance of white slaves, for they are, as I understand, greatly against this. Now not all those who are seeming overly sensetive, as if intolerant, are priests in our society, for a priest is not really so, and it is a wrong lie that has become nested in the spirit and mind, that intolerant people, impatient, volatile, quick to wrath and anger, greatly angry about things that are nothing, are like the priest-hood that call themselves neo-Nazis. For we do have abject types, false-priests, fools in our society, and they are not neo-Nazis, but only people who are fools and even border-line sociopaths, their image being posited upon priests, when it is not right, that I call them false-priests, and they are likely border-line sociopaths, not like priests, for the priests are good and for their own people. Now is most are Nazis and not neo-Nazis, who Nazi priests, being priests of the Nazi Salem Jews, which we call Canadians, and of course, some are more Nazi than others, for we are supportive of lions and righteousness and also justice and fairness, and we are not actually a society that believes in bullying, for we are a society that is against evil, in earnest, that we might understand that the bully not slitherin, is not often evil, and yet when he is, are we not defending others, and the priests, too, know what is good. Now slitherin is wicked and evil, and the priest-hood is not slitherin, and yet those of slitherin, they are the white slaves of white people, if they are truly slitherin, that the angel detected the infilteration of white slaves into the population of the priest-hood, and attacked the whole of them because of it, and yet the priest-hood, the majority, is not for slaves and ignorance, and things of slaves. Now as for slitherin, the white slaves, are they not the base cowards, and fools, and even sociopaths, who are not supportive of their own people, truly, but feign support, as sociopaths? Now I use the word slitherin, because it is known to the masses, because of the angel's two predessesors, Tolkein and Rowling, who he has been influenced by and has considered both to be offering concepts that the people can understand. Now the priest-hood is not slitherin, and is not anything found in anything of these people who wrote. Now liberals are not Egypt, but a portion is given to the confusion of Egypt, because of the exploiting, false-liberals, who are speaking for money, who take things too far, so that liberals cannot understand. Now Egypt is not people of darker shade, either, except when it is. But the Jews were not always as advanced, spiritually, and for a great time they were at the level of Egypt. Now Salem is, and can be, better than Egypt. Now conservatives and liberals, both, have harboured slaves who are white, and the slaves sow discord, and create a false image of both parties, that are political, and both parties exist in Salem, and are in earnest, noble, and for reason. Now it is the slaves who are in both parties, whether liberal, white slaves, or conservative, white slaves, who sow most of the discord, and are the voices heard often, because they are more extreme, and less reasonable, and there is greater profit to their voices being heard for those who are in the media. Now the conservative, white slaves, say to slave owners, get a job, or work, and the soul of these slaves is fearing the yoke and the field, that slave owners they wish to work, and the white, liberal slaves are saying impious and blasphemous things, calling ignorant and racist and incorrect and hateful, when it is not so, for the slave owners who are conservatives are attaining truth of reason and Jews, that they fear a society where they will be given what they would call persecution. Now those who call slaves of either ignorant and hateful and such things, are not wrong, and yet it is expected that slaves are so, for they are even worse than their words, but as for the noble of either party, who calls them ignorant and hateful when they are being reasonable. Now the children of angels are blameless, if they have done this, for their words are on a different level, that they have committed no wrong, for when they speak so, it is on a different level, because of what they are, that it is innocent, and there is no guilt or condemnation for them, for such is injustice. For if the children of angels have said such about anyone, yet it is from the children of angels, who are able to be pure in their words against them, for they not those whose souls fear persecution, and yet when these things are found in the mouths of those who are far worse than those conservatives who are noble, then there is wrong for it. Now the children of angels will know which people speak this way and are not wrong and which are the ones like hypocrites, because they are much worse than the ones they speak against.

	Now let them speak against me, and be blameless. For the children of angels are blameless in these things, and they are what they are. Now even if children of angels should speak against an angel to cite things of evil, yet are they not blameless? But what would be blasphemy for others, to blaspheme angels, is not so for the children of angels. Now those who are sicophantic are blaspheming even beauty, for beauty and purity offend them, and light offends them, that is pure, and good offends them, and the purity and good of priests offends them, for they are sicophantic, and wicked, and they are liking ugly things, and things that are grotesque. Now I have had no wisdom to see in an area, no ability to know, and yet have perceived it from the brothers who are as wise men considering things that angels would consider, that there is some special thing set aside, some future, for the children of angels, but I do not know, and what hidden things are kept for them, I do not know, or know if there are any of these things, although I have attempted to see and to know, and yet it is a place of no sight for me. Now the angel has a wheel that is found in the book of Ezekial, for will angels not use technology? Now the children of angels are greatly in technology. Now they use Linux, and the angel has given honour to it. Now they prepare for persecution with what is called The Tor Network. Now they are in prisons sometimes, and they are claimed to be causing mayhem on Earth, and yet do they really cause mayhem? Now there are corporations who have much abused the good and righteous, and they have partnered with Babylon and engaged in corruption against citizens, and pockets of Babylon are being found in areas of government. Now heros, not children of angels, have been placed in prison, and they are not criminals, and discord is greatly sown, not even by the priests, for do they really sow any discord? But the discord is heavily and greatly sown by actors who influence a nation, who are not part of a gang, and discord and deceptions are sown in great ways in society. Now is it foreign influence that does it, or something else? Now if rebellion of slaves has done it, to sow lies, and if foreign enemies have done it, to create impairment, then you are able to use wisdom and understanding. Now who attempts to guide the children of angels? But they require no guide. Now they are an orphanage, and they are less bastards than any person on Earth, and they have their Earthly parents, if they do, and if it is so. Now those who say, yet the Jews were evil, yet wisdom is evil, and yet does more abuse not come from foolishness and more death and more war, because of the lack of reason and the order of wisdom that lessens the amount of abuse?

	Now the priests are your aid, all people of Salem, to bring reason, and yet they are not perfect. Now remove the priests from prison, from the INCEL, and for those who were truly deserving to be in prison, they have been given time and the gallows are prepared for them. Now those heros, yet it is known that they have killed because of lack of defence from the police, when it is so, and you are knowing they are not the same as criminals. Now those who have acted in the defence of others when the police would not give aid, yet they are not criminals, and it is known. Now a wicked person pursues the righteous with zeal and yet a good man only must perform his duty. Now you are able to free the righteous, those who defended themselves, who were targets of those exploiting technicalities, when not in keeping with the nation, and you are able to seize the fraudsters and slanderers of Babylon, to avenge the Lord's people, to lay waste to wickedness. Now do not take the council of slaves to attack slave owners, or the council of angry servants, when they are with wrath, to obliterate an innocent people who are only against the impious ways of an angry servant. But a loose servant turns against his own, to attack slave owners of his own people and he attacks slave owners of another people, that you are able to be weary, with wisdom and understanding. Now the priests are for the maintenance of their own people, and what is right and even, at times, establishing what is right, for they are for their own, and a young prince even is diplomatic, that you know he will be different than the other people, and even not as segregated, some of them, because they are a prince. Now diplomatic leaders who are respecting the men and the pride of another people are sent to speak with those who understand the same, and there is no abuse, for one people is kept with their own and another people with their own, that both may be established and prosper. Now if one is loving the Lord, is good, is able to be one of the people, that for some reason, though it is rare, they desire to be among another people, and they are a person with integrity, not an enemy, than you are not fools with wisdom and giving of wisdom, but if there are many, is it not becoming a heavy burden, for some things must be as they must be for peace, and it is a thing of the sign of Solomon. Now be expecting different things from princes and kings, for they are having a different role in what must be for them and what they must do, and they are not even able to be segregated, that you not be blind. But king have taken wives from other people groups, and it is not considered wrong even by Moses and in the mouths of slaves, they accuse it as wrong, as if the mouths of slaves did not know the difference. But cannot any person marry whom they please, in Salem? But still, most do not wish to do so, and yet some do. Now the priests cannot criminally harass and cause paranoia in those worthy to be slave owners, and it is slaves who are brutal, who use sexual harassment even, in their sycophantic tendencies, who hate beauty and goodness, that the priests too, are also able to know what is right with regards to listening to the advice of slaves who have an opposite motive and agenda in their hearts, for the slave is against the Nazis, and the priests are the priests of the people, of the Nazis, that they are our Nazi priests of Salem.

	Now loyalty to our country is required for moral integrity in all things where government is involved, that patriotism brings about a direction against a person's own desires and heart to be aligned with what is good for the citizens and for the nation, being a loyalty to its citizens and a morality when employed in professional things, that the loyalty to the nation is the opposite of treachery that is pursuing one's own desires that are selfish, that it is disloyal to the country, for the loyal yields to patriotism, but the treachery of selfish desires, even gives way to the interests of enemy nations, and yet without enemy nations, it is still treachery and disloyalty. Now the treacherous generation, indeed it has traitors, and let them who are police be loyal to the nation, to morality, to justice, despite the cries of the unjust and wicked when they have exploited and blasphemed their own cry against injustice. For loyalty is to justice and truth, and it is patriotism, that the wayward heart is set on the right direction by patriotism, and there is known to be a time and place for other pursuits. Now this is written for matters of national security, that an enemy not be able to exploit good intentions and sentiments and blaspheme good sentiments by creating chaos in a nation, and even by the actions of police. But those who take bribes are a national security threat, and those who commit injustice and fraud, another national security threat. Now put aside the wayward heart, and folly, for integrity is saving the nation.

	Now the woman who lay with David, but did not sleep with him as a concubine or wife, who was wrongfully taken by Adonijeh, she being the meeting place, the government, who the sign of Solomon has said, is the terradacto, and a member of her, as a sign, attacked the sign of Solomon in a way, with her slander and strategy, and yet Solomon was safe, after the attempts to draw the sign of Solomon out that he might be arrested by Adonijeh, yet his prudence took no action, now the woman has been very incompetent, making many times worse, any problem that happened, adding homelessness to many citizens, and economic problems, when there was a plague that was not very dangerous, and not keeping evil people from harrassing and attacking the people with rillet (pride-harrassment and a verbal weapon of arrows of Gommorah, in the catagory of Gomorrah combat) and fear mongering greatly, and prolonging the pressures of the plague, and burdening the people too greatly, and removing hunting weapons from the people that were not dangerous, that could cause rebellion, and passing bills that could have been different, that could be exploited by terrorism in the future, and allowing others of the meeting place to behave and speak in a disrespectful about the citizens, as if tyranny had happened when it had not, and not speaking against this type of disrespect and foolishness.

	Now would not enemy nations have supported her, that she might destroy the nation, and aid in the destruction of its closest allie, if they, too would be attacked by that influence of cold war strategy that supports and defends every thing that is bad for a nation? Now by the destruction of Salem, would not the closest allie be greatly weakened, as if stricken from within, by a very dangerous decease, and if foreign enemies then supported every thing that was bad in the nation of the allies, would they not possibly collapse, for an enemy would attack those who would fight what is bad for a nation, would fight those who might help to remove an incompetent leader that the nation not be destroyed, and without being asked to do so, for it is strategy of cold war, and way to destroy a nation. Now if two nations were destroyed, Salem, and then America, the Western World would possibly fall to pieces. Now this foolishness of this 'terradacto woman' as the sign of Solomon would call her, has threatened the continuation of the entire Western World. Now her name is Abishag, and she is the government, and she is the leader of the meeting place. Now Abishag's foolishness, in making every problem much worse, and adding to burdens, and causing problems, has, in the opinion of the angel, even, threatened the entire Western World, including the middle-east, which is part of The West, but seperate, that it is middle-east, west. Now the selfishness of others, who have sought war for no cause, unless it is cosmic struggle that does not abide by truth, is a factor that can be supported by foreign powers, and likely would be, at a time of crises, to add to chaos that a nation be destroyed. Now when things are taken to an extreme, then the nation might really be in jeopardy, and Salem, though full of good people, is having the hardest time fighting a war that attacks from within, and America, though strong and powerful beyond all nations, is having a hard time fighting an attack from within, that to strengthen the cold war against one's own nation, when a person is a leader of much, is a threat against the continuation of the Western World.

	Now people, diagnose yourself, but it is hard to do, for an attack happening within, even if from outside, is hard to identify quickly and deal with. Now loyalty is required, by patriotism, at those times.

	Now what is the West? But it is Europe, the Middle-East, North America, Latin America, Japan, Africa, Australia, and The United Kingdom. Now Canada is seen to be a very neutral country, but it is not necessarily so anymore. Now people from all ethnicity can be INCEL which is at the lowest shelf of Orgoth, mentioned as the mountain in hell that rests above the abyss where the lake of fire is. Now the lake of fire burns as bright as the sun. Now at the lowest shelf before the abyss is containing INCEL and Orgoth is mentioned often in The Diary of Lucifer. Now the diary is long compared to this essay and is comprised of long and shorter proverbs, for much of it is compromised of paragraph proverbs. Now those who are at the lowest shelf of INCEL are usually sicophantic, hating and offended by good and beauty, and the lowest shelf is as a prison. Now if the priests are to be brought out, for one might inquire, were they actually only a priest, that they might be brought out if it was so, for the prison is not for those who are innocent. Now there has been the experiment of returning our society to the level of Egypt, spiritually, in terms of what is understood, and Salem can be better, and is better than Egypt. Now the understanding of Egypt might lead to priests being cast into prison and not even returned sometimes to their posts, and should they not be given some reward for their trouble? Now priests are viewed to be intolerant, in Egypt, and there is greater suspicion of them in Egypt, and yet what is the suspicion, except that they are priests and not like the other people. Now when it is known, then there is less suspicion of them, if any.

	Now the priests, are they not often against the abuse of others, and yet priests can be deceived and can be wrong, and it is great wickedness to try to deceive a priest into attacking an innocent Nazi, for it is wickedness and blasphemy by actions. Now as for the Hebrew Jews, that are different than the New World Jews, or what is called Salem's Jews, in Salem, are not some of them being what is called by a generation, 'jealous jerks' towards all people who are not American, that they only are being good towards America, that all the other nations are dealing with a 'jealous jerk' towards them, who seems to believe that their head is a prophet commanding them to do what their jealousy wants? But the angel will not partner with you to support you or defend you, because America is strong, powerful, and yet other nations are present in the land of children, and some of you have been narcissistic in your religion, when it is not in your religion, and rude and giving evil for good, because of your narcissism in your religion that you have added to for yourself, so that some of you have been obnoxious, and America, that gives you much and defends you, you have liked, and grown entitled to its strength and support, that you have said in your heart, I take help from none, and yet it require it from America, that I will be good to them, and to the other nations, behaving as a 'jealous jerk' some of you, who gives evil for good, and none of it is your religion, and you have invented all these faults in your adding to your religion for yourself, that you are found obnoxious towards the other nations. Now will the angel be a fool, or unrighteous, to support you and aid you, or to defend you when you behave such? But the Lord's many children, and many of Abraham's children, have been revealed, and it is not having to even concern you if you do not want it to. Now Palestine, the angel will not defend, or support, for its spirit is seeming to be rebellion against morality, against what it knows to be right, and it is rebellion like witch-craft, and I do not support Palestine in the least against you, for you have spared Palestine by not completed what you started, and Palestine is not as other nations in the Middle-East, which is part of the West, but separate. Now is America not Christian, to you, that you are arrogant towards Christians, elsewhere? But the angel will not support you more, unless you are declaring that the Lord has other children, and that there are other things. Now because you are entitled to America, and being foolish in your dealings, behaving as if you do not need to be diplomatic or concerned for the well-being of your nation, creating many problems in this way, then I can only support you being where you are, in Israel, and I cannot support Palestine against you, because of their rebellion against morality, that they are not interested in peace when you have not gone further. Now as for those of you, who are Jews, who are with wisdom, who are grateful in the way the Lord would want, with the right gratitude, with a desire for peace, how can I not say, yet it is the others who cause me to accuse, and not you, for you are as Gentiles, in that way, and thus Jews, that you are as the remnant of wisdom among your people, that you do not scorn and endanger a city, that you cannot be rebuked by me, that you are knowing the value of peace. Now what is for others among you, is not for you, in terms of rebuke, and if your voices are silenced, your wisdom no longer valued, then it is persecution against the Lord, and even among your own people towards what should be. Now many of the daughters of the Jews are good, and blameless in these things, and in fact, is it not most? But if any is a scoundrel to scorn, to pay wicked words towards what is good, to persecute truth, and it is some of those like young among you, than in what way will you be able to be helped, but I will not help you further. Now your daughters, I do not accuse, and those men keeping to wisdom and for peace, who are not scorning with arrogance, who are not being as obnoxious people towards other people, especially those who are not American. Now David, is he is an angel? But where is his sign upon Earth? Now I believe, still, his spirit is in Heaven, and he is innocent, with the innocence like an angel. Now your leader, is he not knowing the risks, when it is so that you have a leader who knows the risks and does not wish to endanger a city? But the wise of you, why should you be accused, and why should any on Earth ever bow to the angel's words, but they bow to the Lord, and the angel gives wisdom and it is not right for people to bow to the angel. Now where is Egypt, that you are to be allied with? But where is any who will be an allie to you around you? But your allie is America, and will you not seek another? But put away foolishness of being impious, for it is a thing of inferiority, for much advantage in every way comes from the circumcision, and it is not more, and many peoples are Earth are circumcised. Now more tolerant are the ways of Egypt, and yet is it good? For they are having the greater tolerance, that they have even, mistakenly, placed priests in prison. Now do you really believe Solomon was so tolerant? But America has experimented, to return much to Egypt in its ways. Now I do not write about things of shades or ethnicities found on Earth. Now Americans, place the blood above your door, by Mala, that you not be mistaken for Egyptions. Now it is also true for those of all shades, who are American. Now the angel, yet it has had to happen, has one foot on the water, and does not need a cane, and is fine, that you do not be alarmed by me, for it is not always so.

	Now the angel, has he not also had an umbrella, and shoes with bronze, or a bronze, brown, and where a prophet has seen me, and how well his vision, I do not know. Indeed, I was covered as he said, and it has happened on its own, on impulse, without my meaning it, and yet I have also believed it to be right, and some have probably thought I am of a religion I am not of, for the prophet is upright, flattering, without flattery, perhaps not seeing so well, and if he has taken anything from me, I do not know. Now an umbrella, perhaps, he had never seen, and running shoes that are brown, or bronze in a way, and running shoes, I doubt, he had seen. Now if he has also taken The Diary of Lucifer I do not know, but it is longer, by comparison. Now you can find John, a prophet, in The New Testament.

	Now some are awaiting New Jerusalem, that will come down to be on Earth. Now there is a Temple mentioned, that those who are Jews are able to enter, and yet the angel is not having sight within it, and has only mentioned some things that are outside, in the court-yard. Now the pillars he has mentioned in the diary, and what the things of Solomon's palace are, the angel is interested in, because of the sign of Solomon, but as for the Temple, the angel has not thought much more to attempt and has seemed to have no sight within it.

	Now what are the things of Solomon, and those who are making up his house, for there are clerks, inventors, scientists, priests, employees of many types, economists, wise councillors of politics, mighty men who guard, people of decency and goodness. Now who are the pillars of it? But are the pillars not women who are the pillars of the palace of Solomon? Now if you are wise, and you desire peace and to place peace, than what is good for you and your people? But the throne is established by the diligence of justice for the poor, and the insignificant things, are they not considered? But nothing is insignificant. Now the holy places, they are not defiled by the calamity and obnoxiousness of a foolish woman, or a foolish man, and sacrifices are there offered to the Lord. Now Palestine, will they be Jews? But make peace with Palestine and will they remove themselves from the ground you want? Now the heir to David, him who was chosen to be king, he built the Temple, and those because of the obedience of the angels guard ground that it may not be built. Now what portion is given up from those who are because of the obedience of angels, to be Jews before the Lord? But it cannot be many, for a many are because of the obedience of the angels, that they have been called to be these that are because of the obedience of angels, and a portion, then, is to be Jews, and the portion is Palestine? Now the heir to David's house stands, and it is there, and there by Mala, that Solomon is there, and the pillars of his palace, and there is Palestine, and the ground is covered where there is desire to build the Temple. Now there are then a special people, specifically chosen, to be more Jews than Jews, for Solomon's house stands, and the Jews do not regard it, or see it, and yet it is. Now again, there are those to be more Jews than Jews.

	Now allow the wise of the Hebrew Jews, if you are Hebrew, for are they not good and willing, where they are, and who? Now I do not write to Palestine, to allow, only that the wise of the Hebrew Jews not be put to shame, for if there are any, their treachery, is it not completed? But they are able to be counted as those within the palace, also, that they are not outside the palace, and the Jews, like young people, are outside the palace, and spread out between the palace and Palestine. Now let the meeting place leader have those who are like young people. Now if required, is not the King of Salem, come close to you, and this? But is not Abraham, who has many children and many nations, come close to you and this?

	Now it is the last days, and yet it is not like the former, that some consult a prophet not there that is within them? But I write this in rebuke to some of the Jews, that they consult a prophet that is not there who is within them at times. Now who has been the enemy of many? But is it not those who are luke-warm atheists, who believe that they believe in God, and yet they are atheists? Now some of these are carrying out evil in the name of the Lord, and yet they are not really believing in Him.

	Now the angel is not a sufi, a mormon, or anything else, and he is not a prophet, an apostle, or a disobedient prophet. Now if you declare that the Christ, the word of the Lord, is the son of God, and yet you do not associate anything with the Lord, and you do not prey to Him, except you may, than do you betray your ancestors? But He is the Lord of David, and by a mission to die for Elijah, the Christ has fulfilled, and all the Earth, except a small portion, is having the Lord. Now if Solomon is there, and the palace is built, then there is also the word of the Lord, the Christ. Now the word is for all people, and each people it is given to. Now less than a third does not have the Lord, and the angel has said in his heart, I will give guidance by wisdom to Earth, to all of it, and to the other angels, they are older than me, and I am young, and to the Christ, yet he is commander of me, for I am one of the Christ's angels. Now to the Nazi priests of Salem, yet when have the priests ever obeyed any person, even a king? But I will reject them if they are promoting the agenda of slaves. But if they are not, then Salem is better than Egypt, and should be. Now if the Jews, many, have entered back into Egypt, into ignorance, or at least, greater ignorance of spiritual things, that they speak like foolish people towards the holy, that they blaspheme like worthless dogs, than what can be done for them, for they enter by bad guidance, and they do not free themselves of it. Now the Old Testament is separate, and a separate world for each people, and it is not right for any person to be dis-permitting Salem, or Canada, from having priests and the priest-hood, for Salem is better than Egypt.

	But Babylon is worse than any place, that it is iniquity to all people on Earth. Now large dragons are upon Earth, and they have been mistakenly thought INCEL by some, and yet they are of the large dragons, a different people group than people, and do they not know that they are a different people group? Now large dragons, are not most of them strong, and some are heeding no rebuke, and yet are any of them really liking to be bullied? For why will you bully a large dragon if it is not necessary? But the raptor-like dragons, they are distressing the wife of the husband who spends time with them, for she is usually physically weaker, and is the husband a fool? But the large dragon is distressing to her, and yet to some women, the large dragon, even the raptor-like dragon, is not distressing. Now the large dragons are tough, and not able to be comprehended by people, for they are a different people, as if insolent in a way, and yet they are not, for they are large dragons. Now these are not the same as those, most often, who are like criminals who are for the gallows, unless they are. Now do not the dragons know that they are craftier and with more craftiness and danger than men? Now the angel has met many large dragons, and yet cannot have them around, for they are considered like sociopaths of some type, to a wife, and yet the angel is not married. Now a raptor-like, a stegosaurus or triceratops type, and other raptor-like dragons the angel has met. Now these were found in Salem. Now it is a thing of Enoch, and are not the First Nation's People considering these things, some of them? Now there is also the skunk, who is not an enemy prostitute, but a thing that makes itself obnoxious as a defence and it is a peaceful creature. Now there is the jealous moose that can be dangerous and the wild dogs, that need not all be killed, and the wolves, that are kept away from sheep, and the jaguars and cougars, that are more like house cats, in many ways, than lions, and yet they are more dangerous to women. Now the bears are strong, and they are not to be made slaves, for they are a noble creature, and they are not servants, either. Now the Eagles are described for swooping in and taking wisdom to a high place, to give to their people, and the serpent is desiring to be caught by these. Now the cat does not play with what is catches, but if it is too strong to die, than it should not be killed or eaten, that it tests what it catches. Now bats are prophets, able to see without sight, and sometimes living in caves. Now a slave is brutal, impious, and it is not a creature of the forest, or a creature found in nature. But owls are hypocrites and hateful birds, preying on their own. Now vultures, are they unkind? But they have been considered hateful and they feast on what has died, and yet they do not kill. Now hippos are kings and queens of the jungle, and Tyrannosaurus Rex, another king that robs the thieves. Now why should any of these things be killed unless it is necessary? But the people of Salem, are they not able to discern between what is worthy of death and what is not? Now if America has homicidal maniacs who are killing out of jealousy and venturing to other places to kill, and if other nations are having self-radicalized zealots who do so, who go to kill because they hate, that they are with much wrath and zealous to kill, then it is a thing for the military, and the police, and for Prince Rellium. Now if a militia crosses the border into Salem, then will not Canada know of it? But if America has its homicidal maniacs and its serial killers who cross the border, who come to commit zealous action against what they are wrathful towards, then it is cross-border terrorism and serial killers, and these are not the government in America, but militias, and self-radicalized people, and they are children of the devil, murderers against the Lord. Now is David not able to deal with it? But if there are traitors to Canada, who are having the support of militias, or some other cause, or the cause of some church that has turned to wickedness and murder against the Lord, then know that it can occur. But there are churches that are of the unreasonable INCEL type, that are having INCEL as their leadership, that are zealous and violent and for wickedness, that they say, we do it for the greater good, and they are terrorists. Now though priests are to be freed from prison, yet what is not commanded to people, not in the Bible, but based upon lies placed within the gospels, and the adding of teachings, these are not things of priests, or any priest-hood, but they are the teaching of jealousy equates to what must be evil that is a doctrine of some, that what makes a person jealous must be evil committed by others, that the fault is not with themselves, but with others. Now this doctrine and way is not religion or religious, but is a foolishness of people, a thing and belief of some unaccountable fools that the foolishness of it is an abomination. Now there are churches who have this doctrine as their leadership, and they have become zealous, and it is terrorism. Now the Nicolaitans are as Balaam, and INCEL in their ways, terrorists of a type. Now they attempt to disturb and emotionally bother those who are good. Now they hate justice and what is right, and Pergamos has been attacked by these things to some extent. Now Nicolaitans are like Sodomites in their desire to desecrate and disturb those who are good, that they do these things to attempt to cause people to sin and to disturb them. Now some of them are soldiers and guards of Babylon, in that they are having the different morality, and not the different morality of large dragons, but are those who hate justice and are defending what is unjust, as soldiers of a different thing and guards of what is evil. Now they are not things tolerated in Egypt or Israel, for they are neither, but they are things more fitting for Babylon, and they are guards and soldiers of Babylon and what is evil. Now that they should attack any who is considered good is not surprising, and do they not even hate beauty, some of them, and what is good, that they are sycophantic? But they are often pedophile defenders, rapist defenders, those who attack on behalf of these, and they are seeming to be perverse and alternative in their morality. Now are they not an abomination? But they are wicked, insolent, unjust, and many other things. Now they are like sycophantic serial killers in what they seem to hold as their values, and are they not also those who would say, they hate themselves?

	Now the angel has not had a problem with another thing, which is the Nazi priest-hood, because of its right to exist by the Lord, and its considerations that are reasonable to lessen abuse, for they are as if an anti-abuse society, and not a gang, for a criminal gang is not the same as these. But they are more as a society of priests, and citizens who are believing in good things, and not slave things, or wicked things, or things of injustice, or things of abuse and evil, but because they are seeming to be an anti-abuse society of priests who are against that which is the cause of much abuse, and because they they are promoters of what is good, among those who have desired to be good in a fashion, and even reasonable, they cannot be considered a gang by me, but are considered more of a society that is against abuse and much of the abuse that happens because of lack of reason and lack of order that is wanted by all for the respect of all, in terms of types of respectful segregation in smaller ways that are respecting others. Now they have a right to exist, by the Lord, and they should exist, and yet the world, entire, has attempted to impair society that it return to Egypt, spiritually, as a society, and yet Salem is still better than Egypt and can be. Now an angel is not a Jew, and yet can they not be many things if they need to be, for a time, as part of their tasks to perform on Earth, if they are to be born to be on Earth for a time? Now why are the neo-Nazis, any of them, to be surprised? But did they ever really believe, they were for what is evil? But they are neo-Nazis, and not German Nazis, for Salem's Nazis are not German Nazis. But I would only say to them, as advice, be weary of those white who are promoting slave things, and are brutal, and impious against those white people worthy to be slave owners, for are they not slaves who are brutal and impious in this way? But the angel has come and offered wisdom.

	Now those who have been brought into Egypt, yet it seems an immoral thing that the priest-hood should be supported, and yet they are able to depart from Egypt and enter the land of Salem when they please. Now Egypt is more tolerant, and yet they are more intolerant to some things, still, and yet they are considered to be more tolerant, and yet is it a good thing, for there is more abuse and evil because of the lesser reason and 'enlightenment' that is Egypt.

	What more prevaliant than ever, is the increase in sicophantic individuals who hate beauty and goodness, which can be witnessed in larger scales and in greater amounts among individuals in groups even like INCEL, that seems to be mostly compromised of nothing else but sicophantic seriel killers, who claim to hate themselves, and identify as being ugly. Attempts to potray themselves as other things is part of the abomination that is this group, and the extent to which they are actually right wing, perhaps in being anti-feminist, in very small in comparison to the serial killer portion that has seemed to have joined together to gain strength and support in their pursuits of emotionally driven serial killing that is based on jealousy. Of course the same thing can be found among criminal gangs that are not terrorist organizations, officially, where the number of murders than can be attributed to serial killings for no other reason than jealousy is enormous, and signifies the INCEL aspect of many criminal gangs, and the acceptance and support of INCEL principles as valid motives and attitudes for the criminal gangs. The idea that jealousy would be hated by these criminal gangs, is abomination, considering they are in fact the opposite of anti-jealous, but are accepting of causing problems, and even committing murder for no other reason than jealousy, as the nihilistic portion of these gangs, accepts the concept of committing murder against non-gang citizens, for no other reason than it is sometimes wanted due to jealousy or for some other unsubstantial reason, even, at times, for religious reasons, where a non-gang citizen might not share the same religious belief as that of a gang member who might favour Islam, despite the fact that they are a professional criminal. Of course, the greater likely-hood of those who are not faithful adherents to a religion, but closer to imposters in their religious beliefs, is noted to manifest itself in over-compensation, sometimes violent, as the need of these individuals to show religious devotion in another way becomes greater due to a lack of sincerity with regards to their religion. In other words, it is often the fake person, who does not much believe, who is more likely to act in an extreme fashion with regards to their religion. The labelling of religiously motivated murders against non-criminal citizens, is often concealed with claims that the non-criminal was somehow the target of a mere criminal happening by a gang member that had nothing to do with religion. The more prevaliant trend towards concealment of terrorism against non-criminal citizens in North America, on the part of law enforcement, seems to demonstrate the rising principle in concealing the truth from the public with the claim that the public cannot be trusted with knowledge anymore, and the good citizens are expected to be indulgent of a greater amount of terrorism and often crime, as a spirit is currently present, and there without reason, that has found residence in the police force, and federal agencies, being possibly a good spirit, although if it has migrated from its natural, right host, into areas where it should not be, it may be causing a problem, since the spirit seems to be the spirit of Prince Rellium, and his desire to be indulgent towards 'otherness' in his quest to show toleration and provide lack of violence and a peaceful atmosphere while things are being resolved. Of course, I can hardly speak accusation against Prince Rellium, since I fully understand this spirit, and is part of the spirit of my own youth and my highly liberal beliefs, although the problem is clear, that the spirit does not necessarily belong in places where its natural host is not, such as the police force or in Cessus or Cias. Also, the spirit must know when to yield, or rather the host must know when to yield to offering the truth to the citizens that must be offered to them for democracy to function. I understand the compassionate heart of Prince Rellium, that he has seen the barbarity of the W. Bush administration and is fearful and desires to avoid such things, and yet, the sign of Solomon would offer that diligence in providing nuance to the people, for they are not too foolish, that the people might be given the clear nuance and difference between Muslims and terrorists so that they might be able to support Muslims, while condemning terrorists, and giving greater ability to fight criminal gangs, that might be engaged in terrorism some of the time, is something that is safe, for Prince Rellium is good and compassionate, and yet it is suggested that the people are good and able to understand. Now white people, the over-whelming majority of them, are not the stock that is white slaves of white people, and most of them loathe the barbarity and disgusting displays that occured during the W. Bush administration, especially the disgusting bombings of religious gatherings that were peaceful and the horrible and unspeakable perversities and abuses at Guantanamo Bay during the Iraq and Afganastain war. The idea that neo-Nazis, or those who support the priests, are compromised of people un-white in some way, who do not understand that white people are good, are not jack-asses, although not defenceless, are those who hate evil, although prepared to fight to defend ourselves and even others, is something that creates confusion among many when considering the concept of a priest-hood that is fairly religious neutral, in order to support all white citizens, and can be labelled an anti-abuse society that is, in earnest, composed of white people, and not the monsters and horrible jack-asses they are often portray as in films, but white people, being those who are good and are for good, who are reasonable, and understand reason, as is the identification of white people, and the desire for white people to be good, and to do good for others. When white people support other ethnicity, it is out of a desire to do good, and to be good, which is being white, and is the good desire that is found with white people, wanting to make the world and a better place and wanting to do good and often be a more good person in their responsibility and attitudes. Essentially, this is actually what white supremacy really is, and the name is a problem for most white people, as it embodies arrogance, which is not appreciated by most white people, who might rather prefer neo-Nazi as the term, if the term is properly understood. Desiring to be good, to eliminate abuse, to maintain and promote good values, over wickedness and evil, is in essence the real neo-Nazi agenda, despite the heavy discord sown against it, and the misunderstandings created by films and other factors. As mentioned, the vast majority of citizens, are in fact the Nazis, and if America is ignorant of these things, it has never been decided that Canadians would accept criminal gangs and misunderstandings from America and marching orders to adopt the confusion of America. Many Canadian do not have the same problem misunderstanding what neo-Nazis actually are, and given that Canada never participated in slavery and was in fact the place of refuge for escaped slaves, perhaps the perspective of Canadians is far more clear in what specific things are, and what values an organization actually has. If Canadians understand that neo-Nazis, are fact not German Nazis and seem to support family values and good values, and being good people, we do not have to deal with ignorant accusations from a guilt-burdened America, that cannot seem to see as clearly. The idea that neo-Nazis are not political, not concerned with whether a person is a liberal or conservative, is something that becomes more apparent among many Canadians who are interested in a society where goodness is maintained and the ability to explore freedoms without violence and wickedness threatening our citizens. Now would it surprise them or anyone that an angel has supported Japeth in this way? But it is still none of their business, any other, that would oppose a people on the shelf of Japeth, from having their priest-hood, and not having to be kept in Egypt, prospering and advancing as a people who have many good who have sought to please and obey God. Now they are able to advance and to be a holy people, and the indigenous of Salem are those not part of any of it, that they are outside all these matters, and are wrong to identify with another other ethnicity in their relations with the people from Japeth. Now the angel has loved the First Nation's People, and they are not shem or Japeth or any of the sons of Noah, the angel has believed, but who they the angel does not know, for they are not part of any of it. Now as for those of shem, but though the angel has nothing against them, yet it is not business of their if those of Japeth are having their own priest-hood and advancing as a society, for none ever said they were there, as if the ruling class, to not have their own portion and to advance as the Lord is wanting them to advance, to be a holy people, having even prophets among them, and having a priest-hood not foremost religious that they might be the priests of the people, to all of the people. Now as for the youngest son of Noah, yet he is not owed anything from the people of Japeth, and the dept of America has expired with concerns to him dwelling there, and for others, there was never a dept, that he must wander, and make his own way, and find his own house and build it, and find his own field and till it, and find his land that he will tend. Now will there be a difference then known about those of the youngest son, who were shem, and those who were the youngest son, or even the slaves among them, and the fair shades have their slaves among them. But the dept has expired of America, though they did foolishly to enslave the slave owners with the slaves, that it was a great evil that has occurred on the Earth in other places, and when the Jews were kept in Babylon, they were returned to Israel that they might build. Now those of Japeth have said, we are guilty of a wrong, and so keep them, that they can dwell with us, but they have proved remorse in it, and yet the dept is expired, that the season changes. Now Japeth, is he not called to progress, and to not be held in Egypt, but to advance as he is able to advance, for let him be at peace, if he can, with The First Nation's People, who are not as Noah's youngest son and not shem. Now those of shem, most, are for good to him, and yet there are some revilers and zealots among them, especially those who do not truly believe their own religion and over-compensate, to be against those from Japeth. Now The First Nation's People, are they not for good to him, that they are a people who have favoured often segregation to protect themselves, and they are not as any other people on Earth, and seem to be none of Noah's sons. Now those who are for their own house, and having their own house, and building, and not meddling to overthrow things of another people, but having respect of keeping to one's own house where it is good and reasonable, not to be exaggerated when it is not so, for there is free-speech that is greatly valued, now these are those who are seeming to be for good towards those from Japeth, and he must have his own society as well, and flourish and please God.	Now calling things evil on a false premise and calling things hate that are not hate, and calling good evil when it is not evil, even calling the word of God evil when it is not evil, and calling the Lord evil, when He is good, there is added to the wicked, insolence and condemnation of truth, that they blaspheme, and speak with insolence, for Japeth, and a people come from him are not in Egypt, or held by Egypt, that it is right for them to be Salem, and be in Salem, that it is right for them to progress and advance, in spirituality, and to please God, that if they have flawed priests, there has also been great confusion and lack of knowledge prior to the revelation of the angel, that it is in no way evil for Salem to have its priests who are are of the citizens, of Salem's Jews, and not Hebrew Jews, that the priests are also supportive and good for those who are not Jews, but Salem people, who are as the king of Salem, desiring even more, and wanting things that are more than the things of the Jews. Now if the priests have had slaves among them, and if they have ever embarrassed white people, that they embarrassed them prior to them accepting the priests, than the fault is of the slaves more than the priests, for the priests have not been strong with support of the government, or with all of the people, that they have faultered, stumbled, and there has been war and struggle, that there have been failings, and yet more than this, even, there has been slander against them, slanderous portrayals, great discord against them, a multitude of lies and confusion, and priests, being more sensitive, for are not all priests such? But priests have been misunderstood to be intolerant, and yet they are greater concerned for decency, that it is difficult sometimes, and there is even acceptable struggle between Nazis and Nazi priests, that the priority is the Nazi, who is the inheritor of society, the primary inheritor of society, and a second portion is for the priest-hood, that they have their own portion, and their own things of the Lord. Now it is the Lord who does it, and the Hebrews cannot easily complain of it, for they had their own society that was from the Lord, and was instructed by Moses, and there are the people from Japeth, a people from him, who have their society from the Lord, and it is not to go to Egypt, for it is not necessary, for it is not the business or right of any other people to demand they impair themselves and go to Egypt, to be lesser and to hold themselves back from pleasing the Lord. Now Canada, yet what should its flag be? But should it not be the leaf, the star of David, and the swastika? But we are the Nazis and have always been, honouring the righteousness of lions, and Salem, and having things of Salem and the New World Jews, who are not Hebrew, having all the tribes, and we have the Salem people, being and concerned with more than the technical right and wrong of Jews, that there is more for them, these innocent people, of the innocence of angels. Now for Salem people, I offer only one council, but refrain from iniquity, and do not harden yourself to be Jews, for it may be injury to you, and much evil to you later, for you are free and yet you know what it acceptable to you. Now most of any people cannot be what you are, Salem people, that they are unable, and the hardships they must endure are not seeming fitting for being Salem people, that most of the people must be men and women, Jews, and the priests, the Nazi priests, are Jews, and the angel has known it, and would remind them, for they do not know, perhaps, all the angel knows of what was hidden from them. But being priests not of Hebrew Jews, they have desired that it is right to drive out Hebrew Jews, that their concern is for their own people and what is right for them, and even the angel does not know all the Lord's will, that the priests are sensitive, able to perceive things.

	Now for 200 years America has had remorse, and it has grown, and yet the youngest of Noah is considered by some to be wasting his time in a nation where he is a minority, the nation where slave owners and slaves were both enslaved, and is it not so much of the time? Now the dept to him has expired in America, and there was never a dept among those not American, who were white. Now Salem is not America, and America has taught an entering of things that they have burdened themselves with, because of their remorse, and the world has taught impairment, and yet it is not so, for though Prince Rellium is concerned with things of what he is, the diplomacy of princes, Solomon has concerned himself with things of a king, and not a prince, and the people of Earth are mostly Jews, and not as many Salem people, for the innocence of Salem people is not for all people, and the rigours of what some must endure is better suited for Jews. Now the Jews maintain that Salem people might be capable of living in peace, and it is good, also, that Prince Rellium is taken second in opinion to Solomon, for Prince Rellium, though compassionate, is a prince, and what is considered too harsh, is not too harsh for Solomon, and is it not also known then that Rellium is a Salem person, a prince of Salem, and Solomon is a Jew? But let the spirit of Adonijeh remain with its natural host, and the spirit of Prince Rellium remain with its natural host, unless it be the citizens, and those more directly of the house of Solomon, the people, being of the kingdom that is on Earth, spread in every corner, be knowing that you are the fair ones, the people who are judging the great to the small matters fairly, and as for Absolom, it is good that those not suited for it, are not taking his spirit, for the wrong spirit taken can cause hurt to oneself, and those with David's house, the women, when it is hurt for them and not good to adopt his spirit, then they can know of it, and as for Absolom, that he is able to know he is not as Joab or even Adonijeh, but he is himself, and for others to know, Absolom is a son of David, and if sycophantic people, who hate beauty and good, are attacking him without cause, then do you think that David divorces his son? But you know that he is a son of David, and his father has loved him more than all the host of soldiers.

	Now to Adonijeh, though I have wrestled with you, it is the only way to drive you back at times, and you require a strong arm, and a strong push, and even a strike to drive back at times, that you will hopefully not consider something other than an honour, for Jacob was wrestled with. Now Adonijeh, he is a son of David, and a prince. Now do not think I have not loved Adonjeh. Now let none say that all your efforts are wrong, for are you not defender of Nazis, the lions, and those meant to be with the leaders? But have you not defended Solomon countless times, and yet when he is in your domain and kingdom, he is the younger to you, and he is in fact your younger. Now servants, even those who have willingly chosen to be well educated servants, though they have chosen it willingly, you have tamed them, and not wrongly, and slaves you have wrangled, for slaves will hear no rebuke, no threat or any words, and hear nothing save for being wrangled or beaten, that this is a thing of slaves. Now you are mighty, and the sons of David you have defended, and they dwell in peace because of you, and still yet they wrestle with you, prince of Israel, son of David.

	Now as for America, the indulgent, are they indulgent because they are having a guilty conscience about the things they have done? But they indulge criminal gangs, that rape, murder, extort, bully, rob, and bankrupt. Now Canada is not America, and we do not listen to America or take marching orders from it, but we do not tolerate, and are not able to indulge, all that they have indulged, if we drive out criminal gangs with a rifle, why is that considered strange? But America has been greatly indulgent, and Canada, is it not so? But Canada is not guilty of what America is guilty of, and is not able to indulge what it indulges. Now it is not good, is it not so, that you be too tolerant, as they call it, for you are not a foolish people, but less abuse is from those who are keeping justice and order, that they are diligent to do justice, to drive away what is wicked, that it not be tolerated. Now the wicked might say, you will be killed for nothing in Salem, and yet they do not realize anymore that they are incredibly wicked and an abomination. But gangs have engaged in terrorism in America, as well, and it is not known to them, and the revelation of the angel gives it. Now America is as good, still, to free those priests who would be joining the INCEL, for they are not forced to go into Egypt, and yet those of the INCEL who are serial killers, they too, do not consider acceptable. Now there are such serial killers among criminal gangs, and for causes of terrorism, being religious or given motive by foreign enemies.

	Now for some matters, a servant tamer is required, and for other matters, a slave wrangler, and yet for criminal gangs, is not the military required, that you drive out these invaders with a rifle? Now as for Babylonians, this is the enemy of con-artists and fraudsters and those who takes bribes, and those who take the full circumcision, and those who commit every type of wickedness, that they dwell in hospitals, banks, corporations, court-houses, political places, and any place they can. Now they slay and commit every type of wickedness, and they are worse, far worse, than Egypt, and they have no judgment towards any crime, but are hating more the righteous and the just. Now Babylon is an evil decease to Salem, and even to the priest-hood, and it is a thing that is of money, and worthlessness, and lies and slander. Now it must be removed from Salem, and it grows again and must be removed again and again, and so let there be, if it possible, experts on removing Babylon, that they develop skills, and study and are able to eradicate it when it grows. Now it has committed child-molestation, rape, child killing, torture of victims, bullying, all types of abuse, slander, lies, bribery, extortion, theft, terrorism, cheating, abandonment of morality, dishonour, injustice, hating of righteousness, disregard for life, and many more things of wickedness it has committed. Now it is insolent, doing much in a a reckless fashion, for it has the aid of prejudice it creates and it uses slander, exploits slander, and it lies and slanders itself, and it bribes, keeps the wicked as friends, establishes networks of wickedness, and it establishes wicked profit and kills the innocent and righteous. Now even hospitals have it, and the police, that it is insolent. For it gathers up lies to spread, and it takes a bribe from merchants, and it is low and lower than Ur, for every person of it is Babylonian, that it fixes for crimes of rape and child molestation, and it gathers up money from criminals, from those below Ur. Now it is hating integrity and righteousness, accepting criminals, but not those with integrity. Now it prepares itself for fire, for the fire of justice, that would cleanse it, and it prepares itself against all manner of holy and right assault, that its fortresses casts out those with integrity and establishes networks of criminals, of the wicked with the police, with all those who might fight it. Now it has no regard for life, and it profits without remorse from wickedness.

	Now it is a decease, and a disgusting thing, and a brutal thing as a large dragon, like a large dragon that swallows up prophets, and saints, and stars, that it devours even stars, for it has the weapon of accusing of insanity, that it might swallow up prophets and saints, and those who are believers in the Lord, who are part of Christ's church, or part of other religions, that it is able to swallow up those things that are religious and found in religion. Now what has enabled it to do so? But even the angel does not know. Now much lies are found in it, and wickedness, and it is not atheist, but believing in the Lord, the way that some Babylonians do, to be for the devil, and to be for evil. Now it is found in government, being against free speech in ways,that it might imprison prophets and saints and stars, and that it is able to throw them in prison for preaching truth and proliferating truth among people. Now it is able to accuse of terrorism, where there is no terrorism, that it is fully prepared to persecute all religion if it is so that it wishes it. Now preparations have been made by the devil, and Babylon, though small, is fearless to do wickedness, for it is like hard scales against the people and their hearts, that it does not count itself a citizen, but an enemy, and people who are the devil's people. Now the priest-hood can be persecuted by it, and all religious people are able to be persecuted by it, and some are able to be imprisoned by it. Now it belongs to the devil, and those who are its workers, are the devil's servants, that their ears are shut to all, that their hearts are stubborn and committed to wickedness.

	Now that dragon that accuses of insanity, it is a thing of the devil, for they say, yet it is required, and it is not. Now it is a dragon of the time, at present, that harasses towns and devours, and is sometimes harbouring much of Babylon, that it devours prophets, and saints, and keeps stars for a time, that it is founded with foolishness and wickedness, and is incompetent and wicked. Now children of angels have been swallowed for a time by it, especially that information might be gotten from them and their devices, and the righteous who have shown integrity have been swallowed by it, and those who have been victims, many have been swallowed by it, that it might accuse them of lying and of insanity. Now the dragon is wicked, and foolish, and it is as a dumb and cruel beast that has no sense that is common sense, for it is a large dragon, and the wicked have even depended on it greatly. Now have they not defended the dragon with lies, with slander and wickedness? Have they not said, yet the future will depend on it? But it is not required, and no large dragon of the sort is ever required. Now it is worse than Egypt, worse than Israel, worse than Salem, and it is found in every nation, that Egypt has found it foolish, even. Now there are wicked who have loved it, that they say, let us give more power to the dragon, for it is able to devour.

	Now the whole of Babylon is wicked, and the things found in it are wicked, that where it grows, it must be destroyed, and there must be those devoted to eradicating it where it grows. Now train officially to eradicate it, and diligently seek it out, that it might be dismantled and removed, for it is the enemy of any nation, a tool of wicked merchants against a nation. Now the Nicolaitins are not congruent with reason, that they desire to disturb and cause others to sin, for they are for molesting others in the emotional fashion, that they are comparable to Sodomites. Now if they are even going to seige against good people, whoever they might be, are they not terrorists of a type, and are they not too wicked to comprehend? But there are animals who do wickedness, because they are confessing they are wicked animals, and it is only what they do, being animals, that there is no other reason, for they appeal to their wicked instinct. For the instrinct, and the definition of what they are, as a wicked animal is the reason for what they do, and in some things it is what they do as a wicked animal, that it is their instinct. Now they say of some, they are a selfish jack-ass, who is desiring to kill the good, and those who are benifiting, and yet it is also their instinct, that they devise reasons to give excuse to what is their impulse, that they devise excuses to rationalize their wickedness, and yet it is simple and does not make sense, and nor will it ever, for they know that it is wrong, and yet they are wicked, and some are servants of the devil, having the devil's personal rage and anger within them, as if they were devil himself, for they are personally enraged by what what does not concern any man, and is not cause or reason for any man, but is reason for the devil to be enraged, that they are the devil's servants and having the devil's heart within them, that it is person for them, that they are not as loyal, but as one with the devil, them personally enraged, being the devil's servants, having become one with the devil in many things, that the devil has their heart and mind, and is able to motivate them and turn them to the left or to the right, them being as if possessed fully by demons and with the rage of the devil's heart as their own heart. Now the paradigms found in Notes from Salem cannot deal with such things, and The Diary of Lucifer is required for many things, for the right paradigms must be used to properly understand, that applying the wrong paradigm is clearly seen as inappropriate in some cases, but The Diary of Lucifer contains that which Notes from Salem does not, and the other paradigms that involve the devil and the greater spiritual world and the war between the devil and the Lord. Now as for the things of Salem and its prospering and progressing, some of it, and the paradigm of it, that includes Egypt, is included in this essay, Notes from Salem, and the giving of wisdom, that there is no completion of, is offered more in The Diary of Lucifer. Now as for Salem, it is offered that when Prince Rellium is having people that are traitors, and even Cessus and other areas, and even Adonijeh is having disloyal people, than the priest-hood is seeming far more reliable to be supportive of citizens, and supportive of society, and the citizens.

	Now does it seem strange that this is more in keeping with Solomon, and the support of society that is included in such wisdom, for Solomon, though not a Salem person, is seeming more often to excelling in some things and yet he seems too harsh for Egypt and yet he is not truly harsh, and his ways are for less abuse and for goodness and respect of all. Now Prince Rellium is still your prince, Salem, and Adonijeh still your people, and David still the ultimate king, that you not say, one thing is the enemy. But struggles and wrestling are not the same as real war. Now Notes from Salem will make most sick to their stomach, and yet it is given, regardless, and yet it makes them sick to their stomach because of Egypt, and the foolishness that was taught, that there have been good-intentions and yet teachers of ignorance, that they have sought to be good, and yet what they have sometimes called progress was a return to Egypt for many, that 'enlightenment' and truth was not political, but it was with what some had called evil, it being too harsh for them, and Solomon being too harsh for them, and the all the true priests misunderstood by them, that the good-intentioned have said, be going into Egypt, to be accepting this level of enlightenment, that is a lesser society, though still having morality, and those who have read Notes from Salem, it being a shorter work, and an essay, in comparison to the diary, are having been struck with being sick to their stomach, and even the angel was a little, for he came born on Earth, like Elijah, and others who were to spend time on Earth, as is mentioned in The Diary of Lucifer that he, too, had to learn and to be raised in the society and to fulfill the things of a man, to be as a human, in a human body that ages and decays and dies, for the body is not so good in this way, and yet who will complain, for there is a better body to be given, and the angel having come in a body that decays, having been raised among society, did not always know all, that his stomach, too, was a little touched, but not bitter and not sick, for there had been much concealed by lies and misunderstanding.

	Now they have democracy, and it is the people, whether they can be trusted or not, for in democracy it is irrelevant whether they can be trusted or not, and some have acted against democracy, and placed religious persecution, and persecution of free speech, only with deceptive words, that they have labelled it the opposite of what it is, for they have said, we fight one thing as they are that thing, and it is not a thing any political party has wanted, for all have valued free speech, and it is a thing of attacking a nation with a censor that is heavy, for they have called most truth hate, and used deceptive language and lies to conceal what they do. Now they come like adults who would trick children, and they guide them towards Egypt, and they censor them, and attack their own nation, that some of them are indeed enemies and not loyal to democracy or the benefit of the nation.

	Now if it is wanted, yet they may vote again, as a people, for democracy, and for lack of persecution, and for the keeping of things that are democracy, for the freedoms that are given to all by this concept, that Abishag passed the freedom to attack the people if there was declared an emergency, and without procedure, and why she has done so, I do not know, but she had been worse than incompetent in her hi-jacking of democracy, and her foolishness by which she was leader of the meeting place. Now are not freedoms of the people to have democracy, to be re-established by the erasing of what is against democracy. But free-speech is required by religion, and religion itself, has been labelled hate by many, that the few who claimed persecution from religion, were those who quickly took great strides to persecute religion, and those who would guide to Egypt aided this concept to persecute religion. Now where there is attack on free speech it is attack on religion, and an attack on the nation and democracy. Respecting free speech is part of common respect for democracy and society and the people, that those who disrespect free speech and an artist or author's right, or even a journalist's right to express their opinions as freely as they like is part of common respect for society and the people, that people are not below the animals in their understanding of society and concepts of people.

	In fact, the general theme of what constitutes a 'problem' in society is a person who does not have the common respect of people towards people, no matter their beliefs, causes, or what they are doing. A person who lacks common respect that people have for people in what they are doing, no matter their beliefs or cause, is a person who is a 'problem' for society, and such is the case for all creeps and wackos and those who harass, and generally those who are deemed a 'problem'. Minding one's own business is part of this common respect, where it applies, and where criminals are insolent enough to be wicked and attempt to intimidate those who are being good citizens, they are greatly lacking the common respect of people towards people. Now give them up to the police, for it is not good that a good citizen, who is having common respect of people towards people, should lower themselves and participate in their foolishness that is upon them because of their wickedness, for if they cannot be defended by the police, yet it is because of their wickedness, and though they threaten, let none say it is evil for the wicked to be removed, for if the military is required, it is reasonable, for it is terrorism, indeed, towards the people, that the type is ideological, and it may conceal religious motive, that Canada is not having the guilt of America, that we would indulge criminal gangs that we are not able to indulge, and which would destroy our nation. Now why will you indulge the wicked, when the wicked are for lessening your ability to please God? But what people would be generous to a degree of indulging wickedness and violence entering their land? But if Solomon is too harsh for you, yet he is not too harsh for some, and Prince Rellium has his office, his kingdom, and his time and place.

	Now to those who call good 'evil' show forth wickedness, and those who praise the Lord in their wickedness, practise blasphemy, and those who mock and scorn like a woman, they are like-woman, and unrighteous, and those who are sycophantic against beauty and right, and those blaspheming what is pure and good, and those who speak wickedness to goodness, and those hating good, uttering wickedness and violence, without right cause, those cursing good, and reviling, and those showing forth brutality and madness, and blaming others for their jealousy, and those saying, it is the fault of where I am, that I cannot be otherwise, them, it is true, are able to be some other place, for a wicked city cannot spread to what is good, and if any is made so, they must escape, for the freedom is having to find the escape, that prosperity might be able to come, and that people may be established. Now if any is arrogant and wicked, to blaspheme an angel, yet all that is mentioned here, is Sodomites, and the lake of fire awaits. Now those wicked blaspheming angels, yet they are Sodomites, and their wickedness has torn themselves inside, for the arrogant and wicked are homicidal, and what was had compassion on, is Sodom, for it is far worse than what was said, that these are horribly wicked, and there is no doubt about them being horribly wicked, for do the devil's people say, yet we did not know we were wicked? But it is not concealed from all. Now those the angel cannot touch, as if there is blood above their door, then is it not the blood of the Lamb, but I will know by deeds and words. Now is it then truly so that they cannot be touched? But they can be, even if it is so that there is the blood of the lamb above their door. Now who has said, the angel comes to be your messiah? But some meet to kill. Now the angel delivers what he does, and if there are those with integrity, who have been keeping to integrity, who know the Christ, who are able to save themselves, then does not man, also, know it? Now there are good, but what of the most? For if you say, yet there are some good, then is it not still the case that all must escape from what it has been claimed has placed them in bonds, that they not be able to prosper? Now those of Japeth are having Salem, and will those who are placed such that they cannot prosper, will they be in their own land, a promised land for them, to have priests and make their society? Now the angel offers wisdom, and does not command. But what is, it is seeming to be much folly that any person should stay after the slave owners were enslaved with the slaves. But for the cause of being sycophantic against beauty and good, this is enough, that you who are are being wicked, who are blaspheming the holy saints, who are not fearing God in your ways, but are not grateful in anything, that you are accusing people who are blameless of great guilt, and escalating in your hatred, without cause, and you are calling the good offenders, because of your wickedness, that you are offended by good, then do you not know that if the place you are in has done this to you, it is better that you depart for your own sake? Now if you would make the Earth hell, than it is good that it should not be so for you, for there is not one of you who has been enslaved, that if any has been abused, it is wrong, and yet the blame of the innocent is not good, for you commit hypocrisies with your mouth, with your deeds, and you have tolerated murder and all wickedness, that you have said, it is the fault of others. Now remove yourselves for your own sake if it is so, for it is for your own sake more so, and the debt of those who are fair, is expired to you in America. Now if there are good, yet there are disproportional bad, and the wickedness will destroy the nation, for it is already bring about wickedness towards others who please God. Now it is wickedness of Sodomites, of blaspheming and mocking people, who praise God in their wickedness, and curse the good and gentle, even them, they speak wickedness towards. Now it is finding hindrance, and the wicked escalate without instigation, that they are hating the fair and beautiful, sycophantic towards beauty and good, revilers of what is good and right, mockers of purity, of holy and sacred things, impressed with their blasphemy and wickedness, and then humble, as if innocent, and yet the sons of David, and the Lord's sons and daughters have been afflicted by wickedness and hate, and without reason, that there are those of clear conscience among them, as if with integrity, who are the leaders of wickedness, as if their hand had directed it. Now humility they offer, and explanation, as if reason, that they are an abomination, for they speak as if prophets who explain, what is not excused. Now much foolishness and wickedness is found among them, and those seeming blameless, are as if leaders and prophets of wickedness, and there is yet a small remnant, and yet how can it be saved and remain, but it is blameless and much is not blaming itself for any wickedness anymore. Now many are like sodomites, and those who mock at what they should look away from, and shut their eyes, and they are practising sexual harassment, even to the man, and their hands are wicked, their mouths correcting with dishonour and wickedness, when correcting others who are counted as their own. Now as for the remnant that has not partaken in any of these things, and has even endured it themselves, for they are hated often because of their good, that they are called better, as if believing themselves better when they have not boasted, these are clean, having endured and having kept to integrity, having clung to honour and integrity, and they are of Shem, for it is so, and what form of Shem cannot be said, only they are staying with honour, with shutting their eyes and holding their tongue, that these are not the other people, for they are not even in Egypt, but in another land. Now have they not been cast out, and hated, for they are good, and those wicked have hated them. Now there are likewise women of them who are the same, and these are as if from Shem, a line of it, that they are with honour, with keeping wisdom, with integrity and morality, that they, too are another people. Now if a portion is another people, and yet there is a portion of the fair who are slaves of the fair. Now will not the noble separate from the others, if it pleases them, that it might be well? But the noble are understanding discipline and honour. Now let it never be said, that the angel accused these of anything. But they are good, just, righteous, every good thing, and how many of them there are by proportion is depending on the place where they are found. But these are people of integrity, wise women, good daughters, a people their own. Now what will I compare them to? But the night is cool, and the river bends in the moonlight, and the trees are in the cool of night, and the plants are caught in the moonlight, and the night is calm, and a rest has come upon the Earth, and a soft noise comes from the trees. Now the Earth is pure, and there is pure integrity and a good calm.

	Now these, are they not a separate people from those who toil in fire and things of fury and war? But they are a separate people, not raging in things of blood-shed and wickedness. Now who are the other people, but the other people has made themselves Sodom much, and it is being worse than Egypt. Now the other people, how might they have priests and integrity when they are consumed with wickedness? But the others are not even the slaves of those who are of a line of Shem, and there are slaves of the darker shades and slaves of the fair shades and slaves of the middle shades. Now let none journey into Egypt to stay there as a people, for is it not well to be of the better 'enlightenment' to have priests and those of integrity and to be keeping with integrity? But if another people emerges, yet it is able to be understood.

	Now as for the polytheist, yet they have had many who have been obnoxious to all, and their impious ways are only being obnoxious when it is so, that those of the darker shades be aware of it, for they are alone, and more alone than any on Earth, for even China is not as them, and Japan is exempt, for Japan is part of the West, and the middle-east is part of the West, that they are a separated part because they are because of the obedience of angels, that I have called them, middle-east, west. Now there is already a strong and great divide between the people of darker shade who are as if coming from Shem, and those who are is if from a line of Sodom, that they are two different people groups, and the angel has not been diligent enough to know yet why it is so that this group from Sodom is there, only that they are as if a sacrifice, and a giving up from those from Shem, that a portion has been sacrificed to be given up as those from Sodom and Egypt and there is another people, not having been given up, who are as if from a line of Shem, people of integrity and morality and honour. Now the other has known of discipline and honour, that they are a tribe, and are seperated, that there are two tribes from the darker shade, and the two are having integrity, and the one tribe has been as if from a line of Sodom, for they are Sodom and Egypt much. Now Egypt has held back the greater ability of society to be enlightened, and to function, that it is not progress or advancing, but is a journey away from enlightenment of society, that the greater relaxation and apathy is folly at times, and so allow the priests, even if they call themselves neo nazis, that the citizen contends with the priests, and it is not wrong, for the priests can be wrong, and yet they are still understood to be priests, that the fear is for the Lord and what is right, and yet you are knowing that some are priests, and having their portion. Now those of a line of Japeth are having priests and they have called themselves something that is sounding harsh in some ways, as if boasting, and yet there was nothing else to call them, that the suspicion is perhaps too much for what they are, for they are actually a people of morality and decency and are not ignorant and brutal, that they are like mindless killers. But are they not for respecting decency and peace, that they are the priests of those of the line of Japeth, that it is their people, and yet they are not impious and mindless killers, for they have been portrayed as fools and brutes much in films and other places. Now is there not more peace for you and your ways of integrity and peace when they are present? But they are for Japeth, as they are priests of their own people, and they are the majority in some places, and yet can there not be greater peace and lack of crime when they are present, that you being of integrity of the common respect of people that people have for people, are able to have greater peace from wickedness and those of Sodom, when they are present, and yet it is understood that the priests are priests of the line of Japeth, and being for Japeth.

	Now the angel gives something sweet to some, and yet it becomes bitter and makes their stomach sick, and yet the angel is not able to withhold in some things, and the angel is wishing for others to obey that he might take obedience of others for granted, that he may be as a citizen not 'pulling their weight' and indulge in spending time with those who he does not hate, who have their own portion, for the angel has not hated you, people who are as if from Shem, and he does not speak anything in accusation of you, if you believe that is so. But is the angel cruel? Yet he is not anything, cruel or kind, but performing what he must, that the stomach is struck with bitterness. Now kindness is for other things, and where is there time, for him, for cruelty? But a soldier is sent, and it is said, destroy the city, and it is performed, and yet there is no cruelty, and kindness is for other times. Now will not kindness then be found instead from God, and from His son, the Christ? But does any commit error to look to the angel to be their Lord? But it is not right to bow to the angel, or to pray to him. Now is the angel the deacon of Earth? But even if it was so, it would not be right to pray to him, or to look to him for salvation, or for judgment for grievances rather than the Lord, or His son, the Christ. But I write this to all people, for the angel comes in a body, as yours, that is fallible and decays, and it is almost like a useless thing, this failing body that expires, and yet those saved by Christ will be given something more appropriate and better, for this body that is given, even if it has beauty, it expires, and it is injured, impaired, an almost useless thing in some ways, and yet people are spiritual, Temples, and living on Earth for their time, that they are spiritual and awaiting the transfer to Heaven for eternal life. Now why will any of them choose to be thrown into the fire? For the lake of fire burns as bright as the sun, and it is torture and the torture never ceases and there is no hope for escaping the torture, for it is for eternity, that madness and great pain is constant, and intense pain, forever, and the angels will look on as these people are tortured and suffer in eternal torture. Now why will any have themselves thrown into this fire, that is the lake of fire? But they are imprudent, blind to the afterlife, consumed with foolishness and lack of understanding, doing senseless and unreasonable things that do not benefit themselves or others when they do them. Now you are offered bliss, joy, beauty, purity, goodness, honour, glory, and the many beauties and unspeakable pure and good things of heaven, and on the other side, for the imprudent, they are rather being cast as worthless corpses into eternal torture, to suffer and be agonized in the abyss. Now what madness do some have in their heads? But if there is anything in the Universe, even space, there must be creation, for something cannot come from nothing, and if there was ever nothing, there would always be nothing, for the Lord even created space and time and all matter, and who can view into this place, to exist before existence was possible? But He is infinite, infinitely with power and might, having created all, having given life to all the Universe, and what can prevail against Him, for the devil, was he not even gone insane a little, to rebel against Him, and even a portion of the angels, that they did not ponder all, and being given, and not knowing all, as the Lord, rebelled against Him. Now if there is anything, than is it not then apparent to you, even by this, as if seeing an object and knowing its existence, that there is an afterlife? But even John the Baptist has doubt in prison, and yet signs and truth are sufficient, for he is not foolish. Now prudence is even a little sight, that foolishness be understood, that the blindness of wicked doers is seen as madness to those who can only see a little with prudence. Now lack of reason is leading then to destruction and torture in the lake of fire, and prudence, to attain what is coming, is for heaven that you are already, many of you, sons and daughters of God, entering heaven already as you are on Earth.

	Now does the greatest weapon of the Lord, make the belly bitter? But how then can the angel be the greatest weapon? But he doubts he is really so much a threat to the devil, and yet he understands war, and much of the war between heaven and hell.

	Now a people, even, are they not commanded, be not over-righteous? But when they have reached the degree of over-righteous, that they would destroy themselves, what is expected of them? But those of the line of Sodom have built up great cities of lies, that they say, we dwell here, and they indeed dwell in the cities of lies they create for themselves, to shelter them, as people of Sodom, that they found the truth unacceptable, that a city of lies was preferable to them, to shelter themselves from the light. Now they say, yet the city is strong and established, for they speak lies as if they are common knowledge, for it is the city they dwell in, and yet the city is nothing, and is made of what is not, that light does not yield at all for it, and those who are children of light, having truth and light within them, do not see it and take any of it in, for the light in them casts away what is not. Now if a portion of the darker shades have been sacrificed and been a line of Sodom, that they live in a city of lies they have built for themselves, that they are even, some of them, arrogant and wicked, to be homicidal, that they venture out of their city to meddle and interlope with those of truth and goodness, even to throw wicked scorn towards the angel, even going this far in their foolish wickedness, then those of truth and good, yet they are not evil, as the wickedness of Sodom says, for even Egypt would not alone say it, without Sodom, and more wickedness. But those as if of a line of Shem, do not think you should be drawn into Egypt, for it is also not good for you, either, that you know true things, rejecting injustice and wickedness, keeping to truth, and listening to Solomon, and to the word of God, and keeping your integrity, and as for those of the line of Japeth, they are keeping to truth, to the word of the Lord, to follow truth, and maintain truth, despite unintelligent fools, who are more fitting, perhaps, to be thrown into the lake of fire, for their worthless statements that they make, and their words that are like mocking towards truth and reason and the children of light, are being exceptionally worthless. Now if some things from heaven are come to save and to give more chances, and to be patient, and to offer forgiveness, yet is this thing not the son, the Christ, who is the judge, and the Lord is the judge. But this stone, it is the king and the key thing, and the angel, yet do you believe he comes to be as Him? But an angel blinded men of Sodom, and fire came down and consumed the city and all who dwelt in it.

	Now the angel, does he come to be your messiah? But the messiah has come, and he is the chief stone, the son of God, and the one who came forgiving, and offering compassion, he is the son of God, the king of kings and lord of lords. Now the angel would never dare to attempt to come between any of you and Him. Now if any is a priest, and they say, let it happen that the Nazis see and deal with it, and yet they are a priest, then is it not blasphemy and perversity on their lips? But they are the priests, and is this person who says it meant to be a priest, or are they a Nazi, like others, and dwelling with the priests, that they do not speak blasphemy and perversity, but are a Nazi and not a Nazi priest. Now the priests are those who are chosen to be priests, and it is not the responsibility of the Nazi to deal with what is for priests and those appointed for it. Now as for those as if from a line of Shem, will not those of Sodom also destroy you if you do not remove yourselves from them? But the angel gives no command.

	Now there is a people insouciant and arrogant, more insouciant in their ignorance and their assumed strength in the false-premise, and these things were never strong with the majority, and indeed they are actually weak things in society but boasted as strong, that they are insolent, insouciant, irreverent, disrespectful, arrogant, and even brutish. For they they are like those who go out and sit on the ground and refuse to come or go, and scorn the passer-by, and say, though the hurricane comes, I do not have to leave, though the Earth shakes, I will decided if anything will cause me to die beforehand, for I need not reason, I need not heed, and I need not give respect or time, for I am stubborn, and a fool if I desire, that I proclaim ignorance to all, and none can cause me to do otherwise. Now why does any ask such their opinion, for their opinion, as their heart says, was not valid and never worth your ears or eyes, that their heart calls you foolish for even asking, for their heart says, you are being foolish to show me any respect in what I believe, son or daughter of the Lord, that what will you expect of me, but I have my place, that I am outside society, like an outcast and heretic, like a rebel in some fashion, against evil lynchings and the madness when religion and zeal are devouring the innocent, are devouring the good with the bad, are going too far, for you ask such an outcast their opinion, and what will you expect from me? But the joke is upon you, and not I, for you have not understood the situation. Now if any boasts of foolishness, yet are they really foolish? But you ask a heretic what they believe. Now the angel has not hated the atheist, but he, the angel, will save him if he is in danger, and the angel will say to you, he is part of the west, part of your society, that he is the outcast of your society, and the heretic.

	Now which people killed the Christ? But will not the heretic know it? But it was the religious power of the time. Now these are often a people who have other problems, that they are offended by what is not evil, and that they are not neo-Nazis, or what is called white supremacy, but they are servants, and of what? But these are being servants of what is not, for it is built up in their mind, that they have orders from what is against them acting, for they are plagued with a belief that is against their own people, and they have interpreted wrong, that they are the scavenger dogs, who kill expecting some reward from somewhere, and yet where it will come from, only they believe of it in their mind. Now they are presumptuous due to offence, for they are offended without reason, that they have religious anger without reason. Now they are the only, and they are the only people among what is their own people, that they are being presumptuous for what is not wanted, and having no people with them, that they are alone. Now they are as the polytheist, and yet they say, I defend society, and society is against them, for they are a presumptuous murderer, and their wrath is without understanding, that it is false shepherds, servants, and not even slaves, for they say, I take the power to kill on behalf of the people, and they do not consider the fear of God. Now they say, I guide the sheep, and yet they are not the Shepard. Now Elijah has said, if I am a man of God, let it be, that if he had obeyed, then let it be so, and these say, I am a man of God, and I take authority into my hands, to shed blood, and do evil. Now are they not a people, like the pharisees, to be kept within the same people as slaves? Now the servants and the men, both, might not have been guilty if they were kept as clerks and those working in the palace of one, and yet without the king, they become presumptuous, and are not kings. Now without the kings are they then to be kept in the same people as slaves? But they are of the house of a king, at times, and yet the king is not there. Now these are not leaders of the sheep of the Christ, but there are not those who will Shepard, and the sheep require no teacher. Now how is it priests have been better for this? Now priests have been as priests, and conformed the church services to what a priest in some cases, might create, a type of priest, in some of the Christian churches, and there are those believing that this should be their religion, or following of Christianity, for it is a different Christian church.

	Now if you say, there has been evil, then the angel does not support the evil, for is the angel not an angel? But as for the priests who are holy, who are pure, and keep themselves pure in the way that is mentioned, are they not most? But the angel has not come to carry out justice against the pure and good, but is for the good by this essay that is written. Now the Lord is God, and He is having his only son, the Christ. Now those who kill in wickedness, are they not also those who would oppose the angel? But there are criminals who would not oppose the angel, and what are these? But are they to be included with the wicked, if they have killed the wicked in their wickedness, that was true wickedness? But the angel does not bring any command, and does not come to confuse men or priests or to confuse what is obvious right and wrong, or to give any power to the devil to be impious and wicked. Now none should bow to the angel.

	But slaves are impious, brutal, for attacking slave owners, and there are men who have done things, as if work of angels, to save others from wickedness. Now if the devil attempts to use anything the angel has written in The Diary of Lucifer or in Notes from Salem then none is to bow to the angel, and the angel comes giving wisdom and the Lord has found fault even with the angels. Now do not slaves delight in blaspheming, in learning religion that they may be impious and unjust with it? But these are sometimes slaves of those as if of Shem, and each shade has its slaves. Now if a slave says, yet I attack from my shade, yet it is still a slave owner they attack. Now by priests, also, I do not speak of Egypt, but of Salem, that is Canada, and Babylon is the enemy, and it promotes wicked and deceitful paradigms in its building, even, that it is a decease. Now will you build Babylon within Egypt, you who are tax collectors, enemy prostitutes, rebellious servants not finding slave owners good enough for you? But even the wicked oppose you, and you are more wicked than them when you are larger and having been better established. Now who places a helmet on what is before the Lord? But the Lord is knowing better than the heart. Now if being in Babylon places a helmet on any, and in other things the Lord places a helmet on, where there is stressful things and things of combat, and if there is the breast-plate, and the many things there might be, and yet you are inquiring towards the body, that you might aid yourself, the angel has not advice, only to weary of Babylonians and Babylonian priests, for they are not knowing and must answer all and know all. Now if some are not knowing and yet are for you, then there are those of Daniel in Babylon, and Daniel infiltrates the Babylonian priests even, for he infiltrates all places in Babylon and all things, and yet is he to be many? But be weary and why will you expect his help when he is not many?

	Now Lucifer, Daniel, gives you his best wishes, that you have protection from the Lord, and that you know what is wise for you when you are faced with hardship.

	Now to Japan, that I have called The Island Nation, what word do you have for me, for you are separate and what is for all the Earth is not the same as you, and you are separate from all, that I speak to you as having returned, and yet have I been among you? But what use is there for riddles with you, for it is not a thing for the Earth to know of, that you should have protection, that none should touch you, and none should speak of what you have, and yet they are with good intention at times. Now I do not attempt to sow discord between you and the Earth, for it has been done with others, and caused problems on Earth. But there is an Ocean between the Earth and you, and you are those an angel might learn from on Earth in your ways. Now what can be above you? But is the Christ to be there? But have you not defended the Christ already, and they have attempted to convert you? Now guards of who and what are you? But does the Christ require more than angels? But do the angels require more numbers, people who are on Earth as being like angels? Now the Lord is righteous, and you are having what you have. Now who attempts to convert the disciple, of the original disciples, and not even Paul? But if there are guards and friends, and fellow people of things from heaven come to Earth, those who are like-wise in their understanding of things, heaven coming to a place where fellow workers and guards are, and those who have a like heart, and who are like angels, than how does any convert such people? But who says to the guard, be the one who cooks? Or who says to the farmer, be the one who makes arrows? But they have attempted to convert you to Christianity, those who are like disciples already, upon a platform that shakes at times. Now are you not then like the Lord's angels? Now Lucifer is a star, the Christ's angel. Now he is fair shaded. Now how is it the Christ is theirs and yet you guard Him? Now are you not like the Lord's angels? But I would think, given that the angel is young, and the Christ's angel, that it is better that you are speaking with Michael, for how can the angel, the Christ's, and a young angel, be speaking to you about things?

	Now there are many peoples spread out upon the Earth, and many signs in history, and many things having occurred and Ijeshil is written of in The Diary of Lucifer and the angel has planted the other tree outside the walls in a dangerous place where it might be cut down easily, and yet it is such that people plant and build outside the walls and what will happen, who will know?

	Now is there a deacon of the Earth when the angel is gone, for the body he is given decays, and do not the Christ's angels do as Him, to come to Earth in bodies that decay and die, for it is written of in the diary. Now who is this high priest, who is in America, his spirit, that is concerned with Japan? But does this priest attempt to conquer? Now the angel is not with this spirit. But this spirit emerges because of less segregation, that it attempts to conquer. Now with what arrives and stays, the priest is coming with this and in this he attempts to conquer, for he comes with what arrives and stays. Now have you not already supported the priest-hood of the line of Japeth, and there are other priests who care for other things of decency, and yet you excel this priest, this spirit, already, in your society, that you are better to be instructing him than him you, for is it not so?




Now the Sufi or those of Sufism, are those set aside to be gaining wisdom, as if prophets, but different, that they are of a school of wisdom, set aside to gain wisdom, as if people who are prophets for wisdom, and are not some of them even prophecying at times, when prophecies are coming to them? Now I will only offer this correction to them, that not all people are meant to be Sufi and probably most are not, and also, not all Sufi people are Muslim, or having read any of that religion, but there are Christian Sufi people and those who believe in Islam, and there are Sufis who believe in other things, and perhaps some who believe in nothing, for it is all within them, all the world and all things, contained within them, that they are a people set aside for gaining wisdom in a special way and other ways, as if another type of prophet, that they are set aside for gaining wisdom, for having much within them, for becoming and learning, and being many things at times, that they will be able to offer advice and understand what occurs in the world where it is not contained within them, but is happening in earnest, with these things real. Now if sufi people have been learning on their own, with God as their teacher, yet the angel will only offer that though all is contained within them, for gaining wisdom, all these things are outside and real, that they are not the only religion, but they are given a special purpose and place for being able to study and learn that they might be able to give advice. Now others are not Sufi, and that is the only thing they must understand, for these things are real outside them, and they are given a special purpose and place, that they might be able to learn, and offer insights. Now was the Christ one of these? But it is seeming to many that he was, and yet he acted out and fullfilled all of these things on land, in action, and so it is not the same as being a Sufi, for he fullfilled on land in the world, as it would be called, with the Lord in Heaven, and Him performing all these things. Now the angel performs what he performs, that he fullfills the things of deacon of the Earth, by his giving of wisdom, and what fullfills, there it is understood and suspected. Now the Sufi fullfills the things of the Sufi, to have within them, and gain wisdom, having the Lord as their teacher, and they are a very small portion from all people, that if they fulfill on land, it will cease being a Sufi for them, for they are bound to land, bonded to the world, for they will no longer exist as Sufis, but being bonded to the world by performing on land, they will no longer be a Sufi, and this some have performed. Now it is good that a Sufi would even be interested in things of angels, and some of them have been. Now who is interested in what they have to say? But have they been a vexation at times, for some, and yet there are those greatly interested in what they have to offer, and what they fulfill on land, this they are. Now the deacon of Earth, yet it ceases, does it not? For to associate the angel with Heaven, with the Lord, it not right that some would be praying to him, and it is not good, and none should bow to the angel, and the angel is not the lord of any, but God is the Lord. Now does not even the angel understand and know what is intended, when one of them says, I am God? But there is no blasphemy to it, for they are a Sufi, and the Lord is in Heaven. Now are not some of them well suited to read The Diary of Lucifer and Notes from Salem that they would be able to understand, with wisdom? But a Sufi can be right or wrong, and yet they are given a special ability to be able to offer insights and gain wisdom, for they are a special wisdom school, like a prophet village.

	Now as for the builders of a city made of lies, an angel is not required to cast it into nothing that all the children of light, having light in them, truth, are casting it to less than ashes, and nothing, for the builders of Sodom and Egypt are the people living in Sodom and Egypt, that they build Sodom on Egypt and among Egypt, that they desire greatly the lesser enlightenment and the greater absence of truth, that they even comfort themselves, some of them, and mislabel Sodom, as a specific act, and Sodom has a great multitude of wicked acts and things. Now do not venture out of Sodom and Egypt to bother and cause distraction, as acts of combat and combat strategy, to distract and bother those doing the Lord's work while they are doing it, and even the Sufi requires no distraction and help from you, for your wickedness is appalling. But bring not your city with you, within yourself, for the majority, the citizens, are people of light, and the light does not know the darkness, for the truth is ignorant of lies, and casts the lies to nothing. Now the same is true for Babylon and its lies, that they are cast to nothing by light and the children of light have the light within them, that an angel is not required, but a single person of light is able to cast aside all the lies and cities and kingdoms of the devil, having the light within them, and being children of light. Now those who distract, who do what is like combat strategy towards those following the Lord and in the Lord's work, these are those who are servants of the devil, and the devil's will they will perform, whether fully knowing or partially ignorant, and yet they know that they do wickedness, and they are those who perform the devil's will. Now there are other things of the devil's will that the devil's servants will perform, anything the devil is able to do on Earth against the Lord and those who follow Him and do what is good for the Lord and His kingdoms, for there is indeed war between Heaven and hell, and the devil's servants are performing many wicked things of the devil's will in order for the devil to do combat on Earth.

	Now there is no such thing as Pentecostal, but there is 'the truth' and that is all. For Sodomites blaspheme, and they are build on Egypt and among Egypt, and they appeal much to their own city of comfort in lies that it is a city of ignorance, comfort, and lies for them, and yet they appeal to what is lies and foolishness, for Sodom and Egypt is a wicked and foolish city. Now stay inside your own city, you people of Sodom and Egypt, and keep to it, if you must, and do not travel with it, or bring it with you, and yet the Earth is the Lord's and the Universe, entire belongs to Him, and you are an invalid city, that has no right to exist upon Earth, for you are harmful to others, to good, to enlightenment, to truth, and you are able to receive more good and compassion from the Lord, than by that city that is wicked and foolish. Now in a small matter, in defence of what they call a 'liberal' those who had compassion, these were not wanting Sodom and Egypt, but other hi-jacked their compassion and words to do evil and left the person who had compassion, outside the city, even to later attack that person, for they did not desire Sodom and Egypt, that they had the compassion of David. Now do not accuse David, but he is necessary and I will call him, vital, and only it is the hi-jacking of David and his compassion that is a problem and other things, a great multitude of things, can be hi-jacked for the devil's purposes. Now to the priest, the angel hi-jacks, and has the right, because the Earth is the Lord's, that David and his compassion is not wrong for them, against them, and them not really against David and his compassion, that there be no misunderstanding and evil discord, that the Lord, and His kingdoms might prosper and be in peace and progress. Now Sodom and Egypt has introduced many words and things to label good as being evil, and even, what is 'racism'? But injustice is injustice and good is good, and fairness is fairness, and Sodom and Egypt is tolerant, and who said that tolerance of all was good? But Sodom and Egypt is tolerant of rape, murder, violence, slander, and every wicked thing. Now as for those who are being foolish, to take actions of slaves against slave owners, to be practising injustice, this has always been offensive, and the truth is understood, that the word racism is being bent and turned every way for the wickedness of Sodom and Egypt, that it is turned as a wickedness against the good, those for fairness and truth, that those for fairness and truth have been accused of racism, and they are in their integrity, perceiving things of the Lord, and knowing truth, and not liking Egypt, and hating Sodom. Now do not heed much, if at all, the foolishness and wickedness of Sodom and Egypt and the words they offer, that are for their own city, that they are for Egypt and Sodom. But you are knowing what is acceptable for slave owners towards slave owners, that slaves not attack and be impious and brutal, and yet it is expected from slaves, for slaves have even desired to desecrate and be brutal, and they are seeking their vengeance for being slaves.

	Now the angel offers council to the darker shades, that Sodom and Egypt will destroy you if you do not separate yourselves from them, and you being like a line of Shem, they are as servants to you, those who are the wicked and desecrating and perverse people who are dark shade, and you are not them, but if they emerge from among you, still you are not them, that I have noticed two tribes of darker shades who have integrity, and it is not offered as a parallel, but there are perhaps even more, and I have not seen all, for the truth is too big for me, and I am a baby angel, a young angel, and the Lord is knowing all and is all wise, and the Christ knows more than I. Now do you not reject the foolish and impious sympathy towards you, because of the wickedness of Sodom and Egypt, when they would show you sympathy for wrong-doing, as if not men and women of integrity, as if wicked babies, for Sodom and Egypt have been like a false flag for you, and some have been deceived. But Sodom and Egypt, those of the dark shade who are so, are parasites to you, and I believe they will destroy you if you do not separate yourselves from them, for they are indeed wicked parasites to you, using you, and your integrity, and betraying you. Now they even hold you back in many ways, at times, and even in great ways, because you are not as them, and they are a different people. Now to you, who are not them, I offer no accusation, no rebuke even, that I have not wanted the fire of war to scorch the house nearby that has the blood of the lamb above the door, and yet there is great evil existing among the good and it is difficult, even for me, to avoid causing hurt to those who are not the right target. Now it is so that you will likely have trouble if you remain in America, where there was the foolishness of slave owners being enslaved with the slaves, for it is reasonable that there would be trouble if many remained, for humans, people, even if willing, are not capable of all. But the angel gives no command to any. Now if Egypt will not kill the child, then neither will societies more enlightened, and Egypt will do wickedness and evil that other societies will not, that the angel says, what does it matter if there is one thing they will not due in terms of wickedness? But Babylon is even more wicked than Egypt, and is is luke-warm in its worse wickedness and the things it will do, that it has often what is called 'professionalism' while it performs wickedness worse than animals. Now to the dark shades not Sodom and Egypt, I would advise you not to enter into Egypt, for you are not Egyptian and have not entered into Egypt, both tribes that have integrity, and you have not entered into Sodom, and the blood of the lamb is above the door. Now the priests, even if not righteous enough in the opinion of some, are the priests of the line of Japeth, and are they really your enemy? But Nazis are preferable to some of you, who are righteous, and not priests, and yet there is likely to be struggle and trouble if you remain in America, where the foolishness took place. Now for the small, the things considered insignificant, yet priests are different, not Nazis, but having their separate portion. Now I do not say the priests are not righteous, but they are different, and priests. Now if priests are with those who are taken for might for them, yet is a man of integrity really that person they are against, having anything against? But there has been discord, even here, where those of dark shade have been offered misunderstanding, for the Nazi priests are priests of the line of Japeth, and for them who are fair shade, and their society, and yet it is Sodom and Egypt that are wicked and murder without reason and commit multitudes of wickedness.

	Now when the angel is finished, will he not take all the work of righteousness for granted, and be again as a king who is a Sufi, to be again taking the work of others for granted, that it is as if he betrays all? But the angel offers no command, and there is really no truth in saying, hypocrite to him, and the angel is not the Christ. Now he lounged, and he did little, and indulged in what pleased him, and he was not judgmental, but sought wisdom like a Sufi, who performed only things on land that would not be of offence, truly, unless it be to those who did not keep to their own business and lives. Now it is known for those who desire to know things and happenings, that like a Sufi king, or not a king at all, not doing anything of consequence much, or anything offensive towards anyone, but lounging, indulging in the love of women, for the angel is loving and has said, “Perhaps I love women too much.” But the angel is also for true love when it is so, and he was lounging before, keeping much to himself in terms of doing what pleased him, sedentary tasks and indulgences, and romantic love. Now these are actually holy women, for if base people are hating, to slander them, yet it is as nothing. Now the angel has no children, and as for the orphanage, the children of angels, he has not had much contact with any of them who are there, and are there not angels who are as fathers to them, who they have made such, the children of angels, and the angels wanting such, and given joy by such, the ones being as fathers to them, are they not taking much pleasure from the orphanage, and the children of angels? But the angel is childless, Lucifer, is childless, and a young angel, and he has loved women, and was lounging and indulging and doing nothing of offence, or consequence in terms of combat, for there was no war for him to fight at that time, and were not others fighting in some places?

	Now those enemy prostitutes calling themselves mothers, to excuse their barbaric and ugly ways, these are are sometimes even men who have made themselves enemy prostitutes, and to be even like mothers in their bullying, for the Christ saw it from the cross in Sodom and Egypt. Now they are prostitutes of the philistines and prostitutes of the enemy that is Babylon, and they are brutish, the enemy prostitutes who call themselves mothers, and do not keep to what is their business to keep to, that they meddle to be perverse and brutish. Now do not some beat with clubs, and they are ugly in their ways. Now if they prefer Sodom and Egypt, are they not, many of them, from that place? But Sodom and Egypt is built of nothing, that it is built of what is not truth. Now let the enemy prostitutes also be considered to be partners with slaves who are even more brutish that no servant taming will touch them. Now the servant is not beaten with the whip or the chain, or beaten with the heavy stick or the metal club. But who are these who prefer, in imprudence, to be thrown into the lake of fire, where they will endure torture while the angels look on? But they are comparable to zealots who would not bow to the Lord, that they would prefer to be thrown into the fire. Now those who slayed a righteous man on their bed, as David called the acts of these who did what did not belong in war, for David killed the wicked, coward slayers of soldiers, who are perverts, and he killed the scavenger dogs, and Joab killed the others things that did not belong in war, those who did not respect lines and areas in war after war had begun, them he killed, and those who feigned stupidly to commit treason by impairing military ability and those who would even commit treachery with attacks, for these two things, also do not belong in war, that both were slayn outside battle for they slayed in ways outside of battle. Now there are those in prison, wicked people, and fools, who have targeted those men, even, who are viewed to be possible threats for they attack in cowardly ways, to slay with guile, to distract, to hinder, to harass, to cause all types of trouble and disturbance for them, that they may not be able to do the Lord's work, for they go behind enemy lines where soldiers are not fighting, and attack them with cowardliness and wickedness when they are not doing a time in battle and combat in areas of war. For in ancient times it was that these attacked the best soldiers when they were not in combat, and when it is clear, David has declared that they be hung upside down over a pool with their hands cut off. Now the angel recieved distractions, Nicolatains, the harrasement of the devil, and the angel employed with help, for the Lord controls the hearts, that which would allow him to carry out his work, for after the city is taken, then the plans are seen that the hearts of many were deceived and their strategy was for the enemy, that the angel has been able to employ things of the the planet in order to carry out his work, and will even attempt to employ money, when it is right and strategic, to increase the effectiveness. Now some in INCEL are not honest, in that their hearts are not honest with themselves or with others, and they are for combat with the Lord, for have they not refused to bow to the Lord, and they would rather be thrown into the fire to be tortured? But like defends like, for there is something in the heart that is like-wise, that it is sometimes goodness that defends those who are goods, despite differences, and the devil's people defend those who are the devil's.

	Now those who are of the wickedness that they must disturb, and those who are murderous because of themselves, that they must be avenged, and those who commit treachery, because of the cosmic struggle, and those who enter into the cosmic struggle as their reason, for those of Sodom and Egypt are sometimes entering into the cosmic struggle between heaven and hell, because of what the Lord has done, now these are in varying places. Now how is Japan then part of the west, the allied world? But is there not some special covenant with them, and what it is, who can say?

	Now as for the aggressive Babylonian who bullies others in things not bullying, and not defined as bullying, but in things that are the right of all, to have their own opinions, to speak as they wish in a way that is acceptable in society, to silence them, and bully against what is only the rights of a person, being more aggressive than a bully, but being a madman silencing citizens who are having their rights, and doing what is their right, to have their own opinions and advance as a society, to practise religion and believe in religion as it pleases them, that they come forth, the madman, claiming territory that was never theirs, the beliefs of others, like a insane dog that is sick, then the animal, even if it says, I defend science, must be physically removed, for it may defend what it pleases, and yet the opinions of others are not its business, that it is the way the dog behaves and not what the dog believes in, for beliefs, causes, opinions, are not ever the thing that presents the problem, but it is the way in which people do things that is the problem, so that the insane dog must be physically removed, for it is aggressive beyond bullying, to silence, to be as an insane animal, and it must be removed physically, for it is not being attacked, but it is attacking in an unacceptable way. Now what territory it never possessed it believes it is in, and it grand stands, and acts out the things of other situations that are not occurring, and it blasphemes and takes military like action to meddle in society, and things of democracy when it claims it has performed objective tests that it cannot perform. Now this is the real blasphemy and the military-like attack, that is not defence, and it is also true of those who travel to nations where there are many Muslims and attempts to force Ioim—the western values of Sodom and Egypt, for Ioim is sometimes Sodom and Egypt—upon another society that boundaries and segregation are not respected and foolishness and disrespect is given when there is no cause. Now none have asked these to do something, that the hands of the majority of citizens are not participating in it and they have not sent any of them. For some go out on their own, as missionaries, to spread Sodom and Egypt, and for what reason, who would know? But Sodom and Egypt becomes wickedness, abuse, and disrespect quickly, and why should any nation be defiled by it? But the citizens of the nation it emerges from, their hands are not in it, and they themselves have been attacked by it and detest it. Now Nazis are not priests, unless you should become dismayed that men are not as concerned with decency as a priest would be, for though the Muslims are often for much decency, yet Nazis, men especially, are not the same as priests, unless you should be dismayed, although men are for decency as well, and yet they are not priests. Now the angel is not a priest, but a Nazi, that he also is not meeting the things of priests and yet the angel is not a man or women, either, but an angel, that he is different from priests and from men and women, Nazis.

	Now the Babylonians have been found to be better established in another place, which is the pharmacuetical industry, where they have waged what can only be considered war on entire nations, with global campaigns that would disrupt society, wanting to label all people on Earth as having a diagnosis that will require their medicines, that the campaigns are targeting so many, and are outside of the practise of medicine, that it is as if war upon the Earth entire, and upon nations, for it is causing great disruption and evil for many and for society and the people are mostly well and do require medicines and are not sick. Now some of these corporations have been suspected by many authors, writers, and journalists, and those who make films, and those who produce media and even art, of conducting terrorism, for when their actions are against citizens carrying out free speech it is then terrorism against free speech. Now these corporations are certainly not neo-Nazis, religious terrorists, or anything else that is known to the public, and yet many have at least suspected them of carrying out terrorism when it is not necessary or even beneficial them as a corporation that produces and sell medicines. Now with the priests of Babylon, described in The Diary of Lucifer and their dragons that they use to harass and trouble cities and towns, and the producers of medicines, Babylonian, being luke-warm in their speech and more wicked and evil than any, there is a threat to a nation, and perhaps every nation, that these do not write laws or control doctors, but have seemed to have attempted to do so, and yet it is not confirmed what they do, and even the angel, in honesty, cannot know what they do on Earth.

	Now there are other corporations, like-wise, luke-warm with greater wickedness than any, and this is Babylon, and it is pharmacuetical corporations and other corporations and corporations that are incredibly wicked, that the children of angels are not wrong, though detesting the priest-hood most often, for the Nazi priest-hood they have believed to be evil, and the children of angels, are they not exempt in much more than others, that even if they believe this, they are innocent. Now Sodom and Egypt is often going directly to cosmic struggle between hell and heaven, for the war against goodness and heaven is often the only cause for those of Sodom and Egypt to bully, and in their wickedness they have even given a wicked and bullying more than what bullying is, towards even the children of angels, that those even of the darker shades, who are Sodom and Egypt, and those who are slaves, whether fair or dark, and those of Sodom and Egypt who are any shade, have offered such wicked bullying and evil to the children of angels, for not other reason than the cosmic struggle between hell and heaven. For Sodom and Egypt is easily in the realm of the cosmic struggle as their only motive, that it is not Jews and philistines, but hell and heaven with Sodom and Egypt, for they believe and are wicked. Now where hell believes and offers war to heaven and goodness and what is in the Lord's kingdoms, there is indeed the war between hell and heaven, and the devil wages war on Earth, in offence and defence. Now Sodom and Egypt is wicked, and evil, and is not for goodness, for the children of angels must understand that those of the dark shades are not Sodom and Egypt, all of them, and though the children of angels do not often go against criminals who are having less money, still they are not as those who are persecuted, for Sodom and Egypt persecutes and murders, commits rape and child molestation, and is evil. For it is what they themselves, call racist, and more so in a way, for they are waging war because of the cosmic struggle, and yet the children of angels are doing what they like, and the angel, Lucifer, is not owner of the orphanage where the children of angels are. Now with concerns to many corporations, they are not wrong, when it concerns those corporations that are Babylon, and yet there are those not Babylon and being clean, that it is always understood.

	Now I am not Michael, or another angel whose name you have known, and I am not the angel Gabriel. But the angel of Permomon is having a message that you are able to read, and by the signs, even the angel's tooth, on the inside, and not visible, has been scathed, so that the angel has spoken for a time like a small child, that the signs have become a slight vexation, and yet let it be so, if it is the Lord's will. Now by a human, the angel is not a child, but is an adult, and yet by an angel, the angel is a child angel, not yet even a teenager. Now Babylon, as is mentioned in The Diary of Lucifer spits out the highly intelligent with alarming skill, commitment, and ability, for it wants only the less intelligent, for it harbours the worthless scum-bags, the cheats, the liars, the slanderers, and the fools, for they are servants of wicked deeds and their intelligence is often small, as is their prudence, that these are those fear Babylon and being servants of Babylon, to be servants of the devil, in their hearts, for they believe in their hearts, and are for the devil. Now they are those disposable, of no worth, the scum-bags who betray, given to offer things in service and turning against a nation to commit wickedness, for they are a national security threat and possibly the greatest threat to the planet and to a nation, and some nations more than others, for they are able to control the 'strong-hand' which is the media, and it is a very capable and strong hand that can manipulate information and portray what it likes, and they are even exploiting tragedies to further their marketing in indirect ways, for they blame slayings upon that which requires medicines. Now still, not much can be found about them, and even the angel cannot know what they do, only that those they desire, being Babylonian, are the lesser in intelligence and fools of a type, having their hearts offering up obedience to Babylon, to be within its world and city, that is the devil's kingdom. Now perhaps most of those who have been troubled, even disabled in ways, by medicines, did not require those medicines, and it is suspected that this part of Babylon is behind it, for they are nefarious and strategic, censoring and buying up loyalties and censorship with what is like bribes. Now how much blood is upon their houses, the angel does not know, for they have indeed slain and caused trouble and censored information, and yet much is not known of them, other than that authors have been concerned, and perhaps not all. Now the NSA is not Babylon, and neither is Cias or Cessus, being CIA and CISC as they call it, and the Giant Lady who is covetous of secrets, for NSA is above her doors, she is not Babylon, and yet she has still pursued children of angels and she is pursuing those who attack with violence to be false-flags against Mohammad's people. Now they are not science, or even true scientists, and they are not atheists, for when they claim atheism, yet they are luke-warm, and not later known to be atheists, that they are believers in Babylon, and the wicked ways of gaining money, and believers in compromise. Now an atheist will not prey for profit or friends. But atheists are part of the west in the way they are, and so are believers, and yet Babylon, with its luke-warm and disgusting ways, will attend church for profit and commit all manner of lies and disgust, and prey for profit, and practise religions for profit, for it is strange, and is the strangeness mysterious because it is strange and creepy in some way? But Babylon the mystery, the strange, the creepy, the cruel, the wicked, the unjust, the foolish, the unintelligent, and the other names the young angel believes you to be. Now Babylon spreads in places to present itself as good, spreading itself to where there is reputation of good, often, that it might sit in the places of goodness to be wicked and unjust with the image of goodness. Now it is clean and tasteless water that causes death, now it is pure water that poisons. Now will not its servants say, we do not believe, and yet it is of void and nothing, and wickedness and abomination are in it, and lack of intelligence. Now does it not blaspheme? But it is cruel and committing all types of wickedness. Now it desires the full circumcision, as is Babylon, that it desires to remove the entire member, and it does so, and fools of it, on impulse, attempt to convert others to it by force, where they have no right. Now they are servants of the devil, and wicked servants. Now if some things have the image of it, and yet those things are not, than it is still good that you not be deceived, for the discord between good and good is giving opportunity to Babylon. Now the children of angels, even if it is not necessary, are preferring what is called Linux, because they are children of angels. Now the religions of it are as pure waters that are void and nothing, and they are able to develop their religions to be more than they are. Now their corporations are performing unnecessary wickedness, and they are loving fantasies of wickedness for society, that they care not for life and what is good and righteous. Now they are even with things of forbidding meat, and yet some are having faith greater and some believing less, that they do not perceive that the Lord does much, and these are eaters of herbs, and yet they are still believers even if they are not having as much faith, for they are righteous and doing good, even if they do not have as much faith. Now it is still not as those who forbid meat, who promote the false purity of the unjust and use it for gain of money, that better is Egypt than Babylon, and the people are not Egypt in many places. Now the angel has been much in Egypt and came to little harm, and Egypt is not an ethnicity, but an enlightenment as state of some and a state of society, that is has vocabulary of things not of weight and not worth consideration. Now Egypt is not as David, but David is of Israel, the promised land, and yet David is hi-jacked by Egyptians for the cruelty and bullying to guide others to Egypt and to remain in Egypt. Now David is vital, and he is not for Egypt. Now even if those of the sign of Solomon make allegiance with Pharaoh, still you do not bring Egypt in or return to Egypt. Now it has been written, hate not an Egyptian, but Sodom and Egypt is not the same as Egypt. But if a Salem person seems to be Egyptian, yet they are a Salem person, and their innocence is as the innocence of angels.

	Now as for the Jews, and the priests, too, are Jews, they are not in the realm of the same innocence as Christians, who do not perform the things of justice the same, or are having the innocence that they are often not for doing these things, being innocent as doves, or called to be so, that they are those who even are remaining in prison when the doors are opened, being stoic in their obedience, and practising stoicism unto death if it is so, and yet there can be no accusation for those who are not so, and who is the hypocrite who will accuse the greater righteousness of being this type of stoic? Now the angel, as far as he knows, has not been called to a suicide mission as Elijah and the Christ came to die. Now one man died and the whole of the Earth is covered in the Lord's kingdoms, save for the polytheists and China, and the Muslims are because of the obedience of the angels. Now yet, the Christians, why will you ask them to perform that which is not of the innocence of Christians? But one is for being a soldier, and another for being a priest, and another yet cooking and preparing, and is it not good? Now there is advantage to the inward circumcision, and it was written much in every way and yet the angel is not sure if it is in every way, only that there is much advantage to the inward circumcision, and the angel cannot confirm that it is in 'every way'. Now as for concepts of supremacy, it is not a thing of religion, but where the term 'supremacy' has come from in terms of the circumcision, the angel does not know, for the Lord does it, supremacy, and it is not religion. Now as for justice, the Jews are having more acceptable to them, often, than the Christians who are not Jews, and those Christians called to greater innocence, for there are soldiers who believe in Christ, and those of Cias and Cessus, many of these are believing in Christ, and they could not be those called to the same degree of innocence as those Christians called to greater innocence. But as for the angel, he would be preferring a one-edged sword, as that of the Island nation, that you not be deceived about the angel, and even David, was considered innocent by the Lord's standard. Now as for the word gentile, I do not know what it means, only I do in fact know, for it is Babylonians and their ways, and there are not many gentiles upon the Earth. Now in The Diary of Lucifer there is much more given about this.

	Now why will any waste time with such pety things in accusation, but there is guidance given by the Christ for those who desire to do better, that is there anything for accusation and judgment of others given by the Christ?

	Now some enemy prostitutes are going about to bully men and women, and they have accusations of Egypt and Sodom, that they are base and blasphemous, using even righteous sentiments in low and despicable ways, that they make themselves obnoxious even in this, in that they attack religion, even, with things not meant for religion, but for society and other things that happen in society, that though religion is permitted, and exempt from things of Sodom and Egypt and the criticisms of society, they speak and behave in low and despicable ways, as a wicked drunk who reviles a holy procession, and scorns and mocks at the delicate event. Now there is not this lack of intelligence with atheists, for they are keeping to what they believe and their position, that you know that some are atheists, as they know you are spiritual, and for belief in God, for their words are not words of obnoxious, enemy prostitutes, unless they are something else, perhaps, in addition, and it is not seeming a thing of atheists, if I would be presumptuous, for though atheists do indeed blaspheme, yet they are hot or cold, that they are preferable to many things, for though they are rebels, yet they are preferable to many things. Now there are many types of rebels, and not all are atheists.

	Now Sodom and Egypt who are the darker shade, have sometimes believed in wrong towards atheists, and is it not right, if a person is willing and of the heart to defend, that the atheist is having their place in the west, being one of the people, even if an outcast, that if you are desiring, with no command given, or judgment, to defend them, than is it not good? But the atheist is given their place in the west, and if there is no discussion of contention, should they not be offered peace as a citizen, for when it is written about in the new testament that it is not good to do evil that good might come of it, and as for those with more understanding, how is any injustice to aid the kingdoms of the Lord? But you know when it is right to defend yourself if you are the type, and to even be on the offensive, and will peace not then be given to the atheist, them being a citizen and one of the people? But religion has been the cause of it much against the atheist, and they are not wrong in this, but then it is much the same as carrying out a campaign without reason, for why contend with a person when they have done you no wrong? Now is the scripture even required to know what is right and wrong? But there is confirmation, and society goes far astray at times, and much good is offered by confirmations.

	Now Babylon is despicable, and Sodom and Egypt, wicked and horrible, and as for you Salem, are you not given what you have, that you are able to be blameless and progress? But if there are traitors among Prince Rellium or Cessus, it must be exposed. Now is not Solomon more suited to be a king and Prince Rellium to be a prince? But both are one of the people, and both are your people, Salem. Now the sign of Solomon is for defending that which should be defended, the citizens, those one of the people, that injustice be put away, that Sodom and Egypt be understood, that Babylon be cleared out of the land, and that the methods of peace, to lessen likely-hood of abuse, be understood, that wisdom might be given to the people, that order be understood to offer greater respect to all, for these are things offered by Solomon, that little is gained at a time, that order is carried out that chaos and abuse might not happen, that peace might come upon those areas where he has his people established of the palace, for if any is wishing to be given, they need only approach the guards and quietly say the word, and the guard will return and give that they may have peace in receiving, for do they not give in their taxes?

	Now if a person does things of demon, than do they not have a demon? But these are things of below human ability and reason or cause, within the realm of cosmic struggle, that you might understand. Now some Babylonians have a demon and do they even know of it, or would it be understood by common things and in common ways? Now it is against the kingdoms of the Lord, is it not? For who distracts the Lord's people in a wicked or foolish way when they are attempting to carry out the Lord's work? Who carries out acts of distraction and hindrance to them? Now does a Babylonian give their opinion as if they are able to, when they are those who do these types of wickedness? But a Babylon approaches to judge the believers and to be the false-prophet of the Lord, to offer judgment on things of the kingdom and even judgments of Babylonians and themselves, as if they are the judge of these things, and they are those who do this wickedness, and also they are Babylonian. Now it is insolent, obnoxious, and abomination, and they are a stranger to you, not one of the people, and they come as an enemy nation, setting up their fortresses illegally, and without hesitation or introduction, they judge as if leaders of your religion, directly becoming false-shepherds, and there is no confusion and there cannot be confusion. Now some give themselves permission, and yet the permission is not granted, and the angel grants no permission to them to use what he offers, that is for the believers and those to mention when it is acceptable for them. Now it is not given for Babylonians to desecrate. But all those one of the people may use it, and yet those not one of the people, it is not for them, for they are enemies and having no part in it, and it is also true for slaves that they have no part in it and it is not for them to use, but servants are one of the people, and they are not called servants, for the word has become offensive. Now what person has not been what they are in some way at times, and David had a servant's heart.

	Now the angel has brought what makes the belly bitter for some, and yet it is brought, and will there then be a return to lounging and taking society for granted from him, that it will be like he betrays all, and throws off the task, for he was on 'the waiting list' perhaps, as the soldiers say, and had no war to fight prior, that he lounged and indulged and carried out nothing of consequence in terms of offence, unless it be to those who would not mind to their own lives and business. Now prior he had been a Salem person, a citizen in this way, and keeping to himself in terms of friends, and indulging in romantic love, and he only says it that they might understand that it is duty, and the angel must perform as he is able, and the Lord finds fault even with the angels, and the angel is an angel of the Christ, a star, Lucifer, who is also in Pergamon and has endured the resistance of the devil, much at times, and in what fashion the devil was able to carry out a defence and resistance according to what he was able to do, perhaps due to the nation, or due to his being forced to with-hold. For the devil is holding the heart of his servants in his hands, that he is able to wield them, and though it is not always so, some polytheists have been obnoxious to an unreasonable degree, that they have not been part of society. Now some remaining fools of the INCEL the angel is not able to pity, for they do not realize the reality of life, that they are unable to be pitied by the angel, and yet those who aided the angel, perhaps did so mostly by secret, that the Lord knows it, and is more generous and able than the angel, for where there has been resistance and defensive attacks by the devil, it has mostly been cowardly attacks. Now the angel has sought wisdom from the time of the comet passing between Saturn and Jupiter, that both planets are a sign, even, to before the time of the sign passing Earth.
















WORD COUNT: 39 000

29 July 2023











































	







	































































































